VOL. I. 2
PEDLAR KARL.
Which manner of digression, however some dislike as frivolous
and impertinent, yet I am of Beroaldus his opinion, such digressions
do mightily delight and refresh a weary reader; they are like sawce to
a bad stomach, and I therefore do most willingly use them.
Burton
.
Bienheureuses les imparfaites;  elles appartient le royaume de
l'amour.
L'Evangile des femmes
.
I am
not sure whether Lebanon Springs, the scene
of a romantic story I am about to tell, belong to
New-York
or Massachusetts. It is not very important, to
be sure, in a country where people take Vermont and
Patagonia to be neighbouring States, but I have a
natural looseness in geography which I take pains to
mortify by exposure. Very odd! that I should not
remember more of the spot where I took my first lessons
in philandering; where I first saw you, brightest and
most beautiful A. D. (not
Anno Domini
,) in your white
morning-frocks and black French aprons!
Lebanon Springs are the rage about once in three
years. I must let you into the secret of these things,
gentle reader, for perhaps I am the only individual
existing who has penetrated the mysteries of the four
dynasties of American fashion. In the fourteen
millions
of inhabitants in the United States, there are
precisely
four authenticated and undisputed aristocratic
families. There is one in Boston, one in New-York,
one in Philadelphia, and one in Baltimore. By a blessed
Providence they are not all in one State, or we should
have a civil war and a monarchy in no time. With
two hundred miles' interval between them, they agree
passably, and generally meet at one or another of the
three watering-places of Saratoga, Ballston or
Lebanon
.
Their meeting is as mysterious as the process
of crystallization, for it is not by agreement. You
must explain it by some theory of homopathy or
magnetism. As it is not known till the moment they
arrive, there is of course great excitement among the
hotel keepers in these different parts of the country,
and a village that has ten thousand transient
inhabitants
one summer, has, for the next, scarce as many
score. The vast and solitary temples of Pstum are
gay in comparison with these halls of disappointment.
As I make a point of dawdling away July and
August in this locomotive metropolis of pleasure, and
rather prefer Lebanon, it is always agreeable to me to
hear that the nucleus is formed in that valley of
hemlocks
.
Not for its scenery, for really, my dear
Eastern-hemispherian
!
you that are accustomed to what
is called nature in England, (to wit, a soft park, with a
gray ruin in the midst,) have little idea how wearily
upon heart and mind presses a waste wilderness of
mere forest and water, without stone or story. Trees
in England have characters and tongues; if you see a
fine one, you know whose father planted it, and for
whose pleasure it was designed, and about what sum
the man must possess to afford to let it stand. They
are statistics, as it wereso many trees,
ergo
, so many
owners so rich. In America, on the contrary, trees
grow and waters run, as the stars shine, quite
unmeaningly
;
there may be ten thousand princely elms, and
not a man within a hundred miles worth five pounds
five. You ask, in England, who has the privilege of
this water? or you say of an oak, that it stood in such
a man's time: but with us, water is an element
unclaimed
and unrented, and a tree dabbles in the clouds
as they go over, and is like a great idiot, without soul
or responsibility.
If Lebanon
had
a history, however, it would have
been a spot for a pilgrimage, for its
natural
beauty.
It is shaped like a lotus, with one leaf laid back by
the wind. It is a great green cup, with a scoop for a
drinking-place. As you walk in the long porticoes of
the hotel, the dark forest mounts up before you like a
leafy wall, and the clouds seem just to clear the
pine-tops
,
and the eagles sail across from horizon to
horizon
,
without lifting their wings, as if you saw them
from the bottom of a well. People born there think
the world about two miles square, and hilly.
The principal charm of Lebanon to me is the
village
of Shakers, lying in a valley about three miles
off. As Glaucus wondered at the inert tortoise of
Pompeii, and loved it for its antipodal contrast to
himself
,
so do I
affection
(a French verb that I beg leave
to introduce to the English language) the Shaking
Quakers. That two thousand men could be found in
the New World, who would embrace a religion
enjoining
a frozen and unsympathetic intercourse with
the diviner sex, and that an equal number of females
could be induced to live in the same community,
without
locks or walls, in the cold and rigid observance
of a creed of celibacy, is to me an inexplicable and
grave wonder. My delight is to get into my stanhope
after breakfast, and drive over and spend the forenoon
in contemplating them at their work in the fields.
They have a peculiar and most expressive
physiognomy
;
the women are pale, or of a wintry redness in
the cheek, and are all attenuated and spare. Gravity,
deep and habitual, broods in every line of their thin
faces. They go out to their labor in company with
those serious men, and are never seen to smile. Their
eyes are all hard and stony, their gait is precise and
stiff, their voices are of a croaking hoarseness, and
nature seems dead in them. I would bake you such
men and women in a brick-kiln.
Do they think the world is coming to an end?
Are there to be no more children? Is Cupid to be
thrown out of business, like a coach proprietor on a
rail-road? What can the Shakers mean, I should be
pleased to know?
The oddity is that most of them are young. Men
of from twenty to thirty, and women from sixteen to
twenty-five, and often, spite of their unbecoming
dress, good-looking and shapely, meet you at every
step. Industrious, frugal, and self-denying they
certainly
are, and there is every appearance that their
tenets of difficult abstinence are kept to the letter.
There is little temptation beyond principle to remain,
and they are free to go and come as they list, yet there
they live on in peace and unrepining industry, and a
more thriving community does not exist in the
republic
.
Many a time have I driven over on a Sunday,
and watched those solemn virgins dropping in one
after another to the church; and when the
fine-limb-ed
and russet-faced brotherhood were swimming round
the floor in their fanatical dance, I have watched their
countenances for some look of preference, some
betrayal
of an ill-suppressed impulse, till my eyes ached
again. I have selected the youngest and fairest, and
have not lost sight of her for two hours, and she
might have been made of cheese-parings for any trace
of emotion. There is food for speculation in it. Can
we do without matrimony? Can we strike, and be
2*
independent of these dear delightful tyrants, for whom
we live and move and have our being? Will it
ever be no blot on our escutcheon to have attained
thirty-five as an unfructifying unit? Is that fearful
campaign, with all its embarrassments and
awkwardnesses
,
and inquisitions into your money and morals,
its bullyings and backings-outis it inevitable?
Lebanon has one other charm. Within a
morning
drive of the Springs lies the fairest village it has
ever been my lot to see. It is English in its
character
,
except that there is really nothing in this country
so perfect of its kind. There are many towns in the
United States more picturesquely situated, but this,
before I had been abroad, always seemed to me the
very ideal of English rural scenery, and the kind of
place to set apart for either love or deathfor one's
honeymoon or burialthe two periods of life which
I have always hoped would find me in the loveliest
spot of nature. Stockbridge lies in a broad sunny
valley, with mountains at exactly the right distance,
and a river in its bosom that is as delicate in its
windings
,
and as suited to the charms it wanders among,
as a vein in the transparent neck of beauty. I am
not going into a regular description, but I have
carried
myself back to Lebanon; and the remembrance
of the leafy mornings of summer in which I have
driven to that fair earthly Paradise, and loitered under
its elms, imagining myself amid the scenes of song
and story in distant England, has a charm for me
now. I have seen the mother land; I have rambled
through park, woodland and village, wherever the
name was old and the scene lovely, and it pleases me
to go back to my dreaming days and compare the
reality
with the anticipation. Most small towns in
America
have traces of
new
-ness about them. The stumps
of a clearing, or freshly-boarded barnssomething
that is the antipodes of romancemeets your eye
from every aspect. Stockbridge, on the contrary, is
an old town, and the houses are of a rural structure;
the fields look soft and genial, the grass is sward-like,
the bridges picturesque, the hedges old, and the elms,
nowhere so many and so luxuriant, are full grown
and majestic. The village is embowered in foliage.
Greatest attraction of all, the authoress of
Redwood
and Hope Leslie, a novelist of whom America
has the good sense to be proud, is the Miss Mitford of
Stockbridge. A
man
, though a distinguished one,
may have little influence on the town he lives in, but
a remarkable
woman
is the invariable cynosure of a
community, and irradiates it all. I think I could
divine the presence of one almost by the growing of
the trees and flowers. Our Village does not look
like other villages.
II.
You will have forgotten that I had a story to tell,
dear reader. I was at Lebanon in the summer of
(perhaps you don't care about knowing exactly when
it was, and in that case I would rather keep shy of
dates. I please myself with the idea that time gets on
faster than I.) The Springs were thronged. The
President's lady was there, (this was under
our
administration
,
the Adams',) and all the four
cliques
spoken
of above were amicably unitedeach other's beaux
dancing with each other's belles, and so on. If I were
writing merely for American eyes, I should digress
once more to describe the distinctive characters of the
south, north, and central representations of beauty;
but it would scarcely interest the general reader. I
may say in passing that the Boston belles were
l' Anglaise
, rosy and
riantes;
the New-Yorkers, like
Parisians, cool, dangerous, and dressy; and the
Baltimorians
,
(and so south,) like Ionians or Romans,
indolent
,
passionate, lovely, and languishing. Men, women
and pine apples, I am inclined to think, flourish with
a more kindly growth in the fervid latitudes.
The campaign went on, and a pleasant campaign it
wasfor the parties concerned had the management
of their own affairs;
i. e.
they who had hearts to sell
made the bargain for themselves, (this was the greater
number,) and they who disposed of this commodity
gratis, though necessarily young and ignorant of the
world, made the transfer in the same manner, in
person
.
This is your true republic. The trading in
affections by referencethe applying to an old and
selfish heart for the purchase of a young and
ingenuous
onethe swearing to your rents, and not to your
faithful passion to your settlements, and not your
constancy the cold distance between yourself and
the young creature who is to lie in your bosom, till
the purchase-money is secured,and the hasty
marriage
and sudden abandonment of a nature thus chilled
and put on its guard, to a freedom with one almost a
stranger, that cannot but seem licentious, and cannot
but break down that sense of propriety in which
modesty
is most strongly entrenchedthis seems to me the
one
evil of your old worm-eaten monarchies this side
the water, which touches the essential happiness of
the well-bred individual. Taxation and oppression
are but things he reads of in the morning paper.
This freedom of intercourse between unmarried
people
has a single disadvantage,one gets so desperately
soon to the end of the chapter! There shall be two
hundred young ladies at the Springs in a given season,
and, by the difference in taste so wisely arranged by
Providence, there will scarce be, of course, more than
four in that number whom any one gentleman at all
difficult will find within the range of his
beau ideal
.
With these four he may converse freely twelve hours
in the daymore, if he particularly desires it. They
may ride together, drive together, ramble together, sing
together, be together from morning till night, and at
the end of a month passed in this way, if he escape a
committal, as is possible, he will know all that are
agreeable, in one large circle, at least, as well as he
knows his sistersa state of things that is very likely
to end in his going abroad soon, from a mere dearth
of amusement. I have imagined, however, the case of
an unmarrying idle man, a character too rare as yet
in America to affect the general question. People
marry as they die in that countrywhen their time
come.
We must all marry
is as much an axiom as
we must all die
, and eke as melancholy.
Shall we go on with the story? I had escaped for
two blessed weeks, and was congratulating the
susceptible
gentleman under my waistcoat-pocket that we
should never be in love with less than the whole sex
again, when a German Baron Von  arrived at the
Springs with a lame daughter. She was eighteen,
transparently fair, and, at first sight, so shrinkingly
dependent, so delicate, so child-like, that attention to
her assumed the form almost of pity, and sprang as
naturally and unsuspectingly from the heart. The
only womanly trait about her was her voice, which
was so deeply soft and full, so earnest and yet so
gentle
,
so touched with subdued pathos and yet so
gentle
,
so touched with subdued pathos and yet so
melancholy
calm, that if she spoke after a long silence, I
turned to her involuntarily with the feeling that she
was not the same,as if some impassioned and
eloquent
woman had taken unaware the place of the
simple and petted child.
I am inclined to think there is a particular
tenderness
in the human breast for lame women. Any
other deformity in the gentler sex is monstrous; but
lameness (the Devil's defect) is the devil. I picture
to myself, to my own eye, nowpacing those ricketty
colonnades at Lebanon with the gentle Meeta hanging
heavily, and with the dependence inseparable from
her infirmity, on my arm, while the moon (which was
the moon of the Rhine to
her
, full of thrilling and
unearthly
influences) rode solemnly up above the
mountain-tops
.
And that strange voice filling like a flute
with sweetness as the night advanced, and that
irregular
pressure of the small wrist in her forgotten
lameness
,
and my own (I thought) almost paternal feeling
as she leaned more and more heavily, and turned her
delicate and fair face confidingly up to mine, and that
dangerous mixture altogether of childlikeness and
womanly passion, of dependence and superiority, of
reserve on the one subject of love, and absolute
confidence
on every otherif I had not a story to tell I
could prate of those June nights and their witcheries
till you would think
Tutti gli alberi del mondo
Fossero penne,
and myself bitten by the dipsas.
We were walking one night late in the gallery
running
around the second story of the hotel. There was
a ball on the floor below, and the music, deadened
somewhat by the crowded room, came up softened and
mellowed to the dark and solitary colonnade, and added
to other influences in putting a certain lodger in my
bosom beyond my temporary control. I told Meeta
that I loved her.
The building stands against the side of a steep
mountain
high up above the valley, and the pines and
hemlocks
at that time hung in their primeval blackness
almost over the roof. As the most difficult and
embarrassed
sentence of which I had ever been delivered
died on my lips, and Meeta, lightening her weight on
my arm, walked in apparently offended silence by my
side, a deep-toned guitar was suddenly struck in the
woods, and a clear, manly voice broke forth in a song.
It produced an instant and startling effect on my
companion
.
With the first word she quickly withdrew
her arm; and, after a moment's pause, listening with
her hands raised in an attitude of the most intense
eagerness, she sprang to the extremity of the
balustrade
,
and gazed breathlessly into the dark depths of
the forest. The voice ceased, and she started back,
and laid her hand hastily upon my arm.
I must go, she said, in a voice of hurried feeling;
if you are generous, stay here and await me! and in
another moment she sprang along the bridge
connecting
the gallery with the rising ground in the rear, and
was lost in the shadows of the hemlocks.
I have made a declaration, thought I, just five
minutes too soon.
I paced up and down the now
too
lonely colonnade,
and picked up the fragments of my dream with what
philosophy I might. By the time Meeta returned,
perhaps a half hour, perhaps an age, as you measure
by her feelings or mine, I had hatched up a very
pretty and heroical magnanimity. She would have
spoken, but was breathless.
Explain nothing, I said, taking her arm within
mine, and let us mutually forget. If I can serve you
better than by silence, command me entirely. I live
but for your happiness,even, I added after a pause,
though it spring from another.
We were at her chamber door. She pressed my
hand with a strength of which I did not think those
small, slight fingers capable, and vanished, leaving me,
I am free to confess, less resigned than you would
suppose
from my last speech. I had done the dramatic
thing, thanks to much reading of you, dear Barry
Cornwall! but it was not in a play. I remained killed
after the audience was gone.
III.
The next day a new character appeared on the
stage.
Such
a handsome pedlar! said magnificent
Helen
to me, as I gave my horse to the groom after
a ride in search of hellebore, and joined the
promenade
at the well: and what do you think? he sells
only by raffle! It's so nice. All sorts of Berlin iron
ornaments, and every thing German and sweet; and
the pedlar's smile's worth more than the prizes; and
such
a moustache! See! there he is! and now, if
he has sold all his tickets,will you come, Master
Gravity?
I hear a voice you cannot hear, thought I, as I
gave the beauty my arm and joined a crowd of people
gathered about a pedlar's box in the centre of the
parterre.
The itinerant vender spread his wares in the midst
of the gay assemblage, and the raffle went on. He
was excessively handsome. A head of the sweet
gentleness of Raphael's, with locks flowing to his
shoulders in the fashion of German students, a soft
brown moustache curving on a short Phidian upper
lip, a large blue eye expressive of enthusiasm rather
than passion, and features altogether purely
intellectual
,
formed a portrait with which even jealousy
might console itself. Through all the disadvantages
of a dress suited to his apparent vocation, an eye the
least on the alert for a disguise would have penetrated
his in a moment. The gay and thoughtless crowd
about him, not accustomed to impostors who were
more
than they pretended to be, trusted him for a
pedlar, but treated him with a respect far above his
station insensibly.
Whatever his object was, so it were honorable, I
inly determined to give him all the assistance in my
power. A single glance at the face of Meeta, who
joined the circle as the prizes were drawn,a face so
changed since yesterday, so flushed with hope and
pleasure, and yet so saddened by doubt and fear, the
small lips compressed, the soft black eye kindled and
restless, and the red leaf on her cheek deepened to a
feverish beauty,left me no shadow of hesitation. I
exchanged a look with her that I intended should say
as much.
IV.
I know nothing that gives one such an elevated idea
of human nature (in one's own person) as helping
another man to a woman one loves. Oh last days of
minority or thereabouts! oh primal manhood! oh
golden time, when we have let go all but the
enthusiasm
of the boy, and seized hold of all but the
selfishness
of the man! oh blessed interregnum of the
evil and stronger genius! why can we not bottle up
thy hours like the wine of a better vintage, and
enjoy
them in the parched world-weariness of age! In
the tardy honeymoon of a bachelor (as mine will be,
if it come ever, alas!) with what joy of Paradise
should we bring up from the cellars of the past a
hamper of that sunny Hippocrene!
Pedlar Karl and the gentleman in No. 10 would
have been suspected in any other country of
conspiracy
.
(How odd that the highest crime of a monarchy,
the attempt to supplant the existing ruler, becomes
in a republic a creditable profession! You are a
traitor
here, a
politician
there!) We sat together
from midnight onwards, discoursing in low voices
over sherry and sandwiches, and in that crowded
Babylon, his entrances and exits required a very
con-spirator-like
VOL. I. 3
management. Known as my friend, his
trade and his disguise were up. As a pedlar,
wandering
about where he listed when not employed over his
wares, his interviews with Meeta were easily
contrived
,
and his lover's watch, gazing on her through the
long hours of the ball from the crowd of villagers at
the windows, hovering about her walks, and feeding
his heart on the many, many chance looks of
fondness
given him every hour in that out-of-doors society,
kept him comparatively happy.
The Baron looked hard at you to-day, said I, as
he closed the door in my little room, and sat down on
the bed.
Yes; he takes an interest in me as a
countryman
,
but he does not know me. He is a dull
observer
,
and has seen me but once in Germany.
How, then, have you known Meeta so long?
I accompanied her brother home from the
university
,
when the Baron was away, and for a long
month we were seldom parted. Riding, boating on
the Rhine, watching the sunset from the bartizan of
the old castle towers, reading in the old library,
rambling
in the park and forestit was a heaven, my
friend, than which I can conceive none brighter.
And her brother?
Alas! changed! We were both boys then, and a
brother is slow to believe his sister's beauty dangerous.
He was the first to shut the doors against me, when
he heard that the poor student had dared to love his
high-born Meeta.
Karl covered his eyes with his hand, and brooded
for a while in silence on the remembrances he had
awakened.
Do you think the Baron came to America
purposely
to avoid you?
Partly, I have no doubt, for I entered the castle
one night in my despair, when I had been forbidden
entrance, and he found me at her feet in the old
corridor
.
It was the only time he ever saw me, if,
indeed, he saw me at all in the darkness, and he
immediately
hastened his preparations for a
long-contemplated
journey, I knew not whither.
Did you follow him soon?
No, for my heart was crushed at first, and I
despaired
.
The possibility of following them in my
wretched poverty did not even occur to me for
months.
How did you track them hither, of all places in
the world?
I sought them first in Italy. It is easy on the
continent to find out where persons are
not
, and after
two years' wanderings, I heard of them in Paris.
They had just sailed for America. I followed; but
in a country where there are no passports, and no
espionage
, it is difficult to trace the traveller. It
was probable only that they would be at a place of
general resort, and I came here with no assurance
but hope. Thanks to God, the first sight that greeted
my eyes was my dear Meeta, whose irregular step,
as she walked back and forth with you in the gallery,
enabled me to recognise her in the darkness.
Who shall say the days of romance are over? The
plot is not brought to the catastrophe, but we hope it
is near.
V.
My aunt, Isabella Slingsby, (now in heaven, with
the eleven thousand virgins, God rest her soul!)
was at this time, as at all others, under my
respectable
charge. She would have said I was under her's
but it amounts to the same thingwe lived together
in peace and harmony. She said what she pleased,
for I loved herand I
did
what I pleased, for she
loved me. When Karl told me that Meeta's principal
objection to an elopement was the want of a matron,
I shut the teeth of my resolution, as they say in
Persia, and inwardly vowed my unconscious aunt to
this exigency. You should have seen Miss Isabella
Slingsby to know what a desperate man may be
brought to resolve on.
On a certain day, Count Von Raffle-off (as my witty
friend and ally, Tom Fane, was pleased to call the
handsome pedlar) departed with his pack and the
hearts of all the dressing-maids and some of their
mistresses
,
on his way to New-York. I drove down the
road to take my leave of him out of sight, and give
him my last instructions.
How to attack my aunt was a subject about which
I had many unsatisfactory thoughts. If there was one
thing she disapproved of more than another, it was an
elopement; and with what face to propose to her to
run away with a baron's only daughter, and leave her
in the hands of a pedlar, taking upon herself, as she
must, the whole sin and odium, was an enigma I ate,
drank, and slept upon in vain. One thing at last
became
very clearshe would do it for nobody but
me.
Sequitur
, I must play the lover myself.
I commenced with a fit of illness. What
was
the
matter! For two days I was invisible. Dear Isabella!
it was the first time I had ever drawn seriously on thy
fallow sympathies, and, how freely they flowed at my
affected sorrows, I shame to remember! Did ever
woman so weep? Did ever woman so take antipathy
to man as she to that innocent old Baron for his
supposed
refusal of his daughter to Philip Slingsby? This
revival of the remembrance shall not be in vain. The
mignennette and roses planted above thy grave,
dearest
aunt, shall be weeded anew!
Oh that long week of management and hypocrisy!
The day came at last.
Aunt Bel!
What, Philip, dear?
I think I feel better to-day.
Yes?
Yes. What say you to a drive? There is the
stanhope.
My dear Phil, dont mention that horrid stanhope.
I am sure, if you valued my life
Precisely aunt(I had taken care to give her a
good fright the day before)but Tom Fane has
offered
me his ponies and Jersey wagon, and that, you
know, is the most quiet thing in the world, and holds
four. So, perhapsehem!you'llask Meeta?
Um! Why, you see, Philip
I saw at once that, if it got to an argument, I was
perdu
. Miss Slingsby, though a sincere Christian,
never
could
keep her temper when she tried to reason.
I knelt down on her footstool, smoothed away the false
hair on her forehead, and kissed her. It was a
fascinating
endearment of mine that I only resorted to on
great emergencies. The hermit tooth in my aunt's
mouth became gradually visible, heralding what in
youth had been a smile; and, as I assisted her in
rolling
up her embroidery, she looked on me with an
unsuspecting
affection that touched my heart. I made
a silent vow that if she survived the scrape into which
she was being inveigled, I would be to her and her
dog Whimsiculo, (the latter my foe and my aversion,)
the soul of exemplary kindness for the remainder of
their natural lives. I lay the unction to my soul that
this vow was kept. My aunt blessed me shortly before
she was called to walk in white, (she had hitherto
walked in yellow,) and as it would have been
unnatural
in Whimsiculo to survive her, I considered his
3*
natural life as ended with her's, and had him
peacefully
strangled on the same day. He lies at her feet
as usual, a delicate attention of which (I trust in
Swedenborg
)
her spirit is aware.
With the exception of Tom Thumb and
Rattler
,
who were of the same double-jointed family of
interminable wind and bottom, there was never
perhaps
such a pair of goers as Tom Fane's ponies. My
aunt had a lurking hope, I believe, that the Baron
would refuse Meeta permission to join us, but either
he did not think me a dangerous person, (I have said
before he was a dull man,) or he had no objection to
me as a son-in-law, which my aunt and myself (against
the world) would have thought the natural
construction
upon his indifference. He came to the end of the
colonnade to see us start, and as I eased the ribands
and let the ponies off like a shot from a cross-bow, I
stole a look at Meeta. The colour had fled from cheek
and lip, and the tears streamed over them like rain.
Aunt Bel was on the back-seat,
grace  Dieu!
We met Tom at the foot of the hill, and I pulled up.
He was the
best
fellow, that Tom Fane!
Ease both the bearing reins, said I, I am going
up the mountain.
The devil you are! said Tom, doing my bidding,
however; you'll find the road to the Shakers much
pleasanter. What an odd whim! It's a
perpendicular
three miles, Miss Slingsby. I would as lief be
hoisted up a well and let down again. Don't go that
way Phil, unless you are going to run away with Miss
Von
Many a shaft at random sent,
thought I, and waving the tandem lash over the ears
of the ponies, I brought up the silk on the cheek of their
malaprop master, and spanked away up the hill,
leaving
him in a range likely to get a fresh supply of fuel
by dinner-time. Tom was of a plethoric habit, and
if I had not thought he could afford to burst a
blood-vessel
better than two lovers to break their hearts, I
should not have ventured on the bold measure of
borrowing his horses for an hour and keeping them a
week. We have shaken hands upon it since, but it is
my private opinion that he has never forgiven me in
his heart.
As we wound slowly up the mountain, I gave Meeta
the reins, and jumped out to gather some wild
flowers
for my aunt. Dear old soul! the attention
reconciled
her to what she considered a very unwarrantable
caprice of mine. What I
could
wish to toil up that
steep mountain for! Well! the flowers
are
charming
in these high regions!
Don't you see my reason for coming then, aunt
Bella?
Was
it for that, dear Philip? said she, putting
the wild flowers affectionately into her bosom, where
they bloomed like broidery on saffron tapestry. How
considerate of you! And she drew her shawl around
her, and was at peace with all the world. So easily
are the old made happy by the young! Reader, I
scent a moral in the air!
We were at the top of the hill. If I was sane, my
aunt was probably thinking, I should turn here, and
go back. To descend the other side, and re-ascend
and descend again to the Springs, was hardly a sort of
thing one would do for pleasure.
Here's a good place to turn, Philip, said she, as
we entered a smooth broad hollow on the top of the
mountain.
I dashed through it as if the ponies were shod with
talaria
. My aunt said nothing, and luckily the road
was very narrow for a mile, and she had a horror of a
short turn. A new thought struck me.
Did you ever know, aunt, that there was a way
back around the foot of the mountain?
Dear, no; how delightful! Is it far?
A couple of hours or so; but I can do it in less.
We'll try; and I gave the sure-footed Canadians the
whip, and scampered down the hills as if the rock of
Sisyphus had been rolling after us.
We were soon over the mountain range, and the
road grew better and more level. Oh, how fast
pattered
those little hoofs, and how full of spirit and
excitement looked those small ears, catching the
lightest
chirrup I could whisper, like the very spell of
swiftness. Pines, hemlocks and cedars, farm-houses
and milestones, flew back like shadows. My aunt sat
speechless in the middle of the back seat, holding on
with both hands, in apprehensive resignation! She
expected soon to come in sight of the Springs, and
had doubtless taken a mental resolution that if, please
God, she once more found herself at home, she would
never tempt Providence (it was a favorite expression
of her's) by trusting herself again behind such a pair
of fly-away demons. As I read this thought in her
countenance by a stolen glance over my shoulder, we
rattled into a village distant from Lebanon twenty
miles.
There, aunt, said I, as I pulled up at the door of
the inn; we have very nearly described a circle.
Now, don't speak! if you do you'll start the horses.
There's nothing they are so much afraid of as a
woman's
voice. Very odd, isn't it? We'll just sponge
their mouths now, and be at home in the crack of a
whip. Five miles more, only. Come!
Off we sped again like the wind, aunt Bel just
venturing
to wonder whether the horses wouldn't
rather
go slower. Meeta had hardly spoken. She had
thoughts of her own to be busy with, and I pretended
to be fully occupied with my driving. The nonsense
I talked to those horses, to do away the embarrassment
of her silence, would convict me of insanity before
any jury in the world.
The sun began to throw long shadows, and the
short-legged
ponies figured like flying giraffes along the
retiring hedges. Luckily, my aunt had very little
idea of conjecturing a course by the points of the
compass. We sped on gloriously.
Philip, dear! hav'n't you lost your way? It
seems to me we've come more than five miles since
you stopped, (ten at least,) and I don't see the
mountains about Lebanon at all!
Don't be alarmed, aunty, dear! We're very high
just here, and shall
drop down
on Lebanon, as it were.
Are
you
afraid, Meeta?
Nein!
she answered. She was thinking in
German
,
poor girl, and heart and memory were wrapped
up in the thought.
I drove on almost cruelly. Tom's incomparable
horses justified all his eulogiums; they were
indefatigable
.
The sun blazed a moment through the firs,
and disappeared, the gorgeous changes of eve came
over the clouds, the twilight stole through the damp
air with its melancholy gray, and the whip-poor-wills,
birds of evening, came abroad, like gentlemen in debt,
to flit about in the darkness. Every thing was
saddening
.
My own volubility ceased; the whiz of the
lash, as I waved it over the heads of my foaming
ponies
,
and an occasional Steady! as one or the other
broke into a gallop, were the only interruptions to the
silence. Meeta buried her face in the folds of her
shawl, and sat closer to my side, and my aunt, soothed
and flattered by turns, believed and doubted, and was
finally persuaded, by my ingenious and well-inserted
fibs, that it was only somewhat farther than I
anticipated
,
and we should arrive presently.
Somewhere about eight o'clock the lights of a town
appeared in the distance, and, straining every nerve,
the gallant beasts whirled us in through the streets,
and I pulled up suddenly at the door of an hotel.
Why, Philip! said my aunt, in a tone of
unutterable
astonishment, looking about her as if she had
awoke from a dream, This is Hudson!
It was too clear to be disputed. We were upon the
North River, forty miles from Lebanon, and the
steamer would touch at the pier in half an hour. My
aunt was to be one of the passengers to New-York,
but she was yet to be persuaded of it; the only thing
now was to get her into the house, and enact the scene
as soon as possible.
I helped her out as tenderly as I knew how, and, as
we went up stairs, I requested Meeta to sit down in
a corner of the room, and cover her face with her
handkerchief. When the servant was locked out, I
took my aunt into the recess of the window, and
informed
her, to her very great surprise, that she had
run away with the Baron's daughter.
Philip Slingsby!
My aunt was overcome. I had nothing for it but to
be overcome too. She sunk into one chair, and I
into the other, and burying my face in my hands, I
looked through my fingers to watch the effect. Five
mortal minutes lasted my aunt's wrath; gradually,
however, she began to steal a look at me, and the
expression
of resentment about her thin lips softened
into something like pity.
Philip! said she, taking my hand.
My dear aunt!
What is to be done?
I pointed to Meeta, who sat with her head on her
bosom, pressed my hand to my heart, as if to suppress
a pang, and proceeded to explain. It seemed
impossible
for my aunt to forgive the deception of the thing.
Unsophisticated Isabella! If thou hadst known that
thou wert, even yet, one fold removed from the truth,
if thou couldst have divined that it was not for the
darling of thy heart that thou wert yielding a point
only less dear to thee than thy maiden reputation,
if it could have entered thy region of possibilities that
thine own house in town had been three days aired
for the reception of a bride, run away with by thy
ostensible
connivance, and all for a German pedlar, in
whose fortunes and loves thou hadst no shadow of
interest, I think the brain of thee would have turned,
and the dry heart in thy bosom have broken with
surprise
and grief!
I wrote a note to Tom, left his horses at the inn,
and at nine o'clock we were steaming down the
Hudson
,
my aunt in bed, and Meeta pacing the deck with
me, and pouring forth her fears and her gratitude in
a voice of music that made me almost repent my
self-sacrificing
enterprise. I have told the story gaily,
gentle
reader! but there was a nerve ajar in my heart
while its little events went on.
How we sped thereafter, dear reader!how the
Consul of his Majesty of Prussia was persuaded by my
aunt's respectability to legalize the wedding by his
presence
,how
my aunt fainted dead away when the
parson
arrived, and she discovered who was
not
to be the
bridegroom and who
was
,how I persuaded her she
had gone too far to recede, and worked on her
tenderness
once more,how the weeping Karl, and his lame
and lovely bride, lived with us till the old Baron thought
it fit to give Meeta his blessing and some money,
how Tom Fane wished no good to the pedlar's eyes,
and lastly, how Miss Isabella Slingsby lived and died
wondering what earthly motive I could have for my
absurd share in these events, are matters of which I
spare you the particulars.
NIAGARA  LAKE ONTARIO
THE ST. LAWRENCE.
4
No. I.
NIAGARA.
He was born when the crab was ascending, and all his affairs go
backward.
Love for Love
.
It
was in my senior vacation, and I was bound to
Niagara for the first time. My companion was a
specimen of the human race found rarely in Vermont,
and never elsewhere. He was nearly seven feet high,
walked as if every joint in his body was in a hopeless
state of dislocation, and was hideously, ludicrously,
and painfully ugly. This whimsical exterior
contained
the conscious spirit of Apollo, and the poetical
susceptibility of Keats. He had left his plough in the
green mountains at the age of twenty-five, and entered
as a poor student at the University, where, with the
usual policy of the college government, he was allotted
to me as a compulsory chum, on the principle of
breaking in a colt with a cart-horse. I began with
laughing at him, and ended with loving him. He
rejoiced in the common appellation of Job Smitha
synonymous soubriquet, as I have elsewhere remarked,
which was substituted by his classmates for his
baptismal
name of Forbearance.
Getting Job away with infinite difficulty from a
young Indian girl who was selling moccasins in the
streets of Buffalo, (a straight, slender creature of
eighteen, stepping about like a young leopard, cold,
stern, and beautiful,) we crossed the outlet of Lake
Erie at the ferry, and took horses on the northern
bank of Niagara river to ride to the Falls. It was a
noble stream, as broad as the Hellespont and as blue
as the sky, and I could not look at it, hurrying on
headlong to its fearful leap, without a feeling almost
of dread.
There was only one thing to which Job was more
susceptible than to the beauties of nature, and that
was the beauty of woman. His romance had been
stirred by the lynx-eyed Sioux, who took her money
for the moccasins with such haughty and thankless
superbia
, and full five miles of the river, with all the
gorgeous flowers and rich shrubs upon its rim, might
as well have been Lethe for his admiration. He rode
along, like the man of rags you see paraded on an ass
in the carnival, his legs and arms dangling about in
ludicrous obedience to the sidelong hitch of his pacer.
The roar of the Falls was soon audible, and Job's
enthusiasm and my own, if the increased pace of our
Naragansett ponies meant any thing, were fully
aroused. The river broke into rapids, foaming
furiously
on its course, and the subterranean thunder
increased
like a succession of earthquakes, each louder
than the last. I had never heard a sound so broad
and universal. It was impossible not to suspend the
breath, and feel absorbed, to the exclusion of all other
thoughts, in the great phenomenon with which the
world seemed trembling to its centre. A tall, misty
cloud, changing its shape continually, as it felt the
shocks of the air, rose up before us, and with our eyes
fixed upon it, and our horses at a hard gallop, we found
ourselves unexpectedly in front of a vast white
hotel! which suddenly interposed between the cloud
and our vision. Job slapped his legs against the sides
of his panting beast, and urged him on, but a long
fence on either side the immense building cut him off
from all approach; and having assured ourselves that
there was no access to Niagara except through the
back-door of the gentleman's house, who stood with hat
off to receive us, we wished no good to his Majesty's
province of Upper Canada, and dismounted.
Will you visit the Falls before dinner, gentlemen?
asked mine host.
No, sir! thundered Job, in a voice that, for a
moment
,
stopped the roar of the cataract.
He was like an improvisatore who had been
checked
by some rude
birbone
in the very crisis of his
eloquence
.
He would not have gone to the Falls that
night to have saved the world. We dined.
As it was the first meal we had ever eaten under a
monarchy, I proposed the health of the king; but Job
refused it. There was an impertinent profanity, he
said, in fencing up the entrance to Niagara that was a
greater encroachment on natural liberty than the stamp
act. He would drink to no king or parliament under
which such a thing could be conceived possible. I
left the table and walked to the window.
Job, come here! Miss , by all that is lovely!
He flounced up, like a snake touched with a
torpedo
,
and sprang to the window. Job had never seen
the lady whose name produced such a sensation, but
he had heard more of her than of Niagara. So had
every soul of the fifteen millions of inhabitants between
us and the Gulf of Mexico. She was one of those
miracles
of nature that occur, perhaps, once in the rise
and fall of an empirea woman of the perfect beauty
of an angel, with the most winning human sweetness
of character and manner. She was kind, playful,
unaffected
,
and radiantly, gloriously beautiful. I am
sorry
I may not mention her name, for in more
chivalrous
times she would have been a character of
history
.
Every body who has been in America, however,
will know whom I am describing, and I am sorry for
those who have not. The country of Washington
will be in its decadence before it sees such another.
She had been to the Fall and was returning with
her mother and a troop of lovers, who, I will venture
to presume, brought away a very imperfect impression
of the scene. I would describe her as she came
laughing
up that green bank, unconscious of every thing
but the pleasure of life in a summer sunset; but I
leave it for a more skilful hand. The authoress of
Hope Leslie will, perhaps, mould her image into
one of her inimitable heroines.
I presented my friend, and we passed the evening
in her dangerous company. After making an
engagement
to accompany her in the morning behind the
sheet of the Fall, we said good night at twelveone
of us at least as many fathom deep in love as a
thousand
Rosalinds. My poor chum! The roar of the
cataract that shook the very roof over thy head was
less loud to thee that night than the beating of thine
own heart, I warrant me!
I rose at sunrise to go alone to the Fall, but Job was
before me, and the angular outline of his gaunt figure,
stretching up from Table Rock in strong relief against
the white body of the spray, was the first object that
caught my eye as I descended.
As I came nearer the Fall, a feeling of
disappointment
came over me. I had imagined Niagara a vast
body of water descending as if from the clouds. The
approach to most Falls is
from below
, and we get an
idea of them as of rivers pitching down to the plain
from the brow of a hill or mountain. Niagara river,
on the contrary, comes out from Lake Erie through a
4*
flat plain. The top of the cascade is ten feet perhaps
below the level of the country around, consequently
invisible from any considerable distance. You walk
to the bank of a broad and rapid river, and look over
the edge of a rock, where the outlet flood of an inland
sea seems to have broken through the crust of the earth,
and, by its mere weight, plunged with an awful leap
into an immeasurable and resounding abyss. It seems
to strike and thunder upon the very centre of the world,
and the ground beneath your feet quivers with the
shock till you feel unsafe upon it.
Other disappointment than this I cannot conceive
at Niagara. It is a spectacle so awful, so beyond the
scope and power of every other phenomenon in the
world, that I think people who are disappointed there
mistake the incapacity of their own conception for the
want of grandeur in the scene.
The hell of waters below need but a little red
ochre to out-Phlegethon Phlegethon. I can imagine
the surprise of the gentle element, after sleeping away
a se'nnight of moonlight in the peaceful bosom of Lake
Erie, at finding itself of a sudden in such a coil! A
Mediterranean sea-gull, which had tossed out the whole
of a January in the infernal yeast of the
Archipelago
,
(was I not all but wrecked every day between Troy
and Malta in a score of successive hurricanes?)I say,
the most weather beaten of sea-birds would look twice
before he ventured upon the roaring cauldron below
Niagara. It is astonishing to see how far the
descending
mass is driven under the surface of the stream.
As far down towards Lake Ontario as the eye can
reach, the immense volumes of water rise like huge
monsters to the light, boiling and flashing out in rings
of foam, with an appearance of rage and anger that I
have seen in no other cataract in the world.
A
nice
Fall, as an Englishman would say, my
dear Job.
Awful!
Halleck, the American poet, (a better one never
strung pearls,) has written some admirable verses
on Niagara, describing its effect on the different
individuals
of a mixed party, among whom was a tailor.
The sea of incident that has broken over me in years
of travel, has washed out of my memory all but
the two lines descriptive of its impression upon
Snip:
The tailor made one single note
Gods! what a place to sponge a coat!
Shall we go to breakfast, Job?
How slowly and solemnly they drop into the
abysm!
It was not an original remark of Mr. Smith's.
Nothing
is so surprising to the observer as the
extraordinary
deliberateness with which the waters of Niagara
take their tremendous plunge. All hurry and foam
and fret, till they reach the smooth limit of the curve
and then the laws of gravitation seem suspended,
and, like Csar, they pause, and determine, since it is
inevitable, to take the death-leap with becoming
dignity
.
Shall we go to breakfast, Job? I was obliged to
raise my voice to be heard, to a pitch rather
exhausting
to an empty stomach.
His eyes remained fixed upon the shifting rainbows
bending and vanishing in the spray. There was no
moving him, and I gave in for another five minutes.
Do you think it probable, Job, that the waters of
Niagara strike on the axis of the world?
No answer.
Job!
What?
Do you think his Majesty's half of the cataract
is finer than ours?
Much.
For
water
, merely, perhaps. But look at the
delicious
verdure on the American shore, the glorious
trees, the mass'd foliage, the luxuriant growth even to
the very rim of the ravine! By Jove! it seems to me
things grow better in a republic. Did you ever see a
more barren and scraggy shore than the one you stand
upon.
How exquisitely, said Job, soliloquising, that
small green island divides the Fall! What a rock it
must be founded on, not to have been washed away
in the ages that these waters have split against it!
I'll lay you a bet it is washed away before the year
two thousandpayable in any currency with which
we may then be conversant.
Don't trifle!
With time, or geology, do you mean? Isn't it
perfectly clear from the looks of that ravine, that
Niagara has
back'd up
all the way from Lake
Ontario
?
These rocks are not adamant, and the very
precipice
[1]
[1]
It has since fallen into the abyssfortunately in the night, as
visitors
were always upon it during the day. The noise was heard at
an incredible distance.
you stand on has cracked, and looks ready
for the plunge. It must gradually wear back to Lake
Erie, and then there will be a sweep, I should like to
live long enough to see. The instantaneous junction
of two seas, with a difference of two hundred feet in
their levels, will be a spectacleeh, Job?
Tremendous!
Do you intend to wait and see it, or will you
come to breakfast?
He was immovable. I left him on the rock, went
up to the hotel and ordered mutton-chops and coffee,
and when they were on the table, gave two of the
waiters a dollar each to bring him up
nolens-volens
.
He arrived in a great rage, but with a good appetite,
and we finished our breakfast just in time to meet
Miss , as she stepped like Aurora from her
chamber
.
It is necessary to a reputation for prowess in the
United States to have been behind the sheet of the
Fall (supposing you to have been to Niagara.) This
achievement is equivalent to a hundred shower-baths,
one severe cold, and being drowned twicebut most
people do it.
We descended to the bottom of the precipice, at the
side of the Fall, where we found a small house,
furnished
with coarse linen dresses for the purpose, and
having arranged ourselves in habiliments not
particularly
improving to our natural beauty, we re-appeared
only three out of a party of ten having had the
courage to trust their attractions to such a trial.
Miss  looked like a fairy in disguise, and Job like
the most ghostly and diabolical monster that ever
stalked unsepultured abroad. He would frighten a
child in his best black suitbut with a pair of wet
linen trowsers scarce reaching to his knees, a jacket
with sleeves shrunk to the elbows, and a white cap,
he was something supernaturally awful. The guide
hesitated about going under the Fall with him.
It looked rather appalling. Our way lay through a
dense descending sheet of water, along a slender
pathway
of rocks, broken into small fragments, with an
overhanging wall on one side, and the boiling
cauldron
of the cataract on the other. A false step, and
you were a subject for the shocking accident
maker.
The guide went first, taking Miss 's right hand.
She gave me her left, and Job brought up the rear, as
they say in Connecticut, on his own hook. We
picked our way boldly up to the water. The wall
leaned over so much, and the fragmented declivity
was so narrow and steep, that if it had not been done
before, I should have turned back at once. Two
steps more and the small hand in mine began to
struggle
violently, and, in the same instant, the torrent beat
into my mouth, eyes and nostrils, and I felt as if I
was drowning. I staggered a blind step onward, but
still the water poured into my nostrils, and the
conviction
rushed for a moment on my mind that we were
lost. I struggled for breath, stumbled forward, and,
with a gasp, that I thought was my last, sunk upon
the rocks within the descending waters. Job tumbled
over me the next instant, and as soon as I could clear
my eyes sufficiently to look about me, I saw the
guide sustaining Miss , who had been as nearly
drowned as most of the subjects of the Humane
Society
,
but was apparently in a state of resuscitation.
None but the half-drowned know the pleasure of
breathing.
Here we were within a chamber that Undine might
have coveted, a wall of rock at our back, and a
transparent
curtain of shifting water between us and the
world, having entitled ourselves
peu prs
to the same
reputation with Hylas and Leander, for seduction by
the Naiads.
Whatever sister of Arethusa inhabits there, we could
but congratulate her on the beauty of her abode. A
lofty and well-lighted hall, shaped like a long pavilion,
extended as far as we could see through the spray, and
with the two objections, that you could not have heard
a pistol at your ear for the noise, and that the floor
was somewhat precipitous, one could scarce imagine a
more agreeable retreat for a gentleman who was
disgusted
with the world, and subject to dryness of the
skin. In one respect it resembled the enchanted
dwelling
of the Witch of Atlas, where, Shelley tells us,
Th' invisible rain did ever sing
A silver music on the mossy lawn.
It is lucky for Witches and Naiads that they are not
subject to rheumatism.
The air was scarcely breathable(if air it may be
called, which streams down the face with the density
of a shower from a watering-pot,) and our footing upon
the slippery rocks was so insecure, that the exertion of
continually wiping our eyes was attended with
imminent
danger. Our sight was valuable, for, surely,
never was such a brilliant curtain hung up to the sight
of mortals, as spread apparently from the zenith to our
feet, changing in thickness and lustre, but with a
constant
and resplendent curve. It was what a child
might imagine the arch of the sky to be where it bends
over the edge of the horizon.
The sublime is certainly very much diluted when
one contemplates it with his back to a dripping and
slimy rock, and his person saturated with a continual
supply of water. From a dry window, I think the
infernal
writhe and agony of the abyss into which we
were continually liable to slip, would have been as
fine a thing as I have seen in my travels; but I am
free to admit, that, at the moment, I would have
exchanged
my experience and all the honour attached
to it, for a dry escape. The idea of
drowning back
through that thick column of water, was at least a
damper to enthusiasm. We seemed cut off from the
living. There was a death between us and the vital
air and sunshine.
I was screwing up my courage for the return, when
the guide seized me by the shoulder. I looked around,
and what was my horror to see Miss  standing
far in behind the sheet upon the last visible point of
rock, with the water pouring over her in torrents, and
a gulf of foam between us, which I could in no way
understand how she had passed over.
She seemed frightened and pale, and the guide
explained
to me by signs, (for I could not distinguish a
syllable through the roar of the cataract,) that she had
walked over a narrow ledge, which had broken with
her weight. A long fresh mark upon the rock at the
foot of the precipitous wall, made it sufficiently evident:
her position was most alarming.
I made a sign to her to look well to her feet; for
the little island on which she stood was green with
slime and scarce larger than a hat, and an abyss of full
six feet wide, foaming and unfathomable, raged
between
it and the nearest foothold. What was to be
done? Had we a plank, even, there was no possible
hold for the further extremity, and the shape of the
rock was so conical, that its slippery surface evidently
would not hold a rope for a moment. To jump to her,
even if it were possible, would endanger her life, and
while I was smiling and encouraging the beautiful
creature, as she stood trembling and pale on her
dangerous
foothold, I felt my very heart sink within me.
The despairing guide said something which I could
not hear, and disappeared through the watery wall, and
I fixed my eyes upon the lovely form, standing, like a
spirit in the misty shroud of the spray, as if the
intensity
of my gaze could sustain her upon her dangerous
foothold. I would have given ten years of my life at
that moment to have clasped her hand in mine.
I had scarce thought of Job until I felt him trying
to pass behind me. His hand was trembling as he
laid it on my shoulder to steady his steps; but there
was something in his ill-hewn features that shot an
indefinable ray of hope through my mind. His sandy
hair was plastered over his forehead, and his scant
dress clung to him like a skin; but though I recall his
image
now
with a smile, I looked upon him with a
feeling
far enough from amusement
then
. God bless thee,
my dear Job! wherever in this unfit world thy fine
spirit may be fulfilling its destiny!
He crept down carefully to the edge of the foaming
abyss, till he stood with the breaking bubbles at his
knees. I was at a loss to know what he intended.
She surely would not dare to attempt a jump to his
arms from that slippery rock, and to reach her in any
way seemed impossible.
The next instant he threw himself forward, and
while I covered my eyes in horror, with the flashing
conviction that he had gone mad and flung himself
into the hopeless whirlpool to reach her, she had
crossed the awful gulf, and lay trembling and
exhausted
at my feet! He had thrown himself over
the chasm, caught the rock barely with the
extremities
of his fingers, and with certain death if he
missed
his hold or slipped from his uncertain tenure, had
sustained her with supernatural strength as she
walked
over his body!
The guide providentially returned with a rope in
the same instant, and, fastening it around one of his
feet, we dragged him back through the whirlpool, and
after a moment or two to recover from the suffocating
immersion, he fell on his knees, and we joined him,
I doubt not devoutly, in his inaudible thanks to God.
VOL. I. 5
II.LAKE ONTARIO.
The
next bravest achievement to venturing behind
the sheet of Niagara, is to cross the river in a small
boat, at some distance below the Phlegethon of the
abyss. I should imagine it was something like riding
in a howdah on a swimming elephant. The
immense
masses of water driven under by the Fall, rise
splashing and fuming far down the river; and they
are as unlike a common wave,
to ride
, as a horse and
a camel. You are, perhaps, ten or fifteen minutes
pulling across, and you may get two or three of these
lifts, which shove you straight into the air about ten
feet, and then drop you into the cup of an eddy, as
if some long-armed Titan had his hand under the
water, and were tossing you up and down for his
amusement. It imports lovers to take heed how their
mistresses are seated, as all ladies, on these occasions,
throw themselves into the arms of the nearest hose
and doublet.
Job and I went over to dine on the American side
and refresh our patriotism. We dined under a
hickory-tree
on Goat Island, just over the glassy curve of the
cataract; and as we grew joyous with our champagne,
we strolled up to the point where the waters divide
for the American and British Falls; and Job
harangued
the mistaken gentlemen on his right, in
eloquence that would have turned a division in the
House of Commons. The deluded multitude,
however
,
rolled away in crowds for the monarchy, and at
the close of his speech the British Fall was still, by a
melancholy majority, the largest. We walked back
to our bottle like foiled patriots, and soon after,
hopeless
of our principles, went over to the other side too!
I advise all people going to Niagara to suspend
making
a note in their journal till the last day of their
visit. You might as well teach a child the
magnitude
of the heavens by pointing to the sky with your
finger, as comprehend Niagara in a day. It has to
create its own mighty place in your mind. You have
no comparison through which it can enter. It is too
vast. The imagination shrinks from it. It rolls in
gradually, thunder upon thunder, and plunge upon
plunge; and the mind labours with it to an exhaustion
such as is created only by the extremest intellectual
effort. I have seen men sit and gaze upon it in a cool
day of autumn, with the perspiration standing on
their foreheads in large beads, from the unconscious
but toilsome agony of its conception. After haunting
its precipices, and looking on its solemn waters for
seven days, sleeping with its wind-played monotony
in your ears, dreaming, and returning to it till it has
grown the one object, as it will, of your perpetual
thought, you feel, all at once, like one who has
compassed
the span of some almighty problem. It has
stretched itself within you. Your capacity has
attained
the gigantic standard, and you feel an elevation
and breadth of nature that could measure girth and
stature with a seraph. We had fairly done
Niagara
.
We had seen it by sunrise, sunset, moonlight;
from top and bottom; fasting and full; alone and
together
.
We had learned by heart every green path
on the island of perpetual dew, which is set like an
imperial emerald on its front, (a poetical idea of my
own, much admired by Job,)we had been grave,
gay, tender, and sublime in its mighty
neighbourhood
,
we had become so accustomed to the bass of its
broad thunder, that it seemed to us like a natural
property
in the air, and we were unconscious of it for
hours; our voices had become so tuned to its key,
and our thoughts so tinged by its grand and perpetual
anthem, that I almost doubted if the air beyond the
reach of its vibrations would not agonize us with its
unnatural silence, and the common features of the
world seem of an unutterable and frivolous littleness.
We were eating our last breakfast there, in tender
melancholy:mine for the Falls, and Job's for the
Falls and Miss , to whom I had a half suspicion
that he had made a declaration.
Job! said I.
He looked up from his egg.
My dear Job!
Don't allude to it, my dear chum, said he,
dropping
his spoon, and rushing to the window to hide his
agitation. It was quite clear.
I could scarce restrain a smile. Psyche in the
embrace
of a respectable giraffe would be the first thought
in any body's mind who should see them together.
And yet why should he not woo herand win her
too? He had saved her life in the extremest peril, at
the most extreme hazard of his own; he had a heart
as high and worthy, and as capable of an undying
worship of her as she would find in a wilderness of
lovers; he felt like a graceful man, and acted like a
brave one, and was
sans peur et sans reproche
, and
why should he not love like other men? My dear
Job! I fear thou wilt go down to thy grave, and but
one woman in this wide world will have loved thee
thy mother! Thou art the soul of a
preux chevalier
in the body of some worthy grave-digger, who is
strutting
about the world, perhaps, in thy more proper
carcass
.
These angels are so o'er hasty in packing!
We got upon our horses, and had a pleasant amble
before us of fifteen miles, on the British side of the
river. We cantered off stoutly for a mile to settle our
regrets, and then I pulled up, and requested Job to ride
near me, as I had something to say to him.
You are entering, said I, my dear Job, upon your
first journey in a foreign land. You will see other
manners than your own, which are not therefore
laughable
,
and hear a different pronunciation from your own,
which is not therefore vulgar. You are to mix with
British subjects, whom you have attacked vigorously
in your school declamations as `the enemy,' but who
are not therefore to be bullied in their own country,
and who have certain tastes of their own, upon which
you had better reserve your judgment. We have no
doubt that we are the greatest country that ever was,
is, or ever shall be; but, as this is an unpalatable piece
of information to other nations, we will not stuff it
into
their teeth, unless by particular request. John Bull
likes his coat too small. Let him wear it. John Bull
prefers his beefsteak to a fricandeau. Let him eat it.
John Bull will leave no stone unturned to serve you
in his own country, if you will let him. Let him. John
Bull will suffer you to find fault for ever with King,
Lords, and Commons, if you do not compare them
invidiously
with other governments. Let the
comparison
alone. In short, my dear chum, as we insist that
foreigners should adopt our manners while they are
travelling in the United States, we had better adopt
theirs when we return the visit. They are doubtless
quite wrong throughout, but it is not worth while to
bristle one's back against the opinions of some score
millions.
The foam disappeared from the stream, as we
followed
it on, and the roar of the Falls
* * * Now loud, now calm again,
Like a ring of bells, whose sound the wind still alters,
was soon faint in our ears, and, like the regret of
parting
,
lessened with the increasing distance till it was
lost. Job began to look around him, and see
something
5*
else besides a lovely face in the turnings of the
road, and the historian of this memorable journey,
who never had but one sorrow that would not budge
with a fillip, rose in his stirrups as he descried the
broad blue bosom of Lake Ontario, and gave vent to
his feelings in (he begs the reader to believe) the most
suitable quotation.
Seeing any celebrated water for the first time was
always, to me, an event. River, waterfall, or lake, if
I have heard of it and thought of it for years, has a
sensible
presence
, that I feel like the approach of a human
being in whom I am interested. My heart flutters to
it. It is thereafter an acquaintance, and I defend its
beauty or its grandeur as I would the fair fame and
worth of a woman that had shown me a preference.
My dear reader, do you love
water?
Not to drink,
for I own it is detestable in small quantitiesbut
water
,
running or falling, sleeping or gliding, tinged by
the sunset glow, or silvered by the gentle alchymist
of the midnight heaven? Do you love a lake? Do
you love a river? Do you affect any one laughing
and sparkling brook that has flashed on your eye like
a fay overtaken by the cock-crowing, and tripping away
slily to dream-land? As you see four sisters, and but
one to love; so, in the family of the elements, I have
a tenderness for water.
Lake Ontario spread away to the horizon,
glittering
in the summer sun, boundless to the eye as the
Atlantic; and directly beneath us lay the small town
of Fort Niagara, with the steamer at the pier, in which
we promised ourselves a passage down the St.
Lawrence
.
We rode on to the hotel, which we found to
our surprise crowded with English officers, and
having
disposed of our Narragansetts, we inquired the hour
of departure, and what we could eat meantime, in as
nearly the same breath as possible.
Cold leg of mutton and the steam-boat's engaged,
sir!
The mercury in Job's Britishometer fell plump to
zero. The idea of a monopoly of the whole steamer
by a colonel and his staff, and no boat again for a
week!
There
was a government to live under!
We sat down to our mutton, and presently enter
the waiter.
Colonel 's compliments; hearing that two
gentlemen have arrived who expected to go by the
steamer, he is happy to offer them a passage if they
can put up with rather crowded accommodations.
Well, Job! what do you think now of England,
politically, morally, and religiously? Has not the
gentlemanlike courtesy of one individual materially
changed your opinions upon every subject connected
with the United Kingdom of Great Britain?
It has.
Then, my dear Job, I recommend you never
again to read a book of travels without writing down
on the margin of every bilious chapter, `probably lost
his passage in the steamer,' or `had no mustard to his
mutton,' or `could find no ginger-nuts for the
interesting
little traveller,' or some similar annotation.
Depend
upon it, that dear delightful Mrs. Trollope would
never have written so agreeable a book, if she had
thriven with her bazaar in Cincinnati.
We paid our respects to the Colonel, and at six
o'clock in the evening got on board. Part of an Irish
regiment was bivouacked on the deck, and happier
fellows I never saw. They had completed their nine
years' service on the three Canadian stations, and
were returning to the
ould
country, wives, children,
and all. A line was drawn across the deck,
reserving
the after quarter for the officers; the sick were
disposed of among the women in the bows of the
boat, and the band stood ready to play the farewell
air to the cold shores of Upper Canada.
The line was cast off, when a boy of thirteen
rushed
down to the pier, and springing on board with a
desperate leap, flew from one end of the deck to the
other, and flung himself at last upon the neck of a
pretty girl sitting on the knee of one of the privates.
Mary, dear Mary! was all he could utter. His
sobs choked him.
Avast with the line, there! shouted the captain,
who had no wish to carry off this unexpected
passenger
.
The boat was again swung to the wharf, and
the boy very roughly ordered ashore. His only answer
was to cling closer to the girl, and redouble his tears,
and by this time the Colonel had stepped aft, and the
case seemed sure of a fair trial. The pretty Canadian
dropped her head on her bosom, and seemed divided
between contending emotions, and the soldier stood up
and raised his cap to his commanding officer, but held
firmly by her hand. The boy threw himself on his
knees to the Colonel, but tried in vain to speak.
Who's this, O'Shane? asked the officer.
Sure, my swateheart, your honour.
And how dare you bring her on board, sir?
Och, she'll go to ould Ireland wid us, your
honour
.
No, no, no! cried the convulsed boy, clasping
the Colonel's knees, and sobbing as if his heart would
break; she is my sister! She isn't his wife!
Father
'll die if she does! She can't go with him! She
sha'n't
go with him!
Job began to snivel, and I felt warm about the eyes
myself.
Have you got a wife, O'Shane? asked the
Colonel.
Plase your honour, never a bit, said Paddy. He
was a tight, good-looking fellow, by the way, as you
would wish to see.
Wellwe'll settle this thing at once. Get up, my
little fellow! Come here, my good girl! Do you
love O'Shane well enough to be his wife?
Indeed I do, sir! said Mary, wiping her eyes
with the back of her hand, and stealing a look at the
six feet one that stood as straight as a pike beside
her.
O'Shane! I allow this girl to go with us only on
condition that you marry her at the first place where
we can find a priest. We will make her up a bit of a
dowry, and I will look after her comfort as long as
she follows the regiment. What do you say, sir?
Will you marry her?
O'Shane began to waver in his military position,
from a full front face getting to very nearly a
right-about
.
It was plain he was taken by surprise. The
eyes of the company were on him, however, and
public
opinion, which, in most human breasts, is
considerably
stronger than conscience, had its effect.
I'll do it, your honour! said he, bolting it out as
a man volunteers upon a forlorn hope.
Tears might as well have been bespoken for the
whole company. The boy was torn from his sister's
neck, and set ashore in the arms of two sailors, and
poor Mary, very much in doubt whether she was
happy or miserable, sank upon a heap of knapsacks,
and buried her eyes in a cotton handkerchief with a
map of London upon it, probably a
gage d'amour
from the
desaving
O'Shane. I did the same myself
with a silk one, and Job
item. Item
the Colonel and
several officers.
The boat was shoved off, and the wheels spattered
away, but as far as we could hear his voice, the cry
came following on, Mary, Mary!
It rung in my ears all night: Mary, Mary!
I was up in the morning at sunrise, and was glad
to escape from the confined cabin and get upon deck.
The steamer was booming on through a sea as calm
as a mirror, and no land visible. The fresh dewiness
of the morning air ashore played in my nostrils, and
the smell of grass was perceptible in the mind, but in
all else it was like a calm in mid ocean. The
soldiers
were asleep along the decks, with their wives
and children, and the pretty runaway lay with her
head on O'Shane's bosom, her red eyes and soiled
finery showing too plainly how she had passed the
night. Poor Mary! she has enough of following a
soldier, by this, I fear.
I stepped forward, and was not a little surprised to
see standing against the railing on the larboard bow,
the motionless figure of an Indian girl of sixteen.
Her dark eye was fixed on the line of the horizon we
were leaving behind, her arms were folded on her
bosom, and she seemed not even to breathe. A
common
shawl was wrapped carelessly around her, and
another glance betrayed to me that she was in a
situation
soon to become a mother. Her feet were
protected
by a pair of once gaudy but now shabby and
torn moccasins, singularly small; her hands were of a
delicate thinness unusual to her race, and her hollow
cheeks, and forehead marked with an expression of
pain, told all I could have prophesied of the history of
a white man's tender mercies. I approached very
near, quite unperceived. A small burning spot was
just perceptible in the centre of her dark cheek, and
as I looked at her steadfastly, I could see a working of
the muscles of her dusky brow, which betrayed, in
one of a race so trained to stony calmness, an unusual
fever of feeling. I looked around for the place in
which she must have slept. A mantle of
wampum-work
,
folded across a heap of confused baggage, partly
occupied as a pillow by a brutal-looking and sleeping
soldier, told at once the main part of her story. I felt
for her, from my soul!
You can hear the great waterfall no more, I said,
touching her arm.
I hear it when I think of it, she replied, turning
her eyes upon me as slowly, and with as little
surprise
,
as if I had been talking to her an hour.
I pointed to the sleeping soldier. Are you going
with him to his country?
Yes.
Are you his wife?
My father gave me to him.
Has he sworn before the priest in the name of the
Great Spirit to be your husband?
No. She looked intently into my eyes as she
answered, as if she tried in vain to read my meaning.
Is he kind to you?
She smiled bitterly.
Why then did you follow him?
Her eyes dropped upon the burden she bore at her
heart. The answer could not have been clearer if
written with a sunbeam. I said a few words of
kindness
,
and left her to turn over in my mind how I
could best interfere for her happiness.
III.THE ST. LAWRENCE.
On
the third evening we had entered upon the St.
Lawrence, and were winding cautiously into the
channel of the Thousand Isles. I think there is not,
within the knowledge of the all-beholding sun, a
spot so singularly and exquisitely beautiful. Between
the Mississippi and the Cimmerian Bosphorus, I
know
there is not, for I have pic-nic'd from the Symplegades
westward. The Thousand Isles of the St. Lawrence
are as imprinted on my mind as the stars of heaven.
I could forget them as soon.
The river is here as wide as a lake, while the
channel
just permits the passage of a steamer. The
islands, more than a thousand in number, are a
singular
formation of flat, rectangular rock, split, as it
were, by regular mathematical fissures, and
overflowed
nearly to the tops, which are loaded with a
most luxuriant vegetation. They vary in size, but
the generality of them would about accommodate a
tea-party of six. The water is deep enough to float
a large steamer directly at the edge, and an active deer
would leap across from one to the other in any
direction
.
What is very singular, these little rocky
platforms
are covered with a rich loam, and carpeted with
moss and flowers, while immense trees take root in the
clefts, and interlace their branches with those of the
neighbouring islets, shadowing the water with the
unsunned dimness of the wilderness. It is a very odd
thing to glide through in a steamer. The luxuriant
leaves sweep the deck, and the black funnel parts the
drooping sprays as it keeps its way, and you may
pluck the blossoms of the acacia, or the rich chestnut
flowers, sitting on the taffrail, and, really, a magic
passage
in a witch's steamer, beneath the tree-tops of an
untrodden forest, could not be more novel and
startling
.
Then the solitude and silence of the dim and
still waters are continually broken by the plunge and
leap of the wild deer springing or swimming from one
island to another, and the swift and shadowy canoe of
the Indian glides out from some unseen channel, and
with a single stroke of his broad paddle he vanishes,
and is lost again, even to the ear. If the beauty-sick
and nature-searching spirit of Keats is abroad in the
world, my basnet to a 'prentice-cap he passes his
summers amid the Thousand Isles of the St.
Lawrence
!
I would we were there with our tea-things,
sweet Rosa Matilda!
We had dined on the quarter-deck, and were sitting
over the colonel's wine, pulling the elm-leaves from
the branches as they swept saucily over the table, and
listening to the band, who were playing waltzes that
probably ended in the confirmed insanity of every
wild heron and red deer that happened that afternoon
to come within ear-shot of the good steamer
Queenston
.
The paddles began to slacken in their spattering,
and the boat came to, at the sharp side of one of the
largest of the shadowy islands. We were to stop an
hour or two, and take in wood.
Every body was soon ashore for a ramble, leaving
only the colonel, who was a cripple from a score of
Waterloo tokens, and your servant, reader, who had
something on his mind.
Colonel! will you oblige me by sending for
Mahoney
?
Steward! call me that Indian girl sitting
with her head on her knees in the boat's bow.
They stood before us.
How is this? exclaimed the Colonel; another!
Good God! these Irishmen! Well, sir! what do you
intend to do with this girl, now that you have ruined
her?
Mahoney looked at her out of a corner of his eye
with a libertine contempt that made my blood boil.
The girl watched for his answer with an intense but
calm gaze into his face, that if he had had a soul,
would have killed him. Her lips were set firmly but
not fiercely together, and as the private stood looking
from one side to the other, unable or unwilling to
answer
,
6
she suppressed a rising emotion in her throat,
and turned her look on the commanding officer with
a proud coldness that would have become Medea.
Mahoney! said the colonel, sternly, will you
marry this poor girl?
Never, I hope, your honor!
The wasted and noble creature raised her burdened
form to its fullest height, and, with an inaudible
murmur
bursting from her lips, walked back to the bow
of the vessel. The colonel pursued his conversation
with Mahoney, and the obstinate brute was still
refusing
the only reparation he could make the poor
Indian, when she suddenly re-appeared. The shawl
was no longer around her shoulders. A coarse
blanket
was bound below her breast with a belt of wampum,
leaving her fine bust entirely bare, her small feet trod
the deck with the elasticity of a leopard about to leap
on his prey, and her dark, heavily fringed eyes glowed
like coals of fire. She seized the colonel's hand, and
imprinted a kiss upon it, another upon mine, and
without
a look at the father of her child, dived with a
single leap over the gangway. She rose directly in
the clear water, swam with powerful strokes to one of
the most distant islands, and turning once more to
wave her hand as she stood on the shore, strode on,
and was lost in the tangles of the forest.
THE
CHEROKEE'S THREAT.
6*
Notre bonheur, mon cher, se tiendra toujours entre la plante de nos
pieds et notre occiput; et qu'il cote un million par an ou cent louis, la
perception intrinsique est la mme au-dedans de nous.
Le Pre Goriot
.
There
were a hundred students in the new class
matriculated at Yale College, in Connecticut, in the
year 18. They were young men of different ages
and of all conditions in life, but less various in their
mien and breeding than in the characteristics of the
widely-separated states from which they came. It is
not thought extraordinary in Europe that the French
and English, the German and the Italian, should
possess distinct national traits: yet one American is
supposed to be like every other, though the two
between
whom the comparison is drawn were born and
bred as far apart, and in as different latitudes, as the
Highland cateran and the brigand of Calabria.
I looked around me with some interest, when, on the
first morning of the term, the president, professors, and
students of the university assembled in the college
chapel at the sound of the prayer-bell, and, with my
brother Freshmen, I stood in the side aisle, closing up
with our motley, and, as yet, unclassical heads and
habiliments, the long files of the more initiated classes.
The berry-brown tan of the sun of Georgia,
unblanched
by study, was still dark and deep on the cheek of
one; the look of command, breathing through the
indolent
attitude, betrayed, in another, the young
Carolinian
and slave-master; a coat of green, garnished
with fur and bright buttons, and shaped less by the
tailor than by the Herculean and expansive frame
over which it was strained, had a taste of Kentucky
in its complexion; the white skin and red or sandy
hair, cold expression, stiff black coat, and serious
attention
to the service, told of the Puritan son of
New-Hampshire
or Vermont; and, perked up in his
well-fitted
coat, the exquisite of the class, stood the slight
and metropolitan New-Yorker, with a firm belief in his
tailor and himself written on his effeminate lip, and an
occasional look at his neighbours' coats and shoulders,
that might have been construed into wonder upon
what western river or mountain dwelt the builders of
such coats and men!
Rather annoyed at last by the glances of one or two
seniors, who were amusing themselves with my simple
gaze of curiosity, I turned my attention to my more
immediate neighbourhood. A youth with close,
curling
,
brown hair, rather under-size, but with a certain
decision and nerve in his lip which struck me
immediately
,
and which seemed to express somehow a
confidence
in himself which his limbs scarce bore out,
stood with his back to the pulpit, and, with his foot on
the seat and his elbow on his knee, seemed to have
fallen at once into the habit of the place, and to be
beyond surprise or interest. As it was the custom of
the college to take places at prayers and recitation
alphabetically, and he was likely to be my neighbour
in chapel and hall for the next four years, I speculated
rather more than I should else have done on his face
and manner; and as the president came to his Amen,
I came to the conclusion, that whatever might be Mr.
S's capacity for friendship, his ill-will would be very
demonstrative and uncomfortable.
The term went on, the politics of the little republic
fermented, and as first appearances wore away, or
peculiarities wore off by collision or developed by
intimacy
,
the different members of the class rose or fell
in the general estimation, and the graduation of talent
and spirit became more just and definite. The
Southerners
and Northerners, as they are called, soon
discovered
,
like the classes that had gone before them,
that they had no qualities in common, and, of the
secret societies which exist among the students in that
university, joined each that of his own compatriots.
The Carolinian or Georgian, who had passed his life
on a plantation, secluded from the society of his equals,
soon found out the value of his chivalrous deportment
and graceful indolence in the gay society for which
the town is remarkable; while the Vermontese, or
White-Mountaineer, made unfashionably, and ill at
ease on a carpet, took another line of ambition, and sat
down with the advantage of constitutional patience
and perseverance to the study which he would find in
the end a better continuer, even in the race for a
lady's favour.
It was the only republic I have ever knownthat
class of Freshmen. It was a fair arena; and neither
in politics, nor society, nor literature, nor love, nor
religion
,
have I, in much searching through the world,
found the same fair play or good feeling. Talk of our
own republic!its society is the very core and gall of
the worst growth of aristocracy. Talk of the
republic
of letters!the two graves by the pyramid of Caius
Cestius laugh it to scorn. Of love!of religion.
What is bought and sold like that which has the name
of the first? What is made a snare and a tool by the
designing like the last? But herewith a
government
over us ever kindly and paternal, no favor shown,
and no privilege denied,every equality in the
competitors
at all possibleage, previous education, and,
above all, worldly position,it was an arena in which
a generous spirit would wrestle with an
abandon
of
heart and limb he might never know in the world
again. Every individual rising or falling by the
estimation
he exacts of his fellows, there is no such
school of honor; each, of the many palms of
scholarship
,
from the severest to the lightest, aiming at that
which best suits his genius, and as welcome as another
to the goal, there is no apology for the laggard. Of
the feelings that stir the heart in our youthof the
few, the
very
few, which have no recoil, and leave no
repentancethis leaping from the starting-post of
mindthis first spread of the encouraged wing in the
free heaven of thought and knowledgeis recorded
in my own slender experience as the most joyous and
the most unmingled. He who has soiled his bright
honor with the tools of political ambition,he who
has leant his soul upon the charity of a sect in
religion
,he
who has loved, hoped, and trusted in the
greater arena of life and manhood,must look back
on days like these as the broken-winged eagle to the
skyas the Indian's subdued horse to the prairie.
II.
New-Haven is not alone the seat of a university. It
is a kind of metropolis of education. The excessive
beauty of the town, with its embowered streets and
sunny gardens, the refinement of its society, its
central
position and accessibility, and the facilities for
attending
the lectures of the College Professors, render
it a most desirable place of instruction in every
department
.
Among others, the female schools of the
place have a great reputation, and this, which in
Europe
,
or with a European state of society, would
probably be an evil, is, from the simple and frank
character of manners in America, a mutual and
decided
advantage. The daughters of the first families
of the country are sent here, committed for two,
three, or four years, to the exclusive care of the head
of the establishment, and (as one of the privileges and
advantages of the school) associating freely with the
general society of the town, the male part, of course,
composed principally of students. A more easy and
liberal intercourse exists in no society in the world,
and in no society that I have ever seen is the tone of
morals and manners so high and unexceptionable.
Attachments are often formed, and little harm is
thought of it; and unless it is a very strong case of
disparity or objection, no obstacle is thrown in the
way of the common intercourse between lovers; and
the lady returns to her family, and the gentleman
senior
disappears with his degree, and they meet and
marryif they like. If they do not, the lady stands
as well in the matrimonial market as ever, and the
gentleman (unlike his horse) is not damaged by
having
been on his knees.
Like Le Noir Fainant, at the tournament, my
friend St. John seemed more a looker-on than an actor
in the various pursuits of the university. A sudden
interference in a quarrel, in which a brother freshman
was contending against odds, enlightened the class
as to his spirit and personal strength; he acquitted
himself at recitations with the air of self-contempt for
such easy excellence; he dressed plainly, but with
instinctive taste; and at the end of the first term,
having shrunk from all intimacy, and lived alone with
his books and a kind of trapper's dog he had brought
with him from the west, he had acquired an
ascendancy
in the opinion of the class for which no one
could well account, but to which every one
unhesitatingly
assented.
We returned after our first short vacation, and of
my hundred class-mates there was but one whom I
much cared to meet again. St. John had passed the
vacation in his rooms, and my evident pleasure at
meeting him, for the first time, seemed to open his
heart to me. He invited me to breakfast with him.
By favor seldom granted to a freshman, he had a
lodging
in the townthe rest of the class being compelled
to live with a chum in the college buildings. I found
his rooms(I was the first of the class who had
entered
them)more luxuriously furnished than I had
expected from the simplicity of his appearance, but
his books, not many, but select, and (what is in
America
an expensive luxury) in the best English editions
and superbly bound, excited most my envy and
surprise
.
How he should have acquired tastes of such
ultra-civilization in the forests of the west was a
mystery that remained to be solved.
III.
At the extremity of a green lane in the outer skirt
of the fashionable suburb of New-Haven stood a
rambling
old Dutch house, built probably when the cattle
of Mynheer grazed over the present site of the town.
It was a wilderness of irregular rooms, of no
describable
shape in its exterior, and from its southern balcony,
to use an expressive Gallicism, gave upon the bay.
Long-Island Sound, the great highway from the
Northern
Atlantic to New-York, weltered in alternate lead
and silver, (oftener like the brighter metal, for the
climate
is divine,) between the curving lip of the bay and
the interminable and sandy shore of the island some
six leagues distant; the procession of ships and
steamers
stole past with an imperceptible progress; the
ceaseless
bells of the college chapel came deadened through
the trees from behind, and (the day being one of
golden
autumn, and myself and St. John waiting while
black Agatha answered the door-bell) the sun-steeped
precipice of East Rock, with its tiara of blood-red
maples
flushing like a Turk's banner in the light, drew
from us both a truant wish for a ramble and a holiday.
I shall have more to say anon of the foliage of an
American
October, but just now, while I remember it, I wish
to record a belief of my own, that if, as philosophy
supposes, we have lived other livesif
....... our star
Hath had elsewhere its setting,
And cometh from afar,
it is surely in the days tempered like the one I am
remembering
and describingprofoundly serene, sunny
as the top of Olympus, heavenly pure, holy, and more
invigorating and intoxicating than luxurious or balmy;
the sort of air that the visiting angels might have
brought with them to the tent of Abrahamit is on
such days, I would record, that my own memory steps
back over the dim threshhold of life(so it seems to
me)and on such days only. It is worth the
translation
of our youth and our household gods to a sunnier
land, if it were alone for those immortal revelations.
In a few minutes from this time were assembled in
Mrs. Ilfrington's drawing-room the six or seven young
ladies of my more particular acquaintance among her
pupils, of whom one was a new-comer, and the object
of my mingled curiosity and admiration. It was the
one day of the week when morning visiters were
admitted
,
and I was there, in compliance with an
unexpected
request from my friend, to present him to the
agreeable circle of Mrs. Ilfrington. As an
habitu
in
her family, this excellent lady had taken occasion to
introduce to me, a week or two before, the new-comer
of whom I have spoken above, a departure from the
ordinary rule of the establishment, which I felt to be
a compliment, and which gave me, I presumed, a tacit
claim to mix myself up in that young lady's destiny
as deeply as I should find agreeable. The new-comer
was the daughter of an Indian chief, and her name
was Nunu.
The wrongs of civilization to the noble aborigines
of America are a subject of much poetical feeling in
the United States, and will ultimately become the
poetry
of the nation. At present the sentiment takes
occasionally
a tangible shape, and the transmission of the
daughter of a Cherokee chief to New-Haven, to be
educated
at the expense of the government, and of
several
young men of the same high birth to different
colleges
,
will be recorded among the evidences in history
that we did not plough the bones of their fathers into
our fields without some feelings of compunction.
Nunu had come to the sea-board under the charge of a
female missionary, whose pupil she had been in one
of the native schools of the West, and was destined,
though a chief's daughter, to return as a teacher to
her tribe when she should have mastered some of the
higher accomplishments of her sex. She was an apt
scholar, but her settled melancholy when away from
her books, had determined Mrs. Ilfrington to try the
effect of a little society upon her, and hence my
privilege
to ask for her appearance in the drawing-room.
As we strolled down in the alternate shade and
sunshine
of the road, I had been a little piqued at the want
of interest, and the manner of course, with which St.
VOL. I. 7
John had received my animated descriptions of the
personal beauty of the Cherokee.
I have hunted with the tribe, was his only
answer
,
and know their features.
But she is not like them, I replied, with a tone of
some impatience; she is the beau ideal of a red skin,
but it is with the softened features of an Arab or an
Egyptian. She is more willowy than erect, and has
no higher cheek-bones than the plaster Venus in your
chambers. If it were not for the lambent fire in her
eye, you might take her, in the sculptured pose of her
attitudes, for an immortal bronze of Cleopatra. I tell
you she is divine.
St. John called to his dog, and we turned along the
green bank above the beach, with Mrs. Ilfrington's
house in view, and so opens a new chapter in my story.
IV.
In the united pictures of Paul Veronese and
Raphael
,
steeped as their colours seem to have been
in the divinest age of Venetian and Roman female
beauty, I have scarce found so many lovely women,
of so different models and so perfect, as were
assembled
during my Sophomore year under the roof of
Mrs. Ilfrington. They went about in their evening
walks, graceful and angelic, but, like the virgin pearls
of the sea, they poured the light of their loveliness on
the vegetating oysters about them, and no diver of
fashion
had yet taught them their value. Ignorant
myself
in those days of the scale of beauty, their features
are enamelled in my memory, and I have tried
insensibly
by that standard (and found wanting) of every
court in Europe the dames most worshipped and
highest
born. Queen of the Sicilies, loveliest in your own
realm of sunshine and passion! Pale and
transparent
Princesspearl of the court of Florencethan
whom the creations on the immortal walls of the Pitti
less discipline our eye for the shapes of heaven!
Gipsy
of the Pactolus! Jewess of the Thracian
Gallipolis
!
Bright and gifted cynosure of the aristocracy of
England!ye are five women I have seen in as many
years' wandering over the world, lived to gaze upon,
and live to remember and admirea constellation, I
almost believe, that has absorbed all the intensest light
of the beauty of a hemisphereyet, with your pictures
coloured to life in my memory, and the pride of rank
and state thrown over most of you like an elevating
charm, I go back to the school of Mrs. Ilfrington, and
(smile if you will!) they were as lovely, and stately,
and as worthy of the worship of the world.
I introduced St. John to the young ladies as they
came in. Having never seen him, except in the
presence
of men, I was a little curious to know whether
his singular
aplomb
would serve him as well with
the other sex, of which I was aware he had had a
very slender experience. My attention was
distracted
at the moment of mentioning his name to a lovely
little Georgian, (with eyes full of the liquid sunshine
of the south,) by a sudden bark of joy from the dog,
who had been left in the hall; and as the door
opened
,
and the slight and graceful Indian girl entered
the room, the usually unsocial animal sprang
bounding
in, lavishing caresses on her, and seemingly wild
with the delight of a recognition.
In the confusion of taking the dog from the room, I
had again lost the moment of remarking St. John's
manner, and on the entrance of Mrs. Ilfrington, Nunu
was sitting calmly by the piano, and my friend was
talking in a quiet undertone with the passionate
Georgian.
I must apologize for my dog, said St. John,
bowing
gracefully to the mistress of the house; he was
bred by Indians, and the sight of a Cherokee
reminded
him of happier daysas it did his master.
Nunu turned her eyes quickly upon him, but
immediately
resumed her apparent deep study of the
abstruse figures in the Kidderminster carpet.
You are well arrived, young gentlemen, said
Mrs. Ilfrington, we press you into our service for a
botanical ramble. Mr. Slingsby is at leisure, and will
be delighted, I am sure. Shall I say as much for
you, Mr. St. John?
St. John bowed, and the ladies left the room for
their bonnets, Mrs. Ilfrington last. The door was
scarcely closed when Nunu re-appeared, and
checking
herself with a sudden feeling at the first step over
the threshhold, stood gazing at St. John, evidently
under very powerful emotion.
Nunu! he said, smiling slowly and unwillingly,
and holding out his hand with the air of one who
forgives an offence.
She sprang upon his bosom with the bound of a
leveret, and between her fast kisses broke the
endearing
epithets of her native tongue, in words that I
only understood by their passionate and thrilling
accent
.
The language of the heart is universal.
The fair scholars came in one after another, and
we were soon on our way through the green fields to
the flowery mountain-side of East Rock; Mrs.
Ilfrington's
arm and conversation having fallen to my share,
and St. John rambling at large with the rest of the
party, but more particularly beset by Miss Temple,
whose Christian name was Isabella, and whose
Christian
charity had no bowels for broken hearts.
The most sociable individuals of the party for a while
were Nunu and Lash; the dog's recollections of the
past seeming, like those of wiser animals, more
agreeable than the present. The Cherokee
astonished
Mrs. Ilfrington by an abandonment to joy and frolic
which she had never displayed before, sometimes
fairly outrunning the dog at full speed, and
sometimes
sitting down breathless upon a green bank,
while the rude creature overpowered her with his
caresses. The scene gave origin to a grave
discussion
between that well-instructed lady and myself,
upon the singular force of childish associationthe
extraordinary intimacy between the Indian and the
trapper's dog being explained satisfactorily (to her,
at least) on that attractive principle. Had she but
seen Nunu spring into the bosom of my friend half
an hour before, she might have added a material
corollary to her proposition. If the dog and the
chief's daughter were not old friends, the chief's
daughter and St. John certainly
were
.
As well as I could judge by the motions of two
people
walking before me, St. John was advancing fast in
the favour and acquaintance of the graceful Georgian.
Her southern indolence was probably an apology in
Mrs. Ilfrington's eyes for leaning heavily on her
companion's
arm; but, in a momentary halt, the capricious
beauty disembarrassed herself of the bright scarf that
had floated over her shoulders, and bound it playfully
around his waist. This was rather strong on a first
acquaintance, and Mrs. Ilfrington was of that opinion.
Miss Temple! said she, advancing to whisper a
reproof in the beauty's ear.
Before she had taken a second step, Nunu bounded
over the low hedge, followed by the dog with whom
she had been chasing a butterfly, and springing upon
St. John with eyes that flashed fire, she tore the scarf
into shreds, and stood trembling and pale, with her
feet on the silken fragments.
Madam! said St. John, advancing to Mrs.
Ilfrington
,
after casting on the Cherokee a look of surprise
7*
and displeasure, I should have told you before that
your pupil and myself are not new acquaintances.
Her father is my friend. I have hunted with the tribe,
and have hitherto looked upon Nunu as a child. You
will believe me, I trust, when I say her conduct
surprises
me, and I beg to assure you that any influence
I may have over her will be in accordance with your
own wishes exclusively.
His tone was cold, and Nunu listened with fixed
lips and frowning eyes.
Have you seen her before since her arrival? asked
Mrs. Ilfrington.
My dog brought me yesterday the first intelligence
that she was here. He returned from his morning
ramble with a string of wampum about his neck, which
had the mark of the tribe. He was her gift, he added,
patting the head of the dog, and looking with a
softened
expression at Nunu, who dropped her head upon
her bosom and walked on in tears.
V.
The chain of the Green Mountains, after a gallop of
some five hundred miles, from Canada to Connecticut,
suddenly pulls up on the shore of Long-Island Sound,
and stands rearing with a bristling mane of pine-trees,
three hundred feet in air, as if checked in mid-career by
the sea. Standing on the brink of this bold precipice,
you have the bald face of the rock in a sheer
perpendicular
below you; and, spreading away from the
broken masses at its foot, lies an emerald meadow inlaid
with a crystal and rambling river, across which, at a
distance of a mile or two, rise the spires of the
University
,
from what else were a thick-serried wilderness of
elms. Back from the edge of the precipice extends a
wild forest of hemlock and fir, ploughed on its
northern
side by a mountain-torrent, whose bed of marl,
dry and overhung with trees in the summer, serve as
a path and a guide from the plain to the summit. It
were a toilsome ascent but for that smooth and hard
pavement, and the impervious and green thatch of
pine-tassels overhung.
Antiquity in America extends no farther back than
the days of Cromwell, and East Rock is traditionary
ground with usfor there harboured the regicides
Whalley and Goffe, and many a breath-hushing tale
is told of them over the smouldering log-fires of
Connecticut
.
Not to rob the historian, I pass on to say
that this cavernous path to the mountain top was the
resort in the holiday summer afternoons of most of
the poetical and otherwise well-disposed gentlemen
Sophomores, and, on the day of which I speak, of
Mrs. Ilfrington and her seven-and-twenty lovely
scholars. The kind mistress ascended with the
assistance
of my arm, and St. John drew stoutly
between
Miss Temple and a fat young lady with an
incipient
asthma. Nunu had not been seen since the
first cluster of hanging flowers had hidden her from
our sight, as she bounded upward.
The hour or two of slanting sunshine, poured in
upon the summit of the precipice from the west, had
been sufficient to induce a fine and silken moss to
show its fibres and small blossoms above the carpet of
pine-tassels; and emerging from the brown shadow of
the wood, you stood on a verdant platform, the foliage
of sighing trees overhead, a fairies' velvet beneath you,
and a view below that you may as well (if you would
not die in your ignorance) make a voyage over the
water to see.
We found Nunu lying thoughtfully near the brink
of the precipice, and gazing off over the waters of the
Sound, as if she watched the coming or going of a
friend under the white sails that spotted its bosom.
We recovered our breath in silence, I alone, perhaps,
of that considerable company gazing with admiration
at the lithe and unconscious figure of grace lying in
the attitude of the Grecian Hermaphrodite on the
brow of the rock before us. Her eyes were moist and
motionless with abstraction, her lips just perceptibly
curved in an expression of mingled pride and sorrow,
her small hand buried and clenched in the moss, and
her left foot and ankle, models of spirited symmetry,
escaped carelessly from her dress, the high instep
strained back as if recovering from a leap, with the
tense control of emotion.
The game of the coquettish Georgian was well
played. With a true woman's pique, she had
redoubled
her attentions to my friend from the moment
that she found it gave pain to another of her sex; and
St. John, like most men, seemed not unwilling to see
a new altar kindled to his vanity, though a heart he
had already won was stifling with the incense. Miss
Temple was very lovely. Her skin, of that tint of
opaque and patrician white which is found oftenest in
Asian latitudes, was just perceptibly warmed towards
the centre of the cheek with a glow like sunshine
through the thick white petal of a magnolia; her eyes
were hazel, with those inky lashes which enhance the
expression a thousand-fold, either of passion or
melancholy
;
her teeth were like strips from the lily's heart;
and she was clever, captivating, graceful, and a
thorough coquette. St. John was mysterious,
romantic-looking
,
superior, and, just now, the only victim in
the way. He admired, as all men do, those qualities
which, to her own sex, rendered the fair Isabella
unamiable
;
and yielded himself, as all men will, a
satisfied
prey to enchantments of which he knew the
springs were the pique and vanity of the enchantress.
How singular it is that the highest and best qualities
of the female heart are those with which men are the
least captivated!
A rib of the mountain formed a natural seat a little
back from the pitch of the precipice, and here sat Miss
Temple, triumphant in drawing all eyes upon herself
and her tamed lion; her lap full of flowers, which he
had found time to gather on the way, and her white
hands employed in arranging a bouquet, of which the
destiny was yet a secret. Next to their own loves,
ladies like nothing on earth like mending or marring
the loves of others; and while the violets and
already-drooping
wild flowers were coquettishly chosen or
rejected
by those slender fingers, the sun might have
swung back to the east like a pendulum, and those
seven-and-twenty Misses would have watched their
lovely schoolfellow the same. Nunu turned her head
slowly around at last, and silently looked on. St.
John lay at the feet of the Georgian, glancing from
the flowers to her face, and from her face to the
flowers, with an admiration not at all equivocal. Mrs.
Ilfrington sat apart, absorbed in finishing a sketch of
New-Haven; and I, interested painfully in watching
the emotions of the Cherokee, sat with my back to the
trunk of a hemlock,the only spectator who
comprehended
the whole extent of the drama.
A wild rose was set in the heart of the bouquet at
last, a spear of ribbon-grass added to give it grace and
point, and nothing was wanting but a string.
Reticules
were searched, pockets turned inside out, and
never a bit of ribbon to be found. The beauty was
in despair.
Stay, said St. John, springing to his feet. Lash!
Lash!
The dog came coursing in from the wood, and
crouched to his master's hand.
Will a string of wampum do? he asked, feeling
under the long hair on the dog's neck, and untying a
fine and variegated thread of many-coloured beads,
worked exquisitely.
The dog growled, and Nunu sprang into the middle
of the circle with the fling of an adder, and seizing the
wampum as he handed it to her rival, called the dog,
and fastened it once more around his neck.
The ladies rose in alarm; the belle turned pale, and
clung to St. John's arm; the dog, with his hair
bristling
upon his back, stood close to her feet in an
attitude
of defiance; and the superb Indian, the peculiar
genius of her beauty developed by her indignation, her
nostrils expanded, and her eyes almost showering fire
in their flashes, stood before them like a young
Pythoness
,
ready to strike them dead with a regard.
St. John recovered from his astonishment after a
moment, and leaving the arm of Miss Temple,
advanced
a step, and called to his dog.
The Cherokee patted the animal on his back, and
spoke to him in her own language; and, as St. John
still advanced, Nunu drew herself to her fullest height,
placed herself before the dog, who slunk growling from
his master, and said to him, as she folded her arms,
The wampum is mine.
St. John coloured to the temples with shame.
Lash! he cried, stamping with his feet, and
endeavouring
to fright him from his protectress.
The dog howled and crept away, half crouching
with fear, toward the precipice; and St. John,
shooting
suddenly past Nunu, seized him on the brink, and
held him down by the throat.
The next instant, a scream of horror from Mrs.
Ilfrington
,
followed by a terrific echo from every female
present, started the rude Kentuckian to his feet.
Clear over the abyss, hanging with one hand by an
ashen sapling, the point of her tiny foot just poising on
a projecting ledge of rock, swung the desperate
Cherokee
,
sustaining herself with perfect ease, but with all
the determination of her iron race collected in calm
concentration on her lips.
Restore the wampum to his neck, she cried, with
a voice that thrilled the very marrow with its subdued
fierceness, or my blood rest on your soul!
St. John flung it toward the dog, and clasped his
hands in silent horror.
The Cherokee bore down the sapling till its slender
stem cracked with the tension, and rising lightly with
the rebound, alit like a feather upon the rock. The
subdued student sprang to her side; but with scorn
on her lip, and the flush of exertion already vanished
from her cheek, she called to the dog, and with rapid
strides took her way alone down the mountain.
VI.
Five years had elapsed. I had put to sea from the
sheltered river of boyhood,had encountered the
storms of a first entrance into life,had trimmed my
boat, shortened sail, and, with a sharp eye to
windward
,
was lying fairly on my course. Among others
from whom I had parted company was Paul St. John,
who had shaken hands with me at the University gate,
leaving me, after four years' intimacy, as much in
doubt as to his real character and history as the first
day we met. I had never heard him speak of either
father or mother, nor had he, to my knowledge,
received
a letter frow the day of his matriculation. He
passed his vacations at the University;he had
studied
well, yet refused one of the highest college honors
offered him with his degree;he had shown many
good qualities, yet some unaccountable faults;and,
all in all, was an enigma to myself and the class. I
knew him, clever, accomplished, and conscious of
superiority; and my knowledge went no farther. The
coach was at the gate, and I was there to see him off;
and, after four years' constant association, I had not
an idea where he was going, or to what he was
destined
.
The driver blew his horn.
God bless you, Slingsby!
God bless you, St. John!
And so we parted.
It was five years from this time, I say, and, in the
bitter struggles of first manhood, I had almost
forgotten
there was such a being in the world. Late in the
month of October, in 1829, I was on my way
westward
,
giving myself a vacation from the law. I
embarked, on a clear and delicious day, in the small
steamer which plies up and down the Cayuga Lake,
looking forward to a calm feast of scenery, and
caring
little who were to be my fellow-passengers. As
we got out of the little harbour of Cayuga, I walked
astern for the first time, and saw the not very unusual
sight of a group of Indians standing motionless by
the wheel. They were chiefs, returning from a
diplomatic
visit to Washington.
I sat down by the companion-ladder, and opened
soul and eye to the glorious scenery we were gliding
through. The first severe frost had come, and the
miraculous change had passed upon the leaves which
is known only in America. The blood-red sugar
maple
,
with a leaf brighter and more delicate than a
Circassian lip, stood here and there in the forest like
the Sultan's standard in a hostthe solitary and
far-seen
aristocrat of the wilderness; the birch, with its
spirit-like and amber leaves, ghosts of the departed
summer, turned out along the edges of the woods like
a lining of the palest gold; the broad sycamore and
the fan-like catalpa flaunted their saffron foliage in the
sun, spotted with gold like the wings of a lady-bird;
the kingly oak, with its summit shaken bare, still hid
its majestic trunk in a drapery of sumptuous dyes,
like a stricken monarch, gathering his robes of state
about him to die royally in his purple; the tall poplar,
with its minaret of silver leaves, stood blanched like
a coward in the dying forest, burthening evey breeze
with its complainings; the hickory paled through its
enduring green; the bright berries of the
mountainash
flushed with a more sanguine glory in the
unobstructed
sun; the gaudy tulip-tree, the Sybarite of
vegetation, stripped of its golden cups, still drank
the intoxicating light of noon-day in leaves than
which the lip of an Indian shell was never more
delicately
tinted; the still deeper-dyed vines of the lavish
wilderness, perishing with the noble things whose
summer they had shared, outshone them in their
decline
,
as woman in her death is heavenlier than the
being on whom in life she leaned; and alone and
unsympathizing in this universal decay, outlaws from
Nature, stood the fir and the hemlock, their frowning
and sombre heads darker and less lovely than ever,
in contrast with the death-struck glory of their
companions
.
The dull colours of English autumnal foliage give
you no conception of this marvellous phenomenon.
The change here is gradual; in America it is the
work of a nightof a single frost!
Oh, to have seen the sun set on hills bright in the
still green and lingering summer, and to wake in the
morning to a spectacle like this!
It is as if a myriad of rainbows were laced through
the tree-topsas if the sunsets of a summergold,
purple, and crimsonhad been fused in the alembic
of the west, and poured back in a new deluge of light
and colour over the wilderness. It is as if every leaf
in those countless trees had been painted to outflush
VOL. I. 8
the tulipas if, by some electric miracle, the dyes of
the earth's heart had struck upward, and her crystals
and ores, her sapphires, hyacinths, and rubies
had let forth their imprisoned colours to mount
through the roots of the forest, and, like the angels
that in olden time entered the bodies of the dying,
reanimate the perishing leaves, and revel an hour in
their bravery.
I was sitting by the companion-ladder, thinking to
what on earth these masses of foliage could be
resembled
,
when a dog sprang upon my knees, and, the
moment after, a hand was laid on my shoulder.
St. John? Impossible!
Bodily! answered my quondam classmate.
I looked at him with astonishment. The
soign
man of fashion I had once known was enveloped in a
kind of hunter's frock, loose and large, and girded to
his waist by a belt; his hat was exchanged for a cap
of rich otter skin; his pantaloons spread with a
slovenly
carelessness over his feet; and, altogether, there
was that in his air which told me at a glance that he
had renounced the world. Lash had recovered his
leanness, and, after wagging out his joy, he crouched
between my feet, and lay looking into my face, as if
he was brooding over the more idle days in which we
had been acquainted.
And where are
you
bound? I asked, having
answered
the same question for myself.
Westward with the chiefs!
For how long?
The remainder of my life.
I could not forbear an exclamation of surprise.
You would wonder less, said he, with an
impatient
gesture, if you knew more of me. And by the
way, he added with a smile, I think I never told you
the first half of the storymy life up to the time I
met you.
It was not for want of a catechist, I answered,
settling myself in an attitude of attention.
No; and I was often tempted to gratify your
curiosity
;
but from the little intercourse I had had with
the world, I had adopted some precocious principles;
and one was, that a man's influence over others was
vulgarized and diminished by a knowledge of his
history.
I smiled; and as the boat sped on her way over the
calm waters of the Cayuga, St. John went on
leisurely
with a story which is scarce remarkable enough
for a repetition. He believed himself the natural son
of a Western hunter, but only knew that he had passed
his early youth on the borders of civilization, between
whites and Indians, and that he had been more
particularly
indebted for protection to the father of Nunu.
Mingled ambition and curiosity had led him eastward
while still a lad, and a year or two of a most vagabond
life in the different cities had taught him the caution
and bitterness for which he was so remarkable. A
fortunate experiment in lotteries supplied him with the
means of education, and, with singular application in
a youth of such wandering habits, he had applied
himself to study under a private master, fitted himself
for the University in half the usual time, and
cultivated
,
in addition, the literary taste which I have
remarked
upon.
This, he said, smiling at my look of astonishment,
brings me up to the time when we met. I came to
college at the age of eighteen, with a few hundred
dollars in my pocket, some pregnant experience of the
rough side of the world, great confidence in myself,
and distrust of others, and, I believe, a kind of instinct
of good manners, which made me ambitious of shining
in society. You were a witness to my
dbt
. Miss
Temple was the first highly-educated woman I had
ever known, and you saw her effect on me.
And since we parted?
Oh, since we parted my life has been vulgar enough.
I have ransacked civilized life to the bottom, and found
it a heap of unredeemed falsehoods. I do not say it
from common disappointment, for I may say I
succeeded
in every thing I undertook
Except Miss Temple, I said, interrupting, at the
hazard of wounding him.
No; she was a coquette, and I pursued her till I
had my turn. You see me in my new character now.
But a month ago I was the Apollo of Saratoga,
playing
my own game with Miss Temple. I left her for
a woman worth ten thousand of herand here she is.
As Nunu came up the companion-way from the
cabin, I thought I had never seen breathing creature
so exquisitely lovely. With the exception of a pair of
brilliant moccasins on her feet, she was dressed in the
usual manner, but with the most absolute simplicity.
She had changed in those five years from the child to
the woman, and, with a round and well-developed
figure, additional height, and manners at once gracious
and dignified, she walked and looked the chieftain's
daughter. St. John took her hand, and gazed on her
with moisture in his eyes.
That I could ever have put a creature like this,
he said, into comparison with the dolls of civilization!
We parted at Buffalo; St. John with his wife and
the chiefs to pursue their way westward by Lake Erie,
and I to go moralizing on my way to Niagara.
F. SMITH.
Nature had made him for some other planet,
And press'd his soul into a human shape
By accident or malice.
Coleridge
.
I'll have you chronicled, and chronicled, and cut-and-chronicled,
and sung in all-to-be-praised sonnets, and graved in new brave ballads,
that all tongues shall troule you.
Philaster
.
If
you can imagine a buried Titan lying along the
length of a continent with one arm stretched out into
the midst of the sea, the place to which I would
transport
you, reader mine! would lie as it were in the
palm of the giant's hand. The small promontory to
which I refer, which becomes an island in certain
states of the tide, is at the end of one of the long capes
of Massachusetts, and is still called by its Indian name,
Nahant
. Not to make you uncomfortable, I beg to
introduce you at once to a pretentious hotel, squat
like a toad upon the unsheltered and highest point
of this citadel in mid sea, and a very great resort for
the metropolitan New-Englanders. Nahant is
perhaps
,
liberally measured, a square half-mile; and it is
distant from what may fairly be called mainland,
perhaps
a league.
Road to Nahant there is none. The
oi polloi
go
there by steam; but when the tide is down, you may
drive there with a thousand chariots over the bottom
of the sea. As I suppose there is not such another
place in the known world, my tale will wait while I
describe it more fully. If the Bible had been a
fiction
,
(not to speak profanely,) I should have thought
the idea of the destruction of Pharaoh and his host
had its origin in some such wonder of nature.
Nahant is so far out into the ocean, that what is
called the ground swell, the majestic heave of its
great bosom going on for ever like respiration, (though
its face may be like a mirror beneath the sun, and a
wind may not have crisped its surface for days and
weeks,) is as broad and powerful within a rood of the
shore as it is a thousand miles at sea.
The promontory itself is never wholly left by the
ebb; but, from its western extremity, there runs a
narrow ridge, scarce broad enough for a horse-path,
impassable for the rocks and seaweed of which it is
matted, and extending at just high-water mark from
Nahant to the mainland. Seaward from this ridge,
which is the only connexion of the promontory with
the continent, descends an expanse of sand, left bare
six hours out of the twelve by the retreating sea, as
smooth and hard as marble, and as broad and
apparently
as level as the plain of the Hermus. For three
miles it stretches away without shell or stone, a
surface
of white, fine-grained sand, beaten so hard by the
eternal hammer of the surf, that the hoof of a horse
scarce marks it, and the heaviest wheel leaves it as
printless as a floor of granite. This will easily be
understood
when you remember the tremendous rise and
fall of the ocean-swell, from the very bosom of which,
in all its breadth and strength, roll in the waves of the
flowing tide, breaking down on the beach, every one,
with the thunder of a host precipitated from the
battlements
of a castle. Nothing could be more solemn
and anthem-like than the succession of these plunging
surges. And when the tenth wave gathers, far out
at sea, and rolls onward to the shore, first with a
glassy and heaving swell as if some mighty monster
were lurching inland beneath the water, and then,
bursting up into foam, with a front like an endless and
sparry crystal wall, advances and overwhelms every
thing in its progress, till it breaks with a centupled
thunder on the beachit has seemed to me, standing
there, as if thus might have beaten the first surge
on the shore after the fiat which divided sea and
land. I am no Cameronian, but the sea (myself on
shore) always drives me to Scripture for an
illustration
of my feelings.
The promontory of Nahant must be based on the
earth's axle, else I cannot imagine how it should have
lasted so long. In the mildest weather, the
groundswell
of the sea gives it a fillip at every heave that
would lay the castled crag of Drachenfels as low as
Memphis. The wine trembles in your beaker of
claret
as you sit after dinner at the hotel; and if you look
out at the eastern balcony, (for it is a wooden pagoda,
with balconies, verandahs, and colonades
ad libitum
,)
you will see the grass breathless in the sunshine upon
the lawn, and the ocean as polished and calm as
Miladi's
brow beyond, and yet the spray and foam
dashing
fifty feet into the air between, and enveloping the
Devil's Pulpit (a tall rock split off from the
promontory's
front) in a perpetual kaleidoscope of mist and
rainbows. Take the trouble to transport yourself
there! I will do the remaining honors on the spot.
A cavern as cool (not as silent) as those of Trophonius
lies just under the brow of yonder precipice, and the
waiter shall come after us with our wine. You have
dined with the Borromeo in the grotto of Isola Bella,
I doubt not, and know the perfection of
art
I will
show you that of
nature
. (I should like to transport
you for a similar contrast from Terni to Niagara, or
from San Giovanni Laterano to an aisle in a forest of
Michigan; but the Ddalian mystery, alas! is
unsolved
.
We fly not yet.)
Here we are, then, in the Swallows' Cave. The
floor descends by a gentle declivity to the sea, and
from the long dark cleft stretching outward you look
forth upon the broad Atlanticthe shore of Ireland
the first
terra firma
in the path of your eye. Here is
a dark pool left by the retreating tide for a refrigerator,
and with the champagne in the midst, we will recline
about it like the soft Asiatics of whom we learned
pleasure in the East, and drink to the small-featured
and purple-lipped Mignons of Syriathose
fine-limbed
and fiery slaves, adorable as Peris, and by turns
languishing and stormy, whom you buy for a pinch
of piastres (say 5
l.
5
s.
) in sunny Damascus. Your
drowsy Circassian, faint and dreamy, or your
crockery
Georgianfit dolls for the sensual Turkis, to him
who would buy
soul
, dear at a
para
the hecatomb.
We recline, as it were, in an ebon pyramid, with a
hundred feet of floor and sixty of wall, and the fourth
side open to the sky. The light comes in mellow and
dim, and the sharp edges of the rocky portal seem let
into the pearly arch of heaven. The tide is at
half-ebb
,
and the advancing and retreating waves, which
at first just lifted the fringe of crimson dulse at the lip
of the cavern, now dash their spray-pearls on the rock
below, the tenth surge alone rallying as if in scorn
of its retreating fellows, and, like the chieftain of
Culloden
Moor, rushing back singly to the contest. And
now that the waters reach the entrance no more, come
forward and look on the sea! The swell lifts!
would you not think the bases of the earth rising
beneath
it? It falls!would you not think the
foundation
of the deep had given way? A plain, broad
enough for the navies of the world to ride at large,
heaves up evenly and steadily as if it would lie against
the sky, rests a moment spell-bound in its place, and
falls again as farthe respiration of a sleeping child
not more regular and full of slumber. It is only on
the shore that it chafes. Blessed emblem! it is at peace
with itself! The rocks war with a nature so unlike
their own, and the hoarse din of their border onsets
resounds through the caverns they have rent open;
but beyond, in the calm bosom of the ocean, what
heavenly dignity! what godlike unconsciousness of
alarm! I did not think we should stumble on such a
moral in the cave!
By the deeper bass of its hoarse organ, the sea is
now playing upon its lowest stops, and the tide is down.
Hear! how it rushes in beneath the rocks, broken and
stilled in its tortuous way, till it ends with a washing
and dull hiss among the sea-weed, and, like a myriad
of small tinkling bells, the dripping from the crags is
audible. There is fine music in the sea!
And now the beach is bare. The cave begins to
cool and darken, and the first gold tint of sunset is
stealing into the sky, and the sea looks of a changing
opal, green, purple, and white, as if its floor were
paved with pearl, and the changing light struck up
through the waters. And there heaves a ship into the
horizon, like a white-winged bird lying with dark breast
on the waves, abandoned of the sea-breeze within sight
of port, and repelled even by the spicy breath that
comes with a welcome off the shore. She comes from
merry England. She is freighted with more than
merchandise. The home-sick exile will gaze on her
snowy sail as she sets in with the morning breeze, and
bless it; for the wind that first filled it on its way
swept through the green valley of his home! What
links of human affection brings she over the sea? How
much comes in her that is not in her bill of lading,
yet worth, to the heart that is waiting for it, a
thousand
times the purchase of her whole venture!
Mais montons nous!
I hear the small hoofs of
Thalaba; my stanhope waits; we will leave this half
bottle of champagne, that remainder biscuit, and the
echoes of our philosophy, to the Naiads who have lent
us their drawing-room. Undine, or Egeria! Lurly,
or Arethusa! whatever thou art called, nymph of this
shadowy cave! adieu!
Slowly, Thalaba! Tread gingerly down this rocky
descent! So! Here we are on the floor of the vasty
deep! What a glorious race-course! The polished
and printless sand spreads away before you as far as
the eye can see, the surf comes in below, breast-high
ere it breaks, and the white fringe of the sliding wave
shoots up the beach, but leaves room for the marching
of a Persian phalanx on the sands it has deserted.
Oh, how noiselessly runs the wheel, and how dreamily
we glide along, feeling our motion but in the
resistance
of the wind, and by the trout-like pull of the
ribands by the excited animal before us. Mark the
color of the sand! White at high-water-mark, and
thence deepening to a silvery gray as the water has
evaporated lessa slab of Egyptian granite in the
obelisk of St. Peter's not more polished and
unimpressible
.Shell
or rock, weed or quicksand, there is
none; and mar or deface its bright surface as you
will, it is ever beaten down anew, and washed even
of the dust of the foot of man, by the returning sea.
You may write upon its fine-grained face with a
crow-quill
you
may course over its dazzling expanse with
a troop of chariots.
Most wondrous and beautiful of all, within twenty
yards of the surf, or for an hour after the tide has left
the sand, it holds the water without losing its
firmness
,
VOL. I. 9
and is like a gray mirror, bright as the bosom of
the sea. (By your leave, Thalaba!) And now lean
over the dasher, and see those small fetlocks striking
up from beneaththe flying mane, the thorough-bred
action, the small and expressive head, as perfect in
the reflection as in the reality; like Wordsworth's
swan, he
Trots
double,
horse
and shadow.
You would swear you were skimming the surface of
the sea; and the delusion is more complete as the
white foam of the tenth wave skims in beneath
wheel and hoof, and you urge on with the treacherous
element gliding away visibly beneath you.
We seem not to have driven fast, yet three miles,
fairly measured, are left behind, and Thalaba's blood
is up. Fine creature! I would not give him
For the best horse the Sun has in his stable.
We have won champagne ere now, Thalaba and I,
trotting on this silvery beach; and if ever old age
comes on me, and I intend it never shall on aught
save my mortal coil, (my spirit vowed to perpetual
youth,) I think these vital breezes, and a trot on these
exhilarating sands, would sooner renew my prime
than a rock in St. Hilary's cradle, or a dip in the Well
of Kanathos. May we try the experiment together,
gentle reader!
I am not settled in my own mind whether this
description
of one of my favourite haunts in America
was written most to introduce the story that is to
follow
,
or the story to introduce the description.
Possibly
the latter, for having consumed my callow youth
in wandering to and fro in the earth, like Sathanas
of old, and looking on my country now with an eye
from which all the minor and temporary features have
gradually faded, I find my pride in it (after its glory
as a republic) settling principally on the superior
handiwork of Nature in its land and water. When
I talk of it now, it is looking through another's eyes
his who listens. I do not describe it after my own
memory of what it
was once to me
, but according to
my idea of what it will
seem now to a stranger
.
Hence I speak not of the friends I made, rambling by
lake or river. The lake and the river are there, but
the friends are changedto themselves and me. I
speak not of the lovely and loving ones that stood by
me, looking on glen or waterfall. The glen and the
waterfall are romantic still, but the form and the heart
that breathed through it are no longer lovely or
loving
.
I should renew my joys by the old mountain
and river, for, all they ever were I should find them
still, and never seem to myself grown old, or
cankered
of the world, or changed in form or spirit,
while they reminded me but of my youth, with their
familiar sunshine and beauty. But the friends that
I knew
as
I knew themare dead. They look
no longer the same; they have another heart in them;
the kindness of the eye, the smilingness of the lip,
are no more there. Philosophy tells me the material
and living body changes and renews, particle by
particle
,
with time; and Experiencecold-blooded and
stony monitortells me, in his frozen monotone, that
heart and spirit change with it and renew! But the
name remains, mockery that it is! and the memory
sometimes; and so these apparitions of the pastthat
we almost fear to question when they encounter us,
lest the change they have undergone should freeze our
bloodstare coldly on us, yet call us by name, and
answer, though coldly, to their own, and have that
terrible similitude to what they were, mingled with
their unsympathizing and hollow mummery, that we
wish the grave of the past, with all that it contained
of kind or lovely, had been sealed for ever. The
heart we have lain near before our birth (so read I the
book of human life) is the only one that cannot
forget
that it has loved us. Saith well and
affectionately
an American poet, in some birth-day verses to his
mother
Mother! dear mother! the feelings nurst
As I hung at thy bosom,
clung round thee first
'Twas the earliest link in love's warm chain,
'Tis the only one that will long remain;
And as, year by year, and day by day,
Some friend, still trusted, drops away,
Mother! dear mother!
Oh, dost thou see
How the shortened chain brings me nearer thee!
II.
I have observed that of all the friends one has in
the course of his life, the truest and most attached is
exactly the one who, from his dissimilarity to
yourself
,
the world finds it very odd you should fancy.
We hear sometimes of lovers who are made for
each other, but rarely of the same natural match in
friendship. It is no great marvel. In a world like
this, where we pluck so desperately at the fruit of
pleasure, we prefer for company those who are not
formed with precisely the same palate as ourselves.
You will seldom go wrong, dear reader, if you refer
any human question about which you are in doubt to
that icy oracleselfishness.
My shadow for many years was a gentle monster,
whom I have before mentioned, baptized by the name
of
Forbearance Smith
. He was a Vermontese, a
descendant of one of the Puritan pilgrims, and the
first of his family who had left the Green Mountains
since the flight of the regicides to America. We
assimilate
to what we live among, and Forbearance was
very
green
, and very like a
mountain
. He had a
general resemblance to one of Thorwaldsen's
unfinished
Apostleslarger than life, and just hewn into
outline
.
My acquaintance with him commenced during
my first year at the university. He stalked into my
room one morning with a hair-trunk on his back, and
handed me the following note from the tutor:
Sir
,The Faculty have decided to impose upon
you the fine of ten dollars and damages, for painting
the President's horse on Sabbath night while grazing
on the College Green. They, moreover, have removed
Freshman Wilding from your rooms, and appoint as
your future chum the studious and exemplary bearer,
Forbearance Smith, to whom you are desired to show
a becoming respect.
Your obedient servant,
Erasmus Snufflegreek
.
To Freshman Slingsby
.
Rather relieved by my lenient sentence, (for, till the
next shedding of his well-saturated coat, the sky-blue
body and red mane and tail of the President's once
gray mare would interfere with that esteemed animal's
usefulness,) I received Mr. Smith with more politeness
than he expected. He deposited his hair-trunk in the
vacant bed-room, remarked with a good-humoured
smile that it was a cold morning, and seating himself
in my easiest chair, opened his Euclid, and went to
work upon a problem, as perfectly at home as if he
had furnished the room himself, and lived in it from
his matriculation. I had expected some preparatory
apology at least, and was a little annoyed; but being
upon my good behaviour, I bit my lips, and resumed
the Art of Love, upon which I was just then
practising
my nascent Latinity, instead of calculating
logarithms
for recitation. In about an hour, my new chum
9*
suddenly vociferated
Eureka!
shut up his book,
and having stretched himself, (a very unnecessary
operation,) coolly walked to my dressing-table, selected
my best hair-brush, redolent of Macassar, and used it
with the greatest apparent satisfaction.
Have you done with that hair-brush? I asked, as
he laid it in its place again.
Oh yes!
Then, perhaps, you will do me the favour to throw
it out of the window.
He did it without the slightest hesitation. He then
resumed his seat by the fire, and I went on with my
book in silence. Twenty minutes had elapsed,
perhaps
,
when he rose very deliberately, and without a
word of preparation, gave me a cuff that sent me
flying
into the wood-basket in the corner behind me. As
soon as I could pick myself out, I flew upon him, but
I might as well have grappled with a boa-constrictor.
He held me off at arm's length till I was quite
exhausted
with rage, and, at last, when I could struggle
no more, I found breath to ask him what the devil he
meant?
To resent what seemed to me, on reflection, to be
an insult; he answered, in the calmest tone, and
now to ask your pardon for a fault of ignorance. The
first was due to myself, the second to you.
Thenceforth, to the surprise of every body, and
Bob Wilding and the tutor, we were inseparable. I
took Bruin (by a double elision
Forbearance
became
bear
, and by paraphrase
Bruin
, and he answered to
the name)I took him, I say, to the omnium shop, and
presented him with a dressing-case, and other
appliances
for his
outer
man; and as my
inner
man was
relatively as much in need of his assistance, we
mutually
improved. I instructed him in poetry and
politeness
,
and he returned the lesson in problems and
politics. My star was never in more fortunate
conjunction
.
Four years had woven their threads of memory
about us, and there was never woof more free from
blemish. Our friendship was proverbial. All that
much care and Macassar could do for Bruin had been
done, but there was no abating his seven feet of
stature
,
nor reducing the size of his feet proper, nor
making
the muscles of his face answer to their natural
wires. At his most placid smile, a strange waiter
would run for a hot towel and the doctor; (colic was
not more like itself than that like colic;) and for his
motionsoh Lord! a skeleton, with each individual
bone appended to its neighbour with a string, would
execute a
pas seul
with the same expression. His
mind, however, had none of the awkwardness of his
body. A simplicity and truth, amounting to the
greatest
navet
, and a fatuitous unconsciousness of the
effect on beholders of his outer man, were its only
approaches
to fault or foible. With the finest sense of
the beautiful, the most unerring judgment in literary
taste, the purest romance, a fervid enthusiasm,
constancy
,
courage, and good temper, he walked about
the world in a maskan admirable creature, in the
guise and seeming of a ludicrous monster.
Bruin was sensitive on but one point. He never
could forgive his father and mother for the wrong they
had entailed on him at his baptism,
Forbearance
Smith! he would say to himself sometimes in
unconscious
soliloquy, they should have given me the
virtue
as well as the name! And then he would sit
with a pen, and scrawl F. Smith on a sheet of paper
by the hour together. To insist upon knowing his
Christian name was the one impertinence he never
forgave.
III.
My party at Nahant consisted of Thalaba,
Forbearance
,
and myself. The place was crowded, but I
passed
my time very much between my horse and my
friend, and was as certain to be found on the beach
when the tide was down, as the sea to have left the
sands. Job (a synonyme for Forbearance which
became
at this time his common
soubriquet
) was, of
course, in love. Not the least to the prejudice,
however
,
of his last faithful passionfor he was as fond
of the memory of an old love, as he was tender in the
presence of the new. I intended to have had him
dissected
after his death, to see whether his organization
was not peculiar. I strongly incline to the opinion,
that we should have found a mirror in the place of
his heart. Strange! how the same man who is so
fickle in love, will be so constant in friendship! But
is it fickleness? Is it not rather a
superflu
of
tenderness
in the nature, which overflows to all who
approach
the fountain? I have ever observed that the
most susceptible men are the most remarkable for the
finer qualities of character. They are more generous,
more delicate, and of a more chivalrous complexion
altogether
,
than other men. It was surprising how
reasonably
Bruin would argue upon this point. Because I
was happy at Niagara, he was saying one day as we sat
upon the rocks, shall I take no pleasure in the Falls of
Montmorenci? Because the sunset was glorious
yesterday
,
shall I find no beauty in that of to-day? Is my
fancy to be used but once, and the key turned upon it
for ever? Is the heart like a
bon-bon
, to be eaten up
by the first favorite, and thought of no more? Are
our eyes blind, save to one shape of beauty? Are our
ears insensible to the music save of one voice?
But do you not weaken the heart, and become
incapable
of a lasting attachment, by this habit of
inconstancy
?
How long, my dear Phil, will you persist in
talking
as if the heart was material, and held so much
love as a cup so much water, and had legs to be
weary, or organs to grow dull? How is my
sensibility
lessenedhow my capacity enfeebled? What
would I have done for my first love, that I would not
do for my last? I would have sacrificed my life to
secure the happiness of one you wot of in days gone
byI would jump into the sea, if it would make
Blanche Carroll happier to-morrow.
Sautez-donc!
said a thrilling voice behind; and
as if the utterance of her name had conjured her out
of the ground, the object of all Job's admiration, and a
little of my own, stood before us. She had a
work-basket
in her hand, a gipsey-hat tossed carelessly on
her head, and had preceded a whole troop of belles
and matrons, who were coming out to while away the
morning, and breathe the invigorating sea-air on the
rocks.
Blanche Carroll was what the women would call
a little love, but that phrase of endearment would
not at all express the feeling with which she inspired
the men. She was small, and her face and figure
might have been framed in fairy-land for bewitching
beauty; but with the manner of a spoiled child and,
apparently, the most thoughtless playfulness of mind,
she was as veritable a little devil as ever took the
shape of woman. Scarce seventeen at this time, she
had a knowledge of character that was like an
instinct
,
and was an accomplished actress in any part it
was necessary for her purpose to play. No grave
Machiavel ever managed his cards with more finesse
than that little
intriguante
the limited world of which
she was the star. She was a natural masterspirit and
plotter; and the talent that would have employed
itself
in the deeper game of politics, had she been born
a woman of rank in Europe, displayed itself, in the
simple society of a republic, in subduing to her
power every thing in the shape of a single man that
ventured to her net. I have nothing to tell of her at
all commensurate with the character I have drawn,
for the disposal of her own heart (if she has one) must
of course be the most important event of her life; but
I merely pencil the outline of the portrait in passing,
as a specimen of the material that exists, even in the
simplest society, for the
dramatis person
of a court.
We followed the light-footed beauty to the shelter
of one of the caves opening on the sea, and seated
ourselves
about her upon the rocks. Some one proposed
that Job or myself should read.
Oh, Mr. Smith! interrupted the belle, where is
my bracelet? and where are my verses?
At the ball the night before she had dropped a
bracelet in the waltz, and Job had been permitted to
take care of the fragments, on condition of restoring
them, with a sonnet, the next morning. She had just
thought of it.
Read them out! read them out! she cried, as
Job, blushing a deep blue, extracted a tri-cornered
pink document from his pocket, and tried to give it to
her unobserved, with the packet of jewellery. Job
looked at her imploringly, and she took the verses
from his hand, and ran her eye through them.
Pretty well! she said; but the last line might
be improved. Give me a pencil, some one! And
bending over it, till her luxuriant hair concealed her
fairy fingers in their employment, she wrote a
moment
upon her knee, and tossing the paper to me,
bade me read it out with the emendation. Bruin had,
meantime, modestly disappeared, and I read with the
more freedom.
'Twas broken in the gliding dance,
When thou wert in thy dream of power;
When shape and motion, tone and glance,
Were glorious allthe woman's hour!
The light lay soft upon thy brow,
The music melted in thine ear,
And one perhaps forgotten now,
With 'wilder'd thoughts stood list'ning near,
Marvelling not that links of gold
A pulse like thine had not controll'd.
'Tis midnight now. The dance is done,
And thou, in thy soft dreams, asleep,
And I, awake, am gazing on
The fragments given me to keep.
I think of ev'ry glowing vein
That ran beneath these links of gold,
And wonder if a thrill of pain
Made those bright channels ever cold!
With gifts like thine, I cannot think
Grief ever chill'd this broken link.
Good night! 'Tis little now to thee
That in my ear thy words were spoken,
And thou wilt think of them and me
As long as of the bracelet broken.
For thus is riven many a chain
That thou hast fastened but to break,
And thus thou'lt sink to sleep again,
As careless that another wake;
The only thought thy heart can rend
Is
what the fellow 'll charge to mend!
Job's conclusion was more pathetic, but probably
less true. He appeared after the applause had ceased,
and resumed his place at the lady's feet, with a look
in his countenance of having deserved an abatement
of persecution. The beauty spread out the fragments
of the broken bracelet on the rock beside her.
Mr. Smith! said she, in her most conciliating
tone.
Job leaned toward her with a look of devoted
inquiry
.
Has the tide turned?
Certainly. Two hours since.
The beach is passable, then?
Hardly, I fear.
No matter. How many hours' drive is it to
Salem
?
Mr. Slingsby drives it in two.
Then you'll get Mr. Slingsby to lend you his
stanhope, drive to Salem, have this bracelet mended,
and bring it back in time for the ball.
I have spoken
,
as the Grand Turk says.
Allez!
But my dear Miss Carroll
She laid her hand on his mouth as he began to
remonstrate
,
and while I made signs to him to refuse,
she said something to him which I lost in a sudden
dash of the waters. He looked at me for my consent.
Oh! you can have Mr. Slingsby's horse, said the
beauty, as I hesitated whether my refusal would not
check her tyranny, and I'll drive him out this evening
for his reward,
N'est-ce pas?
you cross man!
So, with a sun hot enough to fry the brains in his
skull, and a quivering reflection on the sands that
would burn his face to a blister,
exit
Job, with the
broken bracelet in his bosom.
Stop, Mr. Slingsby, said the imperious little belle,
as I was making up a mouth, after his departure, to
express my disapprobation of her measures, no
lecture
,
if you please. Give me that book of plays, and
I'll read you a precedent. Because you are virtuous,
shall we have no more cakes and ale?
Ecoutez!
And,
with an emphasis and expression that would have
been perfect on the stage, she read the following
passage
from The Careless Husband:
Lady Betty
. The men of sense, my dear, make
the best fools in the world; their sincerity and good
breeding throw them so entirely into one's power, and
give one such an agreeable thirst of using them ill, to
show that power  'tis impossible not to quench it.
Lady Easy
. But, my Lord Morelove
Lady B.
Pooh! my Lord Morelove's a mere
Indian
damaskone can't wear him out; o' my
conscience
,
I must give him to my woman at last. I
begin to be known by him; had I not best leave him
off, my dear?
Lady E.
Why did you ever encourage him?
Lady B.
Why, what would you have one do?
For my part, I could no more choose a man by my
eye than a shoeone must draw them on a little, to
see if they are right to one's foot.
Lady E.
But I'd no more fool on with a man I
could not like, than wear a shoe that pinched me.
Lady B.
Ay; but then a poor wretch tells one
he'll widen 'em, or do any thing, and is so civil and
silly, that one does not know how to turn such a trifle
as a pair of shoes, or a heart, upon a fellow's hands
again.
Lady E.
And there's my Lord Foppington.
Lady B.
My dear! fine fruit will have flies about
it; but, poor things! they do it no harm; for, if you
observe, people are generally most apt to choose that
the flies have been busy with. Ha! ha!
Lady E.
Thou art a strange, giddy creature!
Lady B.
That may be from too much circulation
of thought, my dear!
Pray, Miss Carroll, said I, as she threw aside the
book with a theatrical air, have you any precedent
for broiling a man's brains, as well as breaking his
heart? For, by this time, my friend Forbearance has
a
coup de soleil
, and is hissing over the beach like a
steam-engine.
How tiresome you are! Do you really think it
will kill him?
VOL. I. 10
It might injure him seriouslylet alone the
danger
of driving a spirited horse over the beach, with the
tide quarter-down.
What shall I do to be `taken out of the corner,'
Mr. Slingsby?
Order your horses an hour sooner, and drive to
Lynn, to meet him half way on his return. I will
resume
my stanhope, and give him the happiness of
driving back with you.
And shall I be gentle Blanche Carroll, and no
ogre, if I do?
Yes; Mr. Smith surviving.
Take the trouble to give my orders, then; and
come back immediately, and read to me till it is time
to go. Meantime, I shall look at myself in this black
mirror. And the spoilt, but most lovely girl bent
over a dark pool in the corner of the cave, forming a
picture on its shadowy background that drew a
murmur
of admiration even from the neglected group who
had been the silent and disapproving witnesses of her
caprice.
IV.
A thunder-cloud strode into the sky with the
rapidity
which marks that common phenomenon of a
breathless summer afternoon in America, darkened the
air for a few minutes, so that the birds betook
themselves
to their nests, and then poured out its
refreshing
waters with the most terrific flashes of lightning,
and crashes of thunder, which for a moment seemed to
still even the eternal bass of the sea. With the same
fearful rapidity, the black roof of the sky tore apart, and
fell back, in rolling and changing masses, upon the
horizon; the sun darted with intense brilliancy
through the clarified and transparent air; the
light-stirring
breeze came freighted with delicious coolness;
and the heavy sea-birds, who had lain brooding on
the waves while the tumult of the elements went on,
rose on their scimitar-like wings, and fled away, with
incomprehensible instinct, from the beautiful and
freshened land. The whole face of earth and sky had
been changed in an hour.
Oh, of what fulness of delight are even the senses
capable! What a nerve there is sometimes in every
pore! What love for all living and all inanimate
things may be born of a summer shower! How stirs
the fancy, and brightens hope, and warms the heart,
and sings the spirit within us, at the mere animal joy
with which the lark flees into heaven! And yet, of
this exquisite capacity for pleasure we take so little
care! We refine our taste, we elaborate and finish
our mental perception, we study the beautiful, that
we may know it when it appears,yet the senses by
which these faculties are approached, the stops by
which this fine instrument is played, are trifled with
and neglected. We forget that a single excess blurs
and confuses the music written on our minds; we
forget that an untimely vigil weakens and bewilders
the delicate minister to our inner temple; we know
not, or act as if we knew not, that the fine and
easily-jarred
harmony of health is the only interpreter of
Nature to our souls; in short, we drink too much
claret, and eat too much
pt foie gras
. Do you
understand me,
gourmand et gourmet?
Blanche Carroll was a beautiful whip, and the two
bay ponies in her phaeton were quite aware of it. La
Bruyre says, with his usual wisdom, Une belle
femme qui a les qualits d'un honnte homme est ce
qu'il y a au monde d'un commerce plus dlicieux;
and, to a certain degree, masculine accomplishments
too, are very winning in a womanif pretty; if plain,
she is expected not only to be quite feminine, but
quite perfect. Foibles are as hateful in a woman who
does
not
possess beauty, as they are engaging in a
woman
who
does
. Clouds are only lovely when the
heavens are bright.
She looked loveliest while driving, did Blanche
Carroll, for she was born to rule, and the expression
native to her lip was energy and nerve; and as she
sat with her little foot pressed against the dasher, and
reined in those spirited horses, the finely-pencilled
mouth, usually playful or pettish, was pressed
together
in a curve as warlike as Minerva's, and twice
as captivating. She drove, too, as capriciously as
she acted. At one moment her fleet ponies fled over
the sand at the top of their speed, and at the next they
were brought down to a walk, with a suddenness
which threatened to bring them upon their haunches.
Now far up on the dry sand, cutting a zigzag to
lengthen the way, and again below at the tide edge,
with the waves breaking over her seaward wheel;
all her powers at one instant engrossed in pushing
them to their fastest trot, and in another the reins
lying loose on their backs, while she discussed some
sudden flight of philosophy. Be his fairy, his page,
his every thing that love and poetry have invented,
said Roger Ascham to Lady Jane Grey, just before
her marriage; but Blanche Carroll was almost the
only woman I ever saw capable of the
beau idal
of
fascinating characters.
Between Miss Carroll and myself there was a safe
and cordial friendship. Besides loving another better,
she was neither earnest, nor true, nor affectionate
enough to come at all within the range of my possible
attachments, and though I admired her, she felt that
the necessary sympathy was wanting for love; and,
the idea of fooling me with the rest once abandoned,
we were the greatest of allies. She told me all her
triumphs, and I listened and laughed without thinking
it worth while to burden her with my confidence in
return; and you may as well make a memorandum,
gentle reader, that
that
is a very good basis for a
friendship
.
Nothing bores women or worldly persons so
much as to return their secrets with your own.
As we drew near the extremity of the beach, a boy
rode up on horseback, and presented Miss Carroll with
a note. I observed that it was written on a very dirty
slip of paper, and was waiting to be enlightened as to
its contents, when she slipped it into her belt, took the
whip from the box, and flogging her ponies through
the heavy sand of the outer beach, went off, at a pace
which seemed to engross all her attention, on her road
to Lynn. We reached the hotel and she had not
spoken a syllable, and as I made a point of never
inquiring
into any thing that seemed odd in her conduct,
I merely stole a glance at her face, which wore the
expression of mischievous satisfaction which I liked
the least of its common expressions, and descended
from the phaeton with the simple remark, that Job
could not have arrived, as I saw nothing of my
stanhope
in the yard.
Mr. Slingsby. It was the usual preface to asking
some particular favor.
Miss Carroll.
Will you be so kind as to walk to the library and
select me a book to your own taste, and ask no
questions
as to what I do with myself meantime?
But, my dear Miss Carrollyour father
Will feel quite satisfied when he hears that Cato
was with me. Leave the ponies to the groom, Cato,
and follow me. I looked after her as she walked
down the village street with the old black behind her,
not at all certain of the propriety of my acquiescence,
but feeling that there was no help for it.
10*
I lounged away a half hour at the library, and found
Miss Carroll waiting for me on my return. There
were no signs of Bruin; and as she seemed impatient
to be off, I jumped into the phaeton, and away we flew
to the beach as fast as her ponies could be driven
under the whip. As we descended upon the sands
she spoke for the first time.
It is
so
civil of you to ask no questions, Mr.
Slingsby
;
but you are
not
offended with me?
If you have got into no scrape while under my
charge, I shall certainly be too happy to shake hands
upon it to-morrow.
Are you
quite
sure? she asked archly.
Quite sure.
So am
not
I, she said with a merry laugh; and
in her excessive amusement she drove down to the sea,
till the surf broke over the nearest pony's back, and
filled the bottom of the phaeton with water. Our wet
feet were now a fair apology for haste, and taking the
reins from her, I drove rapidly home, while she
wrapped
herself in her shawl, and sat apparently absorbed
in the coming of the twilight over the sea.
V.
I slept late after the ball, though I had gone to bed
exceedingly anxious about Bruin, who had not yet
made his appearance. The tide would prevent his
crossing the beach after ten in the morning, however,
and I made myself tolerably easy till the sands were
passable with the evening ebb. The high-water mark
was scarcely deserted by the waves, when the same
boy who had delivered the note to Miss Carroll the
day before, rode up from the beach on a panting horse,
and delived me the following note:
Dear Philip
,You will be surprised to hear
that I am in the Lynn gaol on a charge of theft and
utterance of counterfeit money. I do not wait to tell
you the particulars. Please come and identify
Your's truly,
F.
Smith
.
I got upon the boy's horse, and hurried over the
beach with whip and spur. I stopped at the justice's
office, and that worthy seemed uncommonly pleased
to see me.
We have got him, sir, said he.
Got whom? I asked rather shortly.
Why, the fellow that stole your stanhope and Miss
Carroll's bracelet, and passed a twenty dollar
counterfeit
billhan't you hear
n
on't?
The justice's incredulity, when I told him it was
probably the most intimate friend I had in the world,
would have amused me at any other time.
Will you allow me to see the prisoner? I
asked.
Be sure I will. I let Miss Carroll have a peep at
him yesterday, and what do you think? Oh Lord!
he wanted to make her believe she knew him! Good!
wasn't it? Ha! ha! And
such
an ill-looking
fellow
!
Why, I'd know him for a thief any where!
Your
intimate friend, Mr. Slingsby! Oh, Lord!
when you come to see him! Ha! ha!
We were at the prison-door. The grating bolts
turned slowly, the door swung rustily on its hinges as
if it was not often used, and in the next minute I was
enfolded in Job's arms, who sobbed and laughed, and
was quite hysterical with his delight. I scarce
wondered
at the justice's prepossessions when I looked at
the figure he made. His hat knocked in, his coat
muddy
,
his hair full of the dust of strawthe natural
hideousness of poor Job had every possible
aggravation
.
We were in the stanhope, and fairly on the beach,
before he had sufficiently recovered to tell me the story.
He had arrived quite overheated at Lynn, but, in a
hurry to execute Miss Carroll's commission, he merely
took a glass of soda-water, had Thalaba's mouth
washed
,
and drove on. A mile on his way, he was
overtaken
by a couple of ostlers on horseback, who very
roughly ordered him back to the inn. He refused, and
a fight ensued, which ended in his being tied into the
stanhope, and driven back as a prisoner. The large
note, which he had given for his soda-water, it
appeared
,
was a counterfeit, and placards, offering a
reward
for the detection of a villain, described in the
usual manner as an ill-looking fellow, had been
sticking
up for some days in the village. He was taken
before the justice, who declared at first sight that he
answered the description in the advertisement. His
stubborn refusal to give the whole of his name, (he
would rather have died, I suppose,) his possession of
my stanhope, which was immediately recognised, and
lastly, the bracelet found in his pocket, of which he
refused indignantly to give any account, were
circumstances
enough to leave no doubt on the mind of the
worthy justice. He made out his
mittimus
forthwith,
granting Job's request that he might be allowed to
write a note to Miss Carroll, (who, he knew, would
drive over the beach toward evening,) as a very great
favour. She arrived as he expected.
And what in heaven's name did she say? said I,
interested beyond my patience at this part of the story.
Expressed the greatest astonishment when the
justice showed her the bracelet, and declared she
never
saw me before in her life!
That Job forgave Blanche Carroll in two days, and
gave her a pair of gloves with some verses on the
third, will surprise only those who have not seen that
lady. It would seem incredible, but here are the
verses, as large as life:
Slave of the snow-white hand! I fold
My spirit in thy fabric fair;
And when that dainty hand is cold,
And rudely comes the wintry air,
Press in thy light and straining form
Those slender fingers soft and warm;
And, as the fine-traced veins within
Quicken their bright and rosy flow,
And gratefully the dewy skin
Clings to the form that warms it so,
Tell her my heart is hiding there,
Trembling to be so closely prest,
Yet feels how brief its moments are,
And saddens even to be blest
Fated to serve her for a day,
And then, like thee,
be flung away
.
EDITH LINSEY.
PART I.
FROST AND FLIRTATION.
Oh yesfor you're in love with
me!
(I'm very glad of it, I'm sure;)
But then you are not rich, you see,
And Iyou know I'm very poor!
'Tis true that I can drive a tandem
'Tis true that I can turn a sonnet
'Tis true I leave the law at random,
When I should studyplague upon it!
But this is notexcuse me!my!
(A thing they give for house and land;)
And we must eat in matrimony
And love is neither bread nor honey
And soyou understand?
Thou art spotless as the snow, lady mine, lady mine!
Thou art spotless as the snow, lady mine!
But the noon will have its ray,
And snow-wreaths melt away
And heartswhy should not they?
Why not thine?
It
began to snow. The air softened; the pattering of
the horses' hoofs was muffled with the impeded
vibration
;
the sleigh glided on with a duller sound; the
large loose flakes fell soft and fast, and the low and
just audible murmur, like the tread of a fairy host,
melted on the ear with a drowsy influence, as if it
were a descent of palpable sleep upon the earth. You
may talk of falling waterof the running of a brook
of the humming song of an old crone on a sick
vigilor of the
levi susurro
of the bees of Hybla,
but there is nothing like the falling of the snow for
soft and soothing music. You hear it or not as you
will, but it melts into your soul unaware. If you have
ever a heart-ache, or feel the need of poppy or
mandragora, or, like myself, grow sometimes a-weary
of the stale repetitions of this unvaried world, seek
me out in Massachusetts, when the wind softens and
veers south, after a frostsay in January. There
shall have been a long-lying snow on the ground,
well-trodden
.
The road shall be as smooth as the paths
to our first sinsof a seeming perpetual declivity, as
it wereand never a jolt or jar between us and the
edge of the horizon; but all onward and down
apparently
,
with an insensible ease. You sit beside me in
my spring-sleigh, hung with the lightness of a
cobweb
cradle for a fairy's child in the trees. One horse
is, in the harness, of a swift and even pace, and around
his neck is a string of fine, small bells, that ring to his
measured step in a kind of muffled music, softer and
softer as the snow-flakes thicken in the air. Your
seat is of the shape of the
fauteuil
in your library,
cushioned and deep, and with a backward and gentle
slope, and you are enveloped to the eye-lids in warm
furs. You settle down, with every muscle in repose,
the visor of your ermine cap just shedding the snow
from your forehead, and with a word, the groom
stands back, and the horse speeds on, steady, but
beautifully
fast. The bells, which you hear loudly at first,
begin to deaden, and the low hum of the alighting
flakes steals gradually on your ear; and soon the
hoof-strokes
VOL. I. 11
are as silent as if the steed were shod with
wool, and away you flee through the white air, like
birds asleep upon the wing diving through the feathery
fleeces of the moon. Your eye-lids fallforgetfulness
steals upon the sensesa delicious torpor takes
possession
of the uneasy bloodand brain and thought
yield to an intoxicating and trance-like slumber. It
were perhaps too much to ask that any human bosom
may go scathless to the grave; but in my own
unworthy
petitions I usually supplicate that my heart
may be broken about Christmas. I know an anodyne
o' that season.
Fred Fleming and I occupied one of the seven long
seats in a stage-sleigh, flying at this time twelve miles
in the hour, (yet not fast enough for our impatience,)
westward from the University gates. The sleighing
had been perfect for a week, and the cold keen air had
softened for the first time that morning, and assumed
the warm and woolly complexion that foretokened
snow. Though not very cheerful in its aspect, this
is an atmosphere particularly pleasant to breathe, and
Fred, who was making his first move after a six
weeks' fever, sat with the furs away from his mouth,
nostrils expanded, lips parted, and the countenance
altogether of a man in a high state of physical
enjoyment
.
I had nursed him through his illness, by the
way, in my own rooms, and hence our position as
fellow-travellers. A pressing invitation from his
father to come home with him to Skaneateles, for the
holidays, had diverted me from my usual winter
journey
to the North; and for the first time in my life, I
was going upon a long visit to a strange roof. My
imagination had never more business upon its hands.
Fred had described to me, over and over again,
every person I was to meet, brothers, sisters, aunts,
cousins, and friendsa household of thirty people,
guests included; but there was one person among
them of whom his descriptions, amplified as they
were, were very unsatisfactory.
Is she so
very
plain? I asked for the twentieth
time.
Abominably!
And immense black eyes?
Saucers!
And large mouth?
Huge!
And very dark?
Like a squaw!
And skinny hands, did you say?
Lean, long, and pokerish!
And so
very
clever?
Knows every thing, Phil!
But a sweet voice?
Um! every body says so.
And high temper?
She's the devil, Phil! don't ask any more
questions
about her.
You don't like her then?
She never condescends to speak to me; how
should I?
And thereupon I put my head out of the sleigh, and
employed myself with catching the snow-flakes on my
nose, and thinking whether Edith Linsey would like
me or no; for through all Fred's derogatory
descriptions
,
it was clearly evident that she was the ruling
spirit of the hospitable household of the Flemings.
As we got farther on, the new snow became deeper,
and we found that the last storm had been heavier
here than in the country from which we had come.
The occasional farm-houses were almost wholly
buried, the black chimney alone appearing above the
ridgy drifts, while the tops of the doors and windows
lay below the level of the trodden road, from which a
descending passage was cut to the threshhold, like the
entrance to a cave in the earth. The fences were
quite invisible. The fruit-trees looked diminished to
shrubberies of snow-flowers, their trunks buried under
the visible surface, and their branches loaded with the
still falling flakes, till they bent beneath the burden.
Nothing was abroad, for nothing could stir out of the
road without danger of being lost, and we dreaded to
meet even a single sleigh, lest in turning out, the
horses should slump beyond their depth, in the
untrodden
drifts. The poor animals began to labour
severely
,
and sunk at every step over their knees in the
clogging and wool-like substance; and the long and
cumbrous sleigh rose and fell in the deep pits like a
boat in a heavy sea. It seemed impossible to get on.
Twice we brought up with a terrible plunge and stood
suddenly still, for the runners had struck in too deep
for the strength of the horses; and with the
snow-shovels
,
which formed a part of the furniture of the
vehicle, we dug them from their concrete beds. Our
progress at last was reduced to scarce a mile in the
hour, and we began to have apprehensions that our
team would give out between the post-houses.
Fortunately
it was still warm, for the numbness of cold
would have paralyzed our already flagging exertions.
We had reached the summit of a long hill with the
greatest difficulty. The poor beasts stood panting and
reeking with sweat; the runners of the sleigh were
clogged with hard cakes of snow, and the air was
close and dispiriting. We came to a stand-still, with
the vehicle lying over almost on its side, and I stepped
out to speak to the driver and look forward. It was
a discouraging prospect; a long deep valley lay before
us, closed at the distance of a couple of miles by
another
steep hill, through a cleft in the top of which lay
our way. We could not even distinguish the line of
the road between. Our disheartened animals stood at
this moment buried to their breasts, and to get forward
without rearing at every step seemed impossible. The
driver sat on his box looking uneasily down into the
valley. It was one undulating ocean of snow, not a
sign of a human habitation to be seen, and even the
trees indistinguishable from the general mass, by their
whitened and overladen branches. The storm had
ceased, but the usual sharp cold that succeeds a warm
fall of snow had not yet lightened the clamminess of
the new-fallen flakes, and they clung around the foot
like clay, rendering every step a toil.
Your leaders are quite blown, I said to the driver,
as he slid off his uncomfortable seat.
Pretty nearly, sir.
And your wheelers are not much better.
Sc
a
'cely.
And what do you think of the weather?
It'll be darnation cold in an hour. As he spoke
he looked up to the sky, which was already peeling
off its clouds in long stripes, like the skin of an orange,
and looked as hard and cold as marble between the
widening rifts. A sudden gust of a more chilling
temperature followed immediately upon his prediction,
and the long cloth curtains of the sleigh flew clear of
their slight pillars, and shook off their fringes of icicles.
Could you shovel a little, Mister? said the driver,
handing me one of the broad wooden utensils from his
foot-board, and commencing himself, after having
thrown off his box-coat, by heaving up a solid cake of
the moist snow at the side of the road.
It's just to make a place to rub down them creturs,
said he, as I looked at him, quite puzzled to know
what he was going to do.
Fred was too weak to assist us, and having righted
11*
the vehicle a little, and tied down the flapping
curtains
,
he wrapped himself in his cloak, and I set
heartily
to work with my shovel. In a few minutes, taking
advantage of the hollow of a drift, we had cleared a
small area of frozen ground, and releasing the tired
animals from their harness, we rubbed them well down
with the straw from the bottom of the sleigh. The
persevering driver then cleared the runners of their
iced and clinging masses, and a half hour having
elapsed, he produced two bottles of rum from his box,
and, giving each of the horses a dose, put them again
to their traces.
We heaved out of the pit into which the sleigh had
settled, and for the first mile it was down hill, and
we got on with comparative ease. The sky was by
this time almost bare, a dark, slaty mass of clouds
alone settling on the horizon in the quarter of the
wind, while the sun, as powerless as moonlight,
poured with dazzling splendor on the snow, and the
gusts came keen and bitter across the sparkling waste,
rimming the nostrils as if with bands of steel, and
penetrating to the innermost nerve, with their
pungent
iciness. No protection seemed of any avail.
The whole surface of the body ached as if it were
laid against a slab of ice. The throat closed
instinctively
,
and contracted its unpleasant respiration
the body and limbs drew irresistibly together, to
economize
,
like a hedge-hog, the exposed surfacethe hands
and feet felt transmuted to leadand across the
forehead
,
below the pressure of the cap, there was a
binding and oppressive ache, as if a bar of frosty
iron had been let into the skull. The mind,
meantime
,
seemed freezing upunwillingness to stir, and
inability to think of any thing but the cold, becoming
every instant more decided.
From the bend of the valley our difficulties became
more serious. The drifts often lay across the road
like a wall, some feet above the heads of the horses,
and we had dug through one or two, and had been
once upset, and often near it, before we came to the
steepest part of the ascent. The horses had by this
time begun to feel the excitement of the rum, and
bounded on through the snow with continual leaps,
jerking the sleigh after them with a violence that
threatened momently to break the traces. The steam
from their bodies froze instantly, and covered them
with a coat like hoar-frost, and spite of their heat,
and the unnatural and violent exertions they were
making, it was evident by the pricking of their ears,
and the sudden crouch of the body when a stronger
blast swept over, that the cold struck through even
their hot and intoxicated blood.
We toiled up, leap after leap, and it seemed
miraculous
to me that the now infuriated animals did not
burst a blood-vessel or crack a sinew with every one
of those terrible springs. The sleigh plunged on
after them, stopping dead and short at every other
moment, and reeling over the heavy drifts, like a boat
in a surging sea. A finer crystallization had
meantime
taken place upon the surface of the moist snow,
and the powdered particles flew almost insensibly on
the blasts of wind, filling the eyes and hair, and
cutting
the skin with a sensation like the touch of
needle-points
.
The driver and his maddened but almost
exhausted team were blinded by the glittering and
whirling eddies, the cold grew intenser every
moment
,
the forward motion gradually less and less, and
when, with the very last effort apparently, we
reached
a spot on the summit of the hill, which, from its
exposed situation, had been kept bare by the wind,
the patient and persevering whip brought his horses
to a stand, and despaired, for the first time, of his
prospects
of getting on. I crept out of the sleigh, the
iron-bound runners of which now grated on the bare
ground, but found it impossible to stand upright.
If you can use your hands, said the driver,
turning his back to the wind which stung the face
like the lash of a whip, I'll trouble you to untackle
them horses.
I set about it, while he buried his hands and face
in the snow to relieve them for a moment from the
agony of cold. The poor animals staggered stiffly as
I pushed them aside, and every vein stood out from
their bodies like ropes under the skin.
What are you going to do? I asked, as he joined
me again, and taking off the harness of one of the
leaders, flung it into the snow.
Ride for life! was his ominous answer.
Good God! and what is to become of my sick
friend?
The Almighty knowsif he can't ride to the
tavern!
I sprang instantly to poor Fred, who was lying in
the bottom of the sleigh almost frozen to death,
informed
him of the driver's decision, and asked him if
he thought he could ride one of the horses. He was
beginning to grow drowsy, the first symptom of death
by cold, and could with difficulty be roused. With
the driver's assistance, however, I lifted him out of the
sleigh, shook him soundly, and making stirrups of the
traces, set him upon one of the horses, and started
him off before us. The poor beasts seemed to have a
presentiment of the necessity of exertion, and though
stiff and sluggish, entered willingly upon the deep
drift which blocked up the way, and toiled exhaustedly
on. The cold in our exposed position was agonizing.
Every small fibre in the skin of my own face felt
splitting and cracked, and my eyelids seemed made of
ice. Our limbs soon lost all sensation. I could only
press with my knees to the horse's side, and the whole
collected energy of my frame seemed expended in the
exertion. Fred held on wonderfully. The driver had
still the use of his arm, and rode behind, flogging the
poor animals on, whose every step seemed to be the
last summons of energy. The sun set, and it was
rather a relief, for the glitter upon the snow was
exceedingly
painful to the sight, and there was no
warmth in its beams. I could see my poor friend
drooping gradually to the neck of his horse, but until
he should drop off it was impossible to assist him, and
his faithful animal still waded on. I felt my own
strength fast ebbing away. If I had been alone, I
should certainly have lain down, with the almost
irresistible
inclination to sleep, but the thought of my
friend, and the shouting of the energetic driver,
nerved me from time to time, and with hands hanging
helplessly down, and elbows fastened convulsively to
my side, we plunged and struggled painfully forward.
I but remember being taken afterwards to a fire, and
shrinking from it with a shriekthe suffering of
reviving
consciousness was so intolerable. We had
reached the tavern literally frozen upon our horses.
II.
I was balancing my spoon on the edge of a cup at
the breakfast table, the morning after our arrival, when
Fred stopped in the middle of an eulogium on my
virtues
as a nurse, and a lady entering at the same
moment
,
he said simply in parenthesis, My cousin Edith,
Mr. Slingsby, and went on with his story. I rose
and bowed, and as Fred had the
parole
, I had time to
collect my courage, and take a look at the enemy's
campfor, of that considerable household, I felt my
star to be in conjunction or opposition with hers, only
who was at that moment my
vis--vis
across a dish of
stewed oysters.
In about five minutes of rapid mental portrait
painting
,
I had taken a likeness of Edith Linsey, which I
see at this moment, (I have carried it about the world
for ten years,) as distinctly as the incipient lines of age
in this thin-wearing hand. My feelings changed in
that time from dread or admiration, or something
between
these, to pity; she was so unscrupulously and
hopelessly plainso wretchedly ill and suffering in
her aspectso spiritless and unhappy in every motion
and look. I'll win her heart, thought I, by being
kind to her. Poor thing! it will be something new to
her, I dare say! Oh, Philip Slingsby! what a
doomed
donkey thou wert for that silly soliloquy.
And yet even as she sat there, leaning over her
untasted
breakfast, listless, ill, and melancholywith her
large mouth, her protruding eyes, her dead and sallow
complexion, and not one redeeming featurethere was
something in her face which produced a phantom of
beauty in my minda glimpse, a shadowing of a
countenance
that Beatrice Cenci might have worn at her
last innocent orisona loveliness moulded and
exalted
by superhuman and overpowering mindinstinct
through all its sweetness with energy and fire. So
strong was this phantom portrait, that in all my thoughts
of her as an angel in heaven, (for I supposed her dying
for many a month, and a future existence was her own
most frequent theme,) she always rose to my fancy
with a face half Niobe, half Psyche, radiantly lovely.
And this, too with a face of her own, a
bon fide
physiognomy
,
that must have made a mirror an
unpleasant
article of furniture in her chamber.
I have no suspicion in my own mind, whether Time
was drunk or sober during the succeeding week of
those Christmas holidays. The second Saturday had
come round, and I just remember that Fred was very
much out of humour with me for having appeared to
his friends to be every thing he had said I was
not
, and
nothing he had said I
was
. He had described me as the
most uproarious, noisy, good-humoured, and agreeable
dog in the world. And I was not that at all
particularly
the last. The old judge told him he had not
improved in his penetration at the University.
A week! and what a life had been clasped within
its brief calendar, for me! Edith Linsey was two
years older than I, and I was considered a boy. She
was thought to be dying slowly, but irretrievably, of
consumption; and it was little matter whom she loved,
or how. They would only have been pleased, if, by
a new affection, she could beguile the preying
melancholy
of illness; for by that gentle name they called,
in their kindness, a caprice and a bitterness of
character
that, had she been less a sufferer, would not have
been endured for a day. But she was not capricious,
or bitter to
me!
Oh no! And from the very extreme
of her impatience with othersfrom her rudeness, her
violence, her sarcasmshe came to me with a heart
softer than a child's, and wept upon my hands, and
weighed every word that might give me offence, and
watched to anticipate my lightest wish, and was
humble
,
and generous, and passionately loving and
dependant
.
Her heart sprang to me with a rebound. She
gave herself up to me with an utter and desperate
abandonment, that owed something to her peculiar
character, but more to her own solemn conviction that
she was dyingthat her best hope of life was not
worth a week's purchase.
We had begun with books, and upon them her past
enthusiasm had hitherto been released. She loved her
favourite authors with a passion. They had relieved
her heart; and there was nothing of poetry or
philosophy
that was deep or beautiful, in which she had not
steeped her very soul. How well I remember her
repeating
to me from Shelley, those glorious lines to the
soaring swan
Thou hast a home,
Beautiful bird! Thou voyagest to thine home
Where thy sweet mate will twine her downy neck
With thine, and welcome thy return with eyes
Bright with the lustre of their own fond joy!
And what am I, that I should linger here,
With voice far sweeter than thy dying notes,
Spirit more vast than thine, frame more attuned
To beauty, wasting these surpassing powers
To the deaf air, to the blind earth, and heaven
That echoes not my thoughts!
There was a long room in the southern wing of
the house, fitted up as a library. It was a
heavily-curtained
,
dim old place, with deep-embayed windows,
and so many nooks, and so much furniture, that there
was that hushed air, that absence of echo within it,
which is the great charm of a haunt for study or
thought. It was Edith's kingdom. She might lock
the door, if she pleased, or shut or open the windows;
in short, when she was there, no one thought of
disturbing
her, and she was like a spirit in its cell,
invisible
and inviolate. And here I drank into my very
life and soul the outpourings of a bosom that had been
locked till (as we both thought) the last hour of its
life,a flow of mingled intellect and passion that
overran
my heart like lava, sweeping every thing into its
resistless fire, and (may God forgive her!) leaving it
scorched and desolate when its mocking brightness
had gone out.
I remember that EliaCharles Lamb's Elia
was the favourite of favourites among her books; and
partly that the late death of this most-to-be-loved author
reminded me to look it up, and partly to have time to
draw back my indifference over a subject that it
something
stirs me to recall, you shall read an imitation
(or continuation, if you will,) that I did for Edith's eye,
of his Essay on Books and Reading. I sat with
her dry and fleshless hand in mine while I read it to
her, and the fingers of Pysche were never fairer to
Canova
than they to me.
It is a little singular, I began, (looking into her
eyes as long as I could remember what I had written,)
that, among all the elegancies of sentiment for which
the age is remarkable, no one should ever have thought
of writing a book upon `Reading.' The refinements
of the true epicure in books are surely as various as
those of the gastronome and the opium-eater; and I
can conceive of no reason why a topic of such natural
occurrence should have been so long neglected, unless
it is that the taste itself, being rather a growth of
indolence
,
has never numbered among its votaries one of
the busy craft of writers.
The great proportion of men read, as they eat, for
hunger. I do not consider them readers. The true
secret of the thing is no more adapted to their
comprehension
,
than the sublimations of Louis Eustache Ude
for the taste of a day-labourer. The refined
reading-taste
,
like the palate of
gourmanderie
, must have got
beyond appetitegross appetite. It shall be that of a
man who, having fed through childhood and youth on
simple knowledge, values now only, as it were, the
apotheosis of learningthe spiritual
nare
. There
are, it is true, instances of a keen natural relish: a boy
as you will sometimes find one, of a premature
thoughtfulness
,
will carry a favourite author in his bosom, and
feast greedily on it in his stolen hours. Elia tells the
exquisite story:
`I saw a boy, with eager eye,
Open a book upon a stall,
And read as he'd devour it all;
VOL. I. 12
Which, when the stall-man did espy,
Soon to the boy I heard him call,
`You Sir, you never buy a book,
Therefore in one you shall not look!'
The boy pass'd slowly on, and with a sigh,
He wish'd he never had been taught to read,
Then of the old churl's books he should have had no need.'
The pleasure as well as the profit of reading
depends
as much upon time and manner, as upon the
book. The mind is an opalchanging its colour
with every shifting shade. Ease of position is
especially
necessary. A muscle strained, a nerve
unpoised
,
an admitted sunbeam caught upon a mirror, are
slight circumstances; but a feather may tickle the
dreamer from paradise to earth. `Many a froward
axiom,' says a refined writer, `many an inhumane
thought hath arisen from sitting uncomfortably, or
from a want of symmetry in your chamber.' Who
has not felt, at times, an unnaccountable disrelish for
a favourite author? Who has not, by a sudden noise
in the street, been startled from a reading dream, and
found, afterwards, that the broken spell was not to
be re-wound? An ill-tied cravat may unlink the rich
harmonies of Taylor. You would not think Barry
Cornwall the delicious heart he is, reading him in a
tottering chair.
There is much in the mood with which you come
to a book. If you have been vexed out of doors, the
good-humour of an author seems unnatural. I think
I should scarce relish the `gentle spiriting' of Ariel
with a pulse of ninety in the minute. Or if I had
been touched by the unkindness of a friend, Jack
Falstaff would not move me to laughter as easily as
he is wont. There are tones of the mind, however,
to which a book will vibrate with a harmony than
which there is nothing more exquisite in Nature. To
go abroad at sunrise in June, and admit all the holy
influences of the hourstillness, and purity, and
balmto a mind subdued and dignified, as the mind
will be by the sacred tranquillity of sleep, and then to
come in with bathed and refreshed senses, and a
temper
of as clear joyfulness as the soaring lark's, and
sit down to Milton, or Spenser, or, almost loftier still,
the divine `Prometheus' of Shelley, has seemed to
me a harmony of delight almost too heavenly to be
human. The great secret of such pleasure is
sympathy
.
You must climb to the eagle poet's eyrie. You
must have senses, like his, for the music that is only
audible to the fine ear of thought, and the beauty that
is visible only to the spirit-eye of a clear and, for the
time, unpolluted fancy. The stamp and pressure of
the magician's own time and season must be upon
you. You would not read Ossian, for example, in a
bath, or sitting under a tree in a sultry noon; but
after rushing into the eye of the wind with a fleet
horse, with all his gallant pride and glorious strength
and fire obedient to your rein, and so mingling, as it
will, with his rider's consciousness, that you feel as
if you were gifted in your own body with the
swiftness
and energy of an angel;after this, to sit down
to Ossian, is to read him with a magnificence of
delusion
,
to my mind scarce less than reality. I never
envied Napoleon till I heard it was his habit, after a
battle, to read Ossian.
You cannot often read to music. But I love,
when the voluntary is pealing in church,every
breath in the congregation suppressed, and the
deep-volumed
notes pouring through the arches of the
roof with the sublime and almost articulate praise
of the organ,to read, from the pew Bible, the book
of Ecclesiastes. The solemn stateliness of its periods
is fitted to music like a hymn. It is to me a spring of
the most thrilling devotion,though I shame to
confess
that the richness of its Eastern imagery, and,
above all, the inimitable beauty of its philosophy,
stand out somewhat definitely in the reminiscences of
the hour.
A taste for reading comes comparatively late.
`Robinson Crusoe' will turn a boy's head at ten.
The `Arabian Nights' are taken to bed with us at
twelve. At fourteen, a forward boy will read the
`Lady of the Lake,' `Tom Jones,' and `Peregrine
Pickle;' and at seventeen (not before) he is ready for
Shakspeare, and, if he is of a thoughtful turn, Milton.
Most men do not read these last with a true relish till
after this period. The hidden beauties of standard
authors break upon the mind by surprise. It is like
discovering a secret spring in an old jewel. You take
up the book in an idle moment, as you have done a
thousand times before, perhaps wondering, as you
turn over the leaves, what the world finds in it to
admire
,
when suddenly, as you read, your fingers press
close upon the covers, your frame thrills, and the
passage
you have chanced upon chains you like a spell,
it is so vividly true and beautiful. Milton's `
Comus'
flashed upon me in this way. I never could
read the `Rape of the Lock' till a friend quoted some
passages from it during a walk. I know no more
exquisite
sensation than this warming of the heart to an
old author; and it seems to me that the most delicious
portion of intellectual existence is the brief period in
which, one by one, the great minds of old are
admitted
with all their time-mellowed worth to the
affections
.
With what delight I read, for the first time,
the `kind-hearted plays' of Beaumont and Fletcher!
How I doated on Burton! What treasures to me were
the `Fairy Queen' and the Lyrics of Milton!
I used to think, when studying the Greek and
Latin poets in my boyhood, that to be made a
school-author
was a fair offset against immortality. I would
as lief, it seemed to me, have my verses handed down
by the town-crier. But latterly, after an interval of a
few years, I have taken up my classics (the identical
school copies with the hard places all thumbed and
pencilled) and have read them with no little pleasure.
It is not to be believed with what a satisfaction the
riper eye glides smoothly over the once difficult line,
finding the golden cadence of poetry beneath what
once seemed only a tangled chaos of inversion. The
associations of hard study, instead of reviving the old
distaste, added wonderfully to the interest of a
reperusal
.
I could see now what brightened the sunken
eye of the pale and sickly master, as he took up the
hesitating passage, and read on, forgetful of the
delinquent
,
to the end. I could enjoy now, what was a
dead letter to me then, the heightened fulness of
Herodotus
,
and the strong-woven style of Thucydides,
and the magnificent invention of Eschylus. I took
an aversion to Homer from hearing a classmate in the
next room scan it perpetually through his nose.
There is no music for me in the `Iliad.' But, spite of
the recollections scored alike upon my palm and the
margin, I own to an Augustan relish for the smooth
melody of Virgil, and freely forgive the sometime
troublesome ferule,enjoying by its aid the raciness
of Horace and Juvenal, and the lofty philosophy of
Lucretius. It will be a dear friend to whom I put
down in my will that self of defaced classics.
There are some books that bear reading pleasantly
once a year. `Tristram Shandy' is an annual with
me. I read him regularly about Christmas. Jeremy
Taylor (not to mingle things holy and profane) is a
good table-book, to be used when you would collect
your thoughts and be serious a while. A man of
taste need never want for Sunday reading while he
12*
can find the Sermons of Taylor, and South, and
Fuller
writers
of good theological reputethough,
between
ourselves, I think one likelier to be delighted
with the poetry and quaint fancifulness of their style,
than edified by the piety it covers. I like to have a
quarto edition of Sir Thomas Brown on a near shelf,
or Milton's Prose Works, or Bacon. These are
healthful moods of the mind when lighter nutriment
is distasteful.
I am growing fastidious in poetry, and confine
myself more and more to the old writers. Castaly of
late runs shallow. Shelley's (peace to his passionate
heart!) was a deep draught, and Wordsworth and
Wilson sit near the well, and Keats and Barry
Cornwall
have been to the fountain's lip, feeding their
imaginations, (the latter his
heart
as well,) but they
have brought back little for the world. The `small
silver stream' will, I fear, soon cease to flow down to
us, and as it dries back to its source, we shall close
nearer and nearer upon the `pure English undefiled.'
The dabblers in muddy waters (tributaries to Lethe)
will have Parnassus to themselves.
The finest pleasures of reading come unbidden.
You cannot, with your choicest appliances for the
body, always command the many-toned mind. In the
twilight alcove of a library, with a time-mellowed
chair yielding luxuriously to your pressure, a June
wind laden with idleness and balm floating in at the
window, and in your hand some Russia-bound
rambling
old author, as Izaak Walton, good-humoured and
quaint, one would think the spirit could scarce fail to
be conjured. Yet often, after spending a morning
hour restlessly thus, I have risen with my mind
unhinged
,
and strolled off with a book in my pocket to
the woods; and, as I live, the mood has descended
upon me under some chance tree; with a crooked root
under my head, and I have lain there, reading and
sleeping by turns, till the letters were blurred in the
dimness of twilight. It is the evil of refinement that
it breeds caprice. You will sometimes stand
unfatigued
for hours on the steps of a library; or in a
shop, the eye will be arrested, and all the jostling of
customers and the looks of the jealous shopman will
not divert you till you have read out the chapter.
I do not often indulge in the supernatural, for I am
an unwilling believer in ghosts, and the topic excites
me. But, for its connexion with the subject upon
which I am writing, I must conclude these rambling
observations with a late mysterious visitation of my
own.
I had, during the last year, given up the early
summer tea-parties common in the town in which the
University stands; and having, of course, three or
four more hours than usual on my hands, I took to an
afternoon habit of imaginative reading. Shakspeare
came first, naturally; and I feasted for the hundreth
time upon what I think his (and the world's) most
delicate creationthe `Tempest.' The twilight of
the first day overtook me at the third act, where the
banquet is brought in with solemn music by the fairy
troop of Prospero, and set before the shipwrecked king
and his followers. I closed the book, and, leaning
back in my chair, abandoned myself to the crowd of
images which throng always upon the traces of
Shakspeare
.
The
fancy
music was still in my mind, when
an apparently
real
strain of the most solemn melody
came to my ear, dying, it seemed to me, as it reached
it, the tones were so expiringly faint and low. I was
not startled, but lay quietly, holding my breath, and
more fearing when the strain would be broken, than
curious whence it came. The twilight deepened, till
it was dark, and it still played on, changing the tune
at intervals, but always of the same melancholy
sweetness
;
till, by-and-by, I lost all curiosity, and, giving
in to the charm, the scenes I had been reading began
to form again in my mind, and Ariel, with his delicate
ministers, and Prospero, and Miranda, and Caliban,
came moving before me to the measure, as bright and
vivid as the reality. I was disturbed in the midst of
it by Alfonse, who came in at the usual hour with my
tea; and, on starting to my feet, I listened in vain for
the continuance of the music. I sat thinking of it
awhile, but dismissed it at last, and went out to enjoy,
in a solitary walk, the loveliness of the summer night.
The next day I resumed my book, with a smile at my
previous credulity, and had read through the last
scenes of the `Tempest,' when the light failed me. I
again closed the book, and presently again, as if the
sympathy was instantaneous, the strain broke in,
playing
the same low and solemn melodies, and falling
with the same dying cadence upon the ear. I
listened
to it, as before, with breathless attention;
abandoned
myself once more to its irresistible spell; and,
half-waking
,
half-sleeping, fell again into a vivid dream,
brilliant as fairy-land, and creating itself to the
measures
of the still audible music. I could not now shake
off my belief in its reality; but I was so wrapt with its
strange sweetness, and the beauty of my dream, that I
cared not whether it came from earth or air. My
indifference
,
singularly enough, continued for several
days; and, regularly at twilight, I threw aside my
book, and listened with dreamy wakefulness for the
music. It never failed me, and its results were as
constant as its coming. Whatever I had read,
sometimes
a canto of Spenser, sometimes an act of a play,
or a chapter of romance,the scene rose before me
with the stately reality of a pageant. At last I began
to think of it more seriously; and it was a relief to me
one evening when Alfonse came in earlier than usual
with a message. I told him to stand perfectly still;
and after a minute's pause, during which I heard
distinctly
an entire passage of a funeral hymn, I asked
him if he heard any music? He said he did not. My
blood chilled at his positive reply, and I bade him
listen once more. Still he heard nothing. I could
endure it no longer. It was to me as distinct and
audible as my own voice; and I rushed from my room
as he left me, shuddering to be left alone.
The next day I thought of nothing but death.
Warnings by knells in the air, by apparitions, by
mysterious
voices, were things I had believed in
speculatively
for years, and now their truth came upon me
like conviction. I felt a dull, leaden presentiment
about my heart, growing heavier and heavier with
every passing hour. Evening came at last, and with
it, like a summons from the grave, a `dead march'
swelled clearly on the air. I felt faint and sick at
heart. This could not be fancy; and why was it, as
I thought I has proved, audible to my ear alone? I
threw open the window, and the first rush of the cool
north wind refreshed me; but, as if to mock my
attempts at relief, the dirge-like sounds rose, at the
instant
,
with treble distinctness. I seized my hat and
rushed into the street, but, to my dismay, every step
seemed to bring me nearer to the knell. Still I
hurried
on, the dismal sounds growing distractingly
louder
,
till, on turning a corner that leads to the lovely
burying-ground of New Haven, I came suddenly upon
a bell-foundry! In the rear had lately been hung,
for trial, the chiming bells just completed for the New
Trinity Church, and the master of the establishment
informed me that one of his journeymen was a fine
player, and every day after his work, he was in the
habit of amusing himself with the `Dead March in
Saul,' the `Marsellois Hymn,' and other melancholy
and easy tunes, muffling the hammers that he might
not disturb the neighbors.
I have had my reward for these speculations, dear
readera smile that is lying at this instant,
perdu
, in
the innermost recess of memoryand I care not much
(without offence) whether you like it or no.
She
thanked me
she
thought it well done
she
laid her
head on my bosom while I read it in the old library of
the Flemings, and every word has been paid for in
fairy gold.
I have taken up a thread that lengthens as I
unravel
it, and I cannot well see how I shall come to the
end, without trespassing on your patience. We will
cut it here, if you like, and resume it after a pause;
but before I close, I must give you a little instance of
how love makes the dullest earth poetical. Edith
had given me a
portefeuille
crammed with all kinds
of embossed and curious note-paper, all quite too
pretty
for use, and what I would show you are my verses
on the occasion. For a hand unpractised, then, in
aught save the Gradus ad Parnassum, I must own
I have fished them out of that same old
portefeuille
(faded now from its glory, and worn with travelbut
O how cherished!) with a pleasant feeling of paternity:
Thanks for thy gift! But heard'st thou ever
A story of a wandering fay,
Who, tired of playing sylph for ever,
Came romping to the earth one day;
And, flirting like a little love
With every thing that flew and flirted,
Made captive of a sober dove,
Whose pinions, (so the tale asserted,)
Though neither very fresh nor fair,
Were well enough for common wear.
The dove, though plain, was gentle bred,
And cooed agreeably, though low;
But still the fairy shook her head,
And, patting with her foot, said No!
'Twas true that he was rather fat;
But that was living in an abbey;
And solemnbut it was not that.
What then? Why, sir, your wings are shabby.
The dove was dumb: he droop'd, and sidled
In shame along the abbey-wall;
And then the haughty fay unbridled,
And blew her snail-shell trumpet-call;
And summoning her waiting-sprite,
Who bore her wardrobe on his back,
She took the wings she wore at night,
(Silvery stars on plumes of black,)
And, smiling, begg'd that he would take
And wear them for his lady's sake.
He took them; but he could not fly!
A fay-wing was too fine for him;
And when she pouted, by-and-by,
And left him for some other whim,
He laid them softly in his nest,
And did his flying with his own,
And they were soft upon his breast,
When many a night he slept alone;
And many a thought those wings would stir,
And many a dream of love and her.
PART II.
LOVE AND SPECULATION.
Edith Linsey
was religious. There are many
intensifiers
(a new word, that I can't get on without:
I submit it for admission into the language;)there
are many intensifiers, I say, to the passion of love;
such as pride, jealousy, poetry, (money, sometimes,
Dio mio!
) and idleness:
[2]
[2]
La paresse dans les femmes est le prsage de l'amour.
La
Bruyere
.
but, if the experience of
one who first studied the Art of Love in an
Evangelical
country is worth a para, there is nothing
within the bend of the rainbow that deepens the
tender
passion like religion. I speak it not irreverently.
The human being that loves us throws the value of
its existence into the crucible, and it can do no more.
Love's best alchymy can only turn into affection what
is in the heart. The vain, the proud, the poetical,
the selfish, the weak, can, and do, fling their vanity,
pride, poetry, selfishness, and weakness, into a first
passion; but these are earthly elements, and there is
an antagonism in their natures that is for ever
striving
to resolve them back to their original earth. But
religion is of the soul as well as the heart,the mind
as well as the affections,and when it mingles in
love, it is the infusion of an immortal essence into an
unworthy and else perishable mixture.
Edith's religion was equally witout cant, and
without hesitation or disguise. She had arrived
at it by elevation of mind, aided by the habit of never
counting on her tenure of life beyond the setting of
the next sun, and with her it was rather an
intellectual
exaltation than a humility of heart. She thought
of God because the subject was illimitable, and her
powerful imagination found in it the scope for which
she pined. She talked of goodness, and purity, and
disinterestedness, because she found them easy virtues
with a frame worn down with disease, and she was
removed by the sheltered position of an invalid from
the collision which tries so shrewdly in common life
the ring of our metal. She prayed, because the
fulness
of her heart was loosed by her eloquence when
on her knees, and she found that an indistinct and
mystic unburthening of her bosom, even to the Deity,
was a hush and a relief. The heart does not always
require rhyme and reason of language and tears.
There are many persons of religious feeling who,
from a fear of ridicule or misconception, conduct
themselves
as if to express a devout sentiment was a want
of taste or good-breeding. Edith was not of these.
Religion was to her a powerful enthusiasm, applied
without exception to every pursuit and affection. She
used it as a painter ventures on a daring colour, or a
musician a new string in his instrument. She felt
that she aggrandized botany, or history, or friendship,
or love, or what you will, by making it a
steppingstone
to heaven, and she made as little mystery of it as
she did of breathing and sleep, and talked of subjects
which the serious usually enter upon with a
suppressed
breath, as she would comment upon a poem or
VOL. I. 13
define a new philosophy. It was surprising what an
impressiveness this threw over her in every thing;
how elevated she seemed above the best of those
about her; and with what a worshipping and
half-reverent
admiration she inspired all whom she did not
utterly neglect or despise. For myself, my soul was
drank up in hers as the lark is taken into the sky, and
I forgot there was a world beneath me in my
intoxication
.
I thought her an angel unrecognised on earth.
I believed her as pure from worldliness, and as
spotless
from sin, as a cherub with his breast upon his
lute; and I knelt by her when she prayed, and held
her upon my bosom in her fits of faintness and
exhaustion
,
and sat at her feet with my face in her hands
listening to her wild speculations (often till the
morning
brightened behind the curtains) with an utter and
irresistible abandonment of my existence to hers,
which seems to me
now
like a recollection of another
life,it were, with this conscious body and mind, a
self-relinquishment so impossible!
Our life was a singular one. Living in the midst
of a numerous household, with kind and cultivated
people about us, we were as separated from them as if
the ring of Gyges encircled us from their sight. Fred
wished me joy of my
giraffe
, as he offensively called
his cousin, and his sisters, who were quite too pretty to
have been left out of my story so long, were more
indulgent
,
I thought, to the indigenous beaux of
Skaneateles
than those aboriginal specimens had a right to
expect; but I had no eyes, ears, sense, or civility for
any thing but Edith. The library became a forbidden
spot to all feet but ours; we met at noon after our late
vigils and breakfasted together; a light sleigh was set
apart for our
tte--tte
drives over the frozen lake,
and the world seemed to me to revolve on its axle
with a special reference to Philip Slingsby's happiness.
I wonder whether an angel out of heaven would have
made me believe that I should ever write the story of
those passionate hours with a smile and a sneer! I
tell thee, Edith! (for thou wilt read every line that I
have written, and feel it, as far as thou
canst
feel any
thing,) that I have read Faust since, and thought
thee Mephistopheles! I have looked on thee since,
with thy cheek rosy dark, thy lip filled with the blood
of health, and curled with thy contempt of the world
and thy yet wild ambition to be its master-spirit and
idol, and struck my breast with instinctive
self-questioning
if thou hadst given back my soul that was
thine own! I fear thee, Edith. Thou hast grown
beautiful that wert so hideousthe wonder-wrought
miracle of health and intellect, filling thy veins, and
breathing almost a newer shape over form and
feature
;
but it is not thy beauty; no, nor thy
enthronement
in the admiration of thy woman's world. These
are little to me; for I saw thy loveliness from the first,
and I worshipped thee more in the duration of a
thought than a hecatomb of these worldlings in their
life-time. I fear thy mysterious and unaccountable
power over the human soul! I can scorn thee here,
in another land, with an ocean weltering between us,
and anatomize the character that I alone have read
truly and too well, for the instruction of the world, (its
amusement, too, proud woman,thou wilt writhe at
that;)but I confess to a natural and irresistible
obedience
to the mastery of thy spirit over mine. I would
not willingly again touch the radius of thy sphere. I
would come out of Paradise to walk alone with the
devil as soon.
How little even the most instructed women know
the secret of this power! They make the mistake of
cultivating only
their own
minds. They think that,
by
self
-elevation, they will climb up to the intellects
of men, and win them by seeming their equals.
Shallow
philosophers! You never remember that to
subdue
a human being to your will, it is more necessary
to know
his
mind than your own,that, in conquering
a heart vanity is the first out-post,that while you are
employing your wits in thinking how most effectually
to dazzle
him
, you should be sounding his character
for its undeveloped powers to assist him to dazzle
you
,
that love is a reflected light, and to be pleased with
others we must be first pleased with ourselves!
Edith (it has occurred to me in my speculations
since) seemed to me always an echo of myself. She
expressed my thought as it sprang into my brain. I
thought that in her I had met my double and
counterpart
,
with the reservation that I was a little the
stronger spirit, and that in
my
mind lay the material
of the eloquence that flowed from her lips,as the
almond that you endeavor to split equally leaves the
kernel in the deeper cavity of its shell. Whatever the
topic, she seemed using
my
thoughts, anticipating
my
reflections, and, with an unobtrusive but thrilling
flattery
,
referring me to myself for the truth of what I
must know was but a suggestion of my own! O!
Lucrezia
Borgia! if Machiavelli had but practised that
subtle cunning upon thee, thou wouldst have had little
space in thy delirious heart for the passion that, in the
history of crime, has made thee the marvel and the
monster.
The charm of Edith to most people was that she
was no
sublimation
. Her mind seemed of any or no
stature. She was as natural, and earnest, and as
satisfied
to converse on the meanest subject as on the
highest. She overpowered nobody. She (apparently)
eclipsed nobody. Her passionate and powerful
eloquence
was only lavished on the passionate and
powerful
.
She
never misapplied herself:
and what a
secret of influence and superiority is contained in this
single phrase! We so hate him who out-measures us
as we stand side by side before the world!
I have in my portfolio several numbers of a
manuscript
Gazette, with which the Flemings amused
themselves during the deep snows of the winter
which I visited them. It was contributed to by
everybody
in the house, and read aloud at the breakfast
table on the day of its weekly appearance, and, quite
apropos
to these remarks upon the universality of
Edith's mind, there is in one of them an essay of her
on what she calls
minute philosophies
. It is curious
as showing how, with all her loftiness of speculation,
she descended sometimes to the examination of the
smallest machinery of enjoyment.
The principal sources of every-day happiness, (I
am copying out a part of the essay, dear reader,) are
too obvious to need a place in a chapter of breakfast
table philosophy. Occupation and a clear conscience
the very truant in the fields will tell you, are craving
necessities. But when these are secured, there are
lighter matters, which, to the sensitive and educated
at least, are to happiness what foliage is to the tree.
They are refinements which add to the beauty of life
without diminishing its strength; and, as they spring
only from a better use of our common gifts, they are
neither costly nor rare. I have learned secrets under
the roof of a poor man, which would add to the luxury
of the rich. The blessings of a cheerful fancy and a
quick eye come from nature, and the trailing of a vine
may develope them as well as the curtaining of a king's
chamber.
Riding and driving are such stimulating pleasures,
that to talk of any management in their indulgence
seems superfluous. Yet we are, in motion or at rest,
equally liable to the caprices of feeling, and, perhaps,
13*
the gayer the mood the deeper the shade cast on it by
untoward circumstances. The time of riding should
never be regular. It then becomes a habit, and
habits, though sometimes comfortable, never amount
to positive pleasure. I would ride when nature
promptedwhen the shower was past, or the air
balmy, or the sky beautifulwhenever, and
where-ever
the significant finger of Desire pointed. Oh! to
leap into the saddle when the west-wind blows freshly,
and gallop off into its very eye, with an undrawn rein,
careless how far or whither; or, to spring up from a
book when the sun breaks through after a storm, and
drive away under the white clouds, through light and
shadow, while the trees are wet and the earth damp
and spicy; or, in the clear sunny afternoons of
autumn
,
with a pleasant companion on the seat beside
you, and the glorious splendour of the decaying
foliage
flushing in the sunshine, to loiter up the valley
dreaming over the thousand airy castles that are
stirred by such shifting beautythese are pleasures
indeed, and such as he who rides regularly after his
dinner knows as little of as the dray-horse of the
exultation
of the courser.
There is a great deal in the choice of a
companion
.
If he is an indifferent acquaintance, or an
indiscriminate
talker, or has a coarse eye for beauty, or is
insensible to the delicacies of sensation or thoughtif
he is sensual, or stupid, or practical constitutionally
he will never do. He must be a man who can detect
a rare colour in a leaf, or appreciate a peculiar passage
in scenery, or admire a grand outline in a cloud; he
must have accurate and fine senses, and a heart, noble
at least by nature, and subject still to her direct
influences
;
he must be a lover of the beautiful in
whatever
shape it comes; and, above all, he must have
read and thought like a scholar, if not like a poet.
He will then ride by your side without crossing your
humourif talkative, he will talk well, and if silent,
you are content, for you know that the same
grandeur
or beauty which has wrought the silence, in
your own thoughts has given a colour to his.
There is much in the manner of driving. I like
a capricious reinnow fast through a hollow, and
now loiteringly on the edge of a road or by the bank
of a river. There is a singular delight in quickening
your speed in the animation of a climax, and in
coming down gently to a walk with a digression of
feeling, or a sudden sadness.
An important item in household matters is the
management of light. A small room well-lighted is
much more imposing than a large one lighted ill.
Cross lights are painful to the eye, and they destroy
besides the cool and picturesque shadows of the
furniture
and figures. I would have a room always
partially
darkened: there is a repose in the twilight
dimness
of a drawing-room which affects one with the
proper gentleness of the place: the out-of-door humour
of men is too rude, and the secluded light subdues
them fitly as they enter. I like curtainsheavy, and
of the richest material: there is a magnificence in
large crimson folds which nothing else equals, and
the colour gives every thing a beautiful tint as the
light streams through them. Plants tastefully
arranged
are pretty; flowers are always beautiful. I
would have my own room like a painter'sone
curtain
partly drawn; a double shadow has a nervous
look. The effect of a proper disposal of light upon
the feelings is by most people surprisingly neglected.
I have no doubt that as an habitual thing it materially
affects the character; the disposition for study and
thought is certainly dependent on it in no slight
degree
.
What is more contemplative than the twilight
of a deep alcove in a library? What more awakens
thought than the dim interior of an old church with
its massive and shadowy pillars?
There may be the most exquisite luxury in
furniture
.
A crowded room has a look of comfort, and
suspended lamps throw a mellow depth into the
features
.
Descending light is always the most becoming;
it deepens the eye, and distributes the shadows in the
face judiciously. Chairs should be of different and
curious fashions, made to humor every possible
weariness. A spice-lamp should burn in the corner,
and the pictures should be coloured of a pleasant tone,
and the subjects should be subdued and dreamy. It
should be a place you would live in for a century
without an uncomfortable thought. I hate a neat
room. A dozen of the finest old authors should lie
about, and a new novel, and the last new prints. I
rather like the French fashion of a
bonbonniere
,
though that perhaps is an extravagance.
There is a management of one's own familiar
intercourse
which is more neglected, and at the same
time more important to happiness, than every other;
it is particularly a pity that this is not oftener
understood
by newly-married people; as far as my own
observation goes, I have rarely failed to detect, far
too early, signs of ill-disguised and disappointed
weariness. It was not the re-action of excitement
not the return to the quiet ways of homebut a new
mannera forgetful indifference, believing itself
concealed
,
and yet betraying itself continually by
unconscious
and irrepressible symptoms. I believe it resulted
oftenest from the same causespartly, that they saw
each other too much, and partly that when the
form
of etiquette was removed, they forgot to retain its
invaluable
essence
an assiduous and minute
disinterestedness
.
It seems nonsense to lovers, but
absence
is the secret of respect, and therefore of affection.
Love is divine, but its flame is too delicate for a
perpetual
household lamp; it should be burned only for
incense, and even then trimmed skilfully. It is
wonderful
how a slight neglect, or a glimpse of a
weakness
,
or a chance defect of knowledge, dims its new
glory. Lovers, married or single, should have
separate
pursuitsthey should meet to respect each other
for new and distinct acquisitions. It is the weakness
of human affections that they are founded on pride,
and waste with over much familiarity. And oh, the
delight to meet after hours of absenceto sit down
by the evening lamp, and with a mind unexhausted
by the intercourse of the day, to yield to the
fascinating
freedom of conversation, and clothe the rising
thoughts of affection in fresh and unhackneyed
language
!
How richly the treasures of the mind are
colourednot doled out, counter by counter, as the
visible machinery of thought coins them, but heaped
upon the mutual altar in lavish and unhesitating
profusion
!
And how a bold fancy assumes beauty and
powernot traced up through all its petty springs till
its dignity is lost by association, but flashing
full-grown
and suddenly on the sense! The gifts of no
one mind are equal to the constant draught of a
life-time
,
and, even if they were, there is no one taste
which could always relish them. It is a humiliating
thought that immortal mind must be husbanded like
material treasure!
There is a remark of Godwin's, which, in rather
too strong language, contains a valuable truth. `A
judicious and limited voluptuousness,' he says, `is
necessary
to the cultivation of the mind, to the polishing
of the manners, to the refinement of the sentiment,
and to the development of the understanding; and
a woman deficient in this respect may be of use in the
government of our families, but cannot add to the
enjoyment
,
nor fix the partiality of a man of taste!'
Since the days when `St. Leon' was written, the word
by which the author expressed his meaning is grown
perhaps into disrepute, but the remark is still one
of keen and observant discrimination. It refers (at
least so I take it) to that susceptibility to delicate
attentions, that fine sense of the nameless and
exquisite
tenderness of manner and thought, which
constitute
in the minds of its possessors the deepest
undercurrent
of lifethe felt and treasured, but unseen
and inexpressible richness of affection. It is rarely
found in the characters of men, but it outweights, when
it is, all grosser qualitiesfor its possession implies a
generous nature, purity, fine affections, and a heart
open to all the sunshine and meaning of the universe.
It belongs more to the nature of woman; but
indispensable
as it is to her character, it is oftener than
anything
else, wanting. And without it, what is she?
What is love to a being of such dull sense that she
hears only its common and audible language, and sees
nothing but what it brings to her feet, to be eaten, and
worn, and looked upon? What is woman, if the
impassioned
language of the eye, or the deepened
fulness
of the tone, or the tenderness of a slight
attention
,
are things unnoticed and of no value?one who
answers you when you speak, smiles when you tell
her she is grave, assents barely to the expression of
your enthusiasm, but has no dream beyondno
suspicion
that she has not felt and reciprocated your
feelings
as fully as you could expect or desire? It is a
matter too little looked to. Sensitive and ardent men
too often marry with a blindfold admiration of mere
goodness or loveliness. The
abandon
of matrimony
soon dissipates the gay dream, and they find
themselves
suddenly unsphered, linked indissolubly with
affections strangely different from their own, and
lavishing their only treasure on those who can neither
appreciate nor return it. The after-life of such men
is a stifling solitude of feeling. Their avenues of
enjoyment
are their maniform sympathies, and when
these are shut up or neglected, the heart is dark, and
they have nothing to do thenceforward but to forget.
There are many, who, possessed of the capacity
for the more elevated affections, waste and lose it by
a careless and often unconscious neglect. It is not a
plant to grow untended. The breath of indifference,
or a rude touch, may destroy for ever its delicate
texture
.
To drop the figure, there is a daily attention to
the slight courtesies of life, and an artifice in detecting
the passing shadows of feeling, which alone can
preserve
,
through life, the first freshness of passion. The
easy surprises of pleasure, and earnest cheerfulness of
assent to slight wishes, the habitual respect to
opinions
,
the polite abstinence from personal topics in the
company of others, the assiduous and unwavering
attention to her comfort at home and abroad, and, above
all, the absolute preservation in private of those
proprieties
of conversation and manner which are sacred
before the world, are some of the thousand secrets of
that rare happiness which age and habit alike fail to
impair or diminish.
II.
Vacation was over, but Fred and myself were still
lingering at Fleming Farm. The roads were
impassable
with a premature THAW. Perhaps there is
nothing
so peculiar in American meteorology as the
phenomenon
which I alone probably, of all the
imprisoned
inhabitants of Skaneateles, attributed to a kind and
special Providence. Summer had come back, like
Napoleon from Elba, and astonished usurping Winter
in the plenitude of apparent possession and security.
No cloud foreboded the change, as no alarm preceded
the apparition of the child of destiny. We awoke on
a February morning, with the snow lying chin-deep
on the earth, and it was June! The air was soft and
warmthe sky was clear and of the milky cerulean
of chrysoprasethe South wind (the same, save his
unperfumed wings, who had crept off like a satiated
lover in October) stole back suddenly from the tropics,
and found his flowery mistress asleep and insensible
to his kisses beneath her snowy mantle. The sunset
warmed back from its wintry purple to the golden tints
of heat, the stars burnt with a less vitreous sparkle,
the meteors slid once more lambently down the sky,
and the house-dove sat on the eaves, washing her
breast in the snow water, and thinking (like a
neglected
wife at a capricious return of her truant's
tenderness
)
that the sunshine would last for ever!
The air was now full of music. The water
trickled away under the snow, and, as you looked
around and saw no change or motion in the white
carpet of the earth, it seemed as if a myriad of small
bells were ringing under groundfairies, perhaps,
startled in mid-revel with the false alarm of summer,
and hurrying about with their silver anklets, to wake
up the slumbering flowers. The mountain torrents
were loosed, and rushed down upon the valleys like
the Children of the Mist; and the hoarse war-cry,
swelling and falling upon the wind, maintained its
perpetual undertone like an accompaniment of
bassoons
;
and occasionally, in a sudden lull of the breeze,
you would hear the click of the undermined
snowdrifts
dropping upon the earth, as if the chorister of
Spring were beating time to the reviving anthem of
nature.
The snow sunk, perhaps a foot in a day, but it was
only perceptible to the eye where you could measure
its wet mark against a tree from which it had fallen
away, or by the rock, from which the dissolving bank
shrunk and separated, as if rocks and snow were as
heartless as ourselves, and threw off
their
friends, too,
in their extremity! The low-lying lake, meantime,
surrounded by melting mountains, received the
abandoned
waters upon its frozen bosom, and, spreading
them into a placid and shallow lagoon, separate by a
crystal plane from its own lower depths, gave them
the repose denied in the more elevated sphere in
which lay their birthright. And thus(oh, how full
is nature of these gentle moralities!)and thus
sometimes
do the lowly, whose bosom, like the frozen lake,
is at first cold and unsympathetic to the rich and
noble
,
still receive them in adversity, and, when
neighbourhood
and dependence have convinced them that
they are made of the same common element, as the
lake melts its dividing and icy plane, and mingles the
strange waters with its own, do
they
dissolve the
unnatural
barrier of prejudice and take the humbled
wanderer to their bosom!
The face of the snow lost its dazzling whiteness as
the thaw went on, as disease steals away the beauty
of those we lovebut it was only in the distance,
where the sun threw a shadow into the irregular pits
of the dissolving surface. Near to the eye, (as the
dying one pressed to the bosom,) it was still of its
original beauty, unchanged and spotless. And now
you are tired of my loitering speculations, gentle
reader, and we will return (please Heaven, only on
paper!) to Edith Linsey.
The roads were at last reduced to what is
expressively
called, in New-England,
slosh
, (in New-York
posh
, but equally descriptive,) and Fred received a
hint from the Judge that the mail had arrived in the
usual time, and his
beaux jours
were at an end.
VOL. I. 14
A slighter thing than my departure would have
been sufficient to stagger the tottering spirits of Edith.
We were sitting at table when the letters came in, and
the dates were announced that proved the opening of
the roads; and I scarce dared to turn my eyes upon
the pale face that I could just see had dropped upon
her bosom. The next instant there was a general
confusion, and she was carried lifeless to her chamber.
A note, scarce legible, was put into my hand in
the course of the evening, requesting me to sit up for
her in the library. She would come to me, she said,
if she had strength.
It was a night of extraordinary beauty. The full
moon was high in the heavens at midnight, and there
had been a slight shower soon after sunset, which,
with the clearing-up wind, had frozen thinly into a
most fragile rime, and glazed every thing open to the
sky with transparent crystal. The distant forest looked
serried with metallic trees, dazzlingly and unspeakably
gorgeous, and, as the night-wind stirred through them
and shook their crystal points in the moonlightthe
aggregated stars of heaven springing from their
Maker's
hand to the spheres of their destiny, or the
march of the host of the archangel Michael with their
irradiate spear-points glittering in the air, or the
diamond
beds of central earth thrust up to the sun in
some throe of the universewould, each or all, have
been well bodied forth by such similitude.
It was an hour after midnight when Edith was
supported
in by her maid, and, choosing her own
position
,
sunk into the broad window-seat, and lay with
her head on my bosom, and her face turned outward
to the glittering night. Her eyes had become, I
thought, unnaturally bright, and she spoke with an
exhausted faintness that gradually strengthened to a
tone of the most thrilling and melodious sweetness.
I shall never get that music out of my brain!
Philip! she said.
I listen, dear Edith!
I am dying.
And she looked it, and I believed her; and my
heart sunk to its deepest abyss of wretchedness with
the conviction.
She went on to talk of death. It was the subject
that pressed most upon her mind, and she could
scarce fail to be eloquent on any subject. She was
very eloquent on this. I was so impressed with the
manner in which she seemed almost to rhapsodize
between
the periods of her faintness, as she lay in my
arms that night, that every word she uttered is still
fresh in my memory. She seemed to forget my
presence
,
and to commune with her own thoughts aloud.
I recollect, she said, when I was strong and
well, (years ago, dear Philip!) I left my books on a
morning in May, and looking up to find the course of
the wind, started off alone for a walk into its very
eye. A moist steady breeze came from the
southwest
,
driving before it fragments of the dispersed
clouds. The air was elastic and cleara freshness
that entered freely at every pore was coming up,
mingled
with the profuse perfume of grass and flowers
the colours of the new, tender foliage were
particularly
soothing to an eye pained with close attention
and the just perceptible murmur of the drops shaken
from the trees, and the peculiarly soft rustle of the wet
leaves, made as much music as an ear accustomed to
the silence of solitude could well relish. Altogether,
it was one of those rarely-tempered days when every
sense is satisfied, and the mind is content to lie still
with its common thoughts, and simply enjoy.
I had proceeded perhaps a milemy forehead
held up to the wind, my hair blowing back, and the
blood glowing in my cheeks with the most vivid flush
of exercise and health, when I saw coming towards
me a man apparently in middle life, but wasted by
illness
to the extremest emaciation. His lip was
colourless
,
his skin dry and white, and his sunken eyes had
that expression of inquiring earnestness which comes
always with impatient sickness. He raised his head,
and looked steadily at me as I came on. My lips were
open, and my whole air must have been that of a
person
in the most exulting enjoyment of health. I was
just against him, gliding past with an elastic step,
when, with his eye still fixed on me, he half turned,
and in a voice of inexpressible meaning, exclaimed,
`Merciful heaven!
how well she is!
' I passed on,
with his voice still ringing in my ear. It haunted me
like a tone in the air. It was repeated in the echo of
my treadin the panting of my heart. I felt it in the
beating of the strong pulse in my temples. As if it
was strange that I should be so well! I had never
before realized that it could be otherwise. It seemed
impossible to me that my strong limbs should fail me,
or the pure blood I felt bounding so bravely through
my veins could be reached and tainted by disease.
How should it come? If I ate, would it not nourish
me? If I slept, would it not refresh me? If I came
out in the cool, free air, would not my lungs heave,
and my muscles spring, and my face feel its grateful
freshness? I held out my arm, for the first time in my
life, with a doubt of its strength. I closed my hand
unconsciously, with a fear it would not obey. I drew
a deep breath, to feel if it was difficult to breathe; and
even my bounding step, that was as elastic then as a
fawn's, seemed to my excited imagination, already to
have become decrepit and feeble.
I walked on, and thought of death. I had never
before done so definitely; it was like a terrible shape
that had always pursued me dimly, but which I had
never before turned and looked steadily on. Strange!
that we can live so constantly with that threatening
hand hung over us, and not think of it always! Strange!
that we can use a limb, or enter with interest into any
pursuit of time, when we know that our continued
life is almost a daily miracle!
How difficult it is to realize death! How difficult
it is to believe that the hand with whose every vein
you are familiar, will ever lose its motion and its
warmth? That the quick eye, which is so restless
now, will settle and grow dull? That the refined lip,
which now shrinks so sensitively from defilement, will
not feel the earth lying upon it, and the tooth of the
feeding worm? That the free breath will be choked,
and the forehead be pressed heavily on by the
decaying
coffin, and the light and air of heaven be shut quite
out; and this very body, warm, and breathing, and
active as it is now, will not feel uneasiness or pain?
I could not help looking at my frame as these thoughts
crowded on me; and I confess I almost doubted my
own convictionsthere was so much strength and
quickness in itmy hand opened so freely, and my
nostrils expanded with such a satisfied thirst to the
moist air. Ah! it is hard to believe at first that we
must die! harder still to believe and realize the
repulsive
circumstances that follow that terrible change!
It is a bitter thought at the lightest. There is little
comfort in knowing that the
soul
will not be there
that the sense and the mind that feel and measure
suffering
,
will be gone. The separation is too great a
mystery to satisfy fear. It is the body that we
know
.
It is this material frame in which the affections have
grown up. The spirit is a mere thought a presence
that we are told of, but do not see. Philosophize as
14*
we will, the idea of existence is connected indissolubly
with the visible body, and its pleasant and familiar
senses. We talk of, and believe, the soul's ascent to
its Maker; but it is not ourselvesit is not our own
conscious breathing identity that we send up in
imagination
through the invisible air. It is some phantom
that is to issue forth mysteriously, and leave us gazing
on it in wonder. We do not understand, we cannot
realize it.
At the time I speak of, my health had been always
unbroken. Since then, I have known disease in many
forms, and have had, of course, more time and
occasion
for the contemplation of death. I have never,
till late, known resignation. With my utmost energy
I was merely able, in other days, to look upon it with
quiet despair; as a terrible, unavoidable evil. I
remember
once, after severe suffering for weeks, I
overheard
the physician telling my mother that I must
die, and from that moment the thought never left me.
A thin line of light came in between the shutters of
the south window; and, with this one thought
fastened
on my mind, like the vulture of Prometheus, I lay
and watched it, day after day, as it passed with its
imperceptible progress over the folds of my curtains.
The last faint gleam of sunset never faded from its
damask edge, without an inexpressible sinking of my
heart, and a belief that I should see its pleasant light
no more. I turned from the window when even
imagination
could find the daylight no longer there, and
felt my pulse and lifted my head to try my remaining
strength. And then every object, yes, even the
meanest
,
grew unutterably dear to me; my pillow, and the
cup with which my lips were moistened, and the
cooling
amber which I had held in my hand, and pressed
to my burning lips when the fever was on meevery
thing that was connected with life, and that would
remain among the living when I was gone.
It is strange, but with all this clinging to the world
my affection for the living decreased sensibly. I grew
selfish in my weakness. I could not bear that they
should go from my chamber into the fresh air, and
have no fear of sickness and no pain. It seemed
unfeeling
that they did not stay and breathe the close
atmosphere of my roomat least till I was dead.
How could they walk round so carelessly, and look
on a fellow-creature dying helplessly and unwillingly,
and never shed a tear! And then the passing
courtesies
exchanged with the family at the door, and the
quickened step on the sidewalk, and the wandering
looks about my room, even while I was answering
with my difficult breath their cold inquiries! There
was an inhuman carelessness in all this that stung me
to the soul.
I craved sympathy as I did life; and yet I doubted
it all. There was not a word spoken by the friends
who were admitted to see me, that I did not ponder
over when they were gone, and always with an
impatient
dissatisfaction. The tone, and the manner,
and the expression of face, all seemed forced; and
often, in my earlier sickness, when I had pondered for
hours on the expressed sympathy of some one I had
loved, the sense of utter helplessness which crowded
on me with my conviction of their insincerity, quite
overcame me. I have lain night after night, and
looked at my indifferent watchers: and oh how I
hated them for their careless ease, and their snatched
moments of repose! I could scarce keep from dashing
aside the cup they came to give me so sluggishly.
It is singular that, with all our experience of
sickness
,
we do not attend more to these slight
circumstances
.
It can scarce be conceived how an
ill-managed
light, or a suppressed whispering, or a careless
change of attitude in the presence of one whose senses
are so sharpened, and whose mind is so sensitive as a
sick person's, irritate and annoy. And, perhaps, more
than these to bear, is the affectedly subdued tone of
condolence. I remember nothing which I endured so
impatiently.
Annoyances like these, however, scarcely diverted
for a moment the one great thought of death. It
became
at last familiar, but, if possible, more dreadfully
horrible from that very fact. It was giving it a new
character. I realized it more. The minute
circumstances
became nearer and more realI tried the
position
in which I should lie in my coffinI lay with
my arms to my side, and my feet together, and with
the cold sweat standing in large drops on my lip,
composed
my features into a forced expression of
tranquillity
.
I awoke on the second morning after the hope of
my recovery had been abandoned. There was a
narrow
sunbeam lying in a clear crimson line across the
curtain, and I lay and watched the specks of lint
sailing
through it, like silver-winged insects, and the thin
dust, quivering and disappearing on its definite limit,
in a dream of wonder. I had thought not to see
another sun, and my mind was still fresh with the
expectation
of an immediate change; I could not believe
that I was alive. The dizzy throb in my temples was
done; my limbs felt cool and refreshed; my mind had
that feeling of transparency which is common after
healthful and sweet sleep; and an indefinite sensation
of pleasure trembled in every nerve. I thought that
this might be death, and that, with this exquisite
feeling
of repose, I was to linger thus consciously with
the body till the last day; and I dwelt on it pleasantly
with my delicious freedom from pain. I felt no regret
for lifenone for a friend even: I was willingquite
willingto lie thus for ages. Presently the physician
entered; he came and laid his fingers on my pulse,
and his face brightened. `You will get well,' he said,
and I heard it almost without emotion. Gradually,
however, the love of life returned; and as I realized it
fully, and all the thousand chords which bound me to it
vibrated once more, the tears came thickly to my eyes,
and a crowd of delightful thoughts pressed cheerfully
and glowingly on me. No language can do justice
to the pleasure of convalescence from extreme
sickness
.
The first step upon the living grassthe first
breath of free airthe first unsuppressed salutation of
a friendmy fainting heart, dear Philip, rallies and
quickens even now with the recollection.
I have thrown into a continuous strain what was
murmured to me between pauses of faintness, and with
difficulty of breath that seemed overpowered only by
the mastery of the eloquent spirit apparently trembling
on its departure. I believed Edith Linsey would die
that night: I believed myself listening to words spoken
almost from heaven; and if I have wearied you, dear
reader, with what must be more interesting to me than
to you, it is because every syllable was burnt like
enamel into my soul, in my boundless reverence and
love.
It was two o'clock, and she still lay breathing
painfully
in my arms. I had thrown up the window, and
the soft south wind, stirring gently among the tinkling
icicles of the trees, came in, warm and genial, and she
leaned over to inhale it, as if it came from the Source
of life. The stars burned gloriously in the heavens;
and, in a respite of her pain, she lay back her head,
and gazed up at them with an inarticulate motion of
her lips, and eyes so unnaturally kindled, that I thought
reason had abandoned her.
How beautiful are the stars to-night, Edith! I
said, with half a fear that she would answer me in
madness.
Yes, she said, putting my hand (that pressed her
closer, involuntarily, to my bosom) first to her lips
Yes; and, beautiful as they are, they are all
accurately
numbered and governed, and just as they burn
now have they burned since the creation, never `faint
in their watches,' and never absent from their place.
How glorious they are! How thrilling it is to see them
stand with such a constant silence in the sky,
unsteadied
and unsupported, obeying the great law of their
Maker! What pure and silvery light it is! How
steadily it pours from those small fountains, giving
every spot of earth its due portion! The hovel and
the palace are shone upon equally, and the shepherd
gets as broad a beam as the king, and these few rays
that are now streaming into my feverish eyes were
meant and lavished only for me! I have often
thoughthas it never occurred to you, dear Philip?
how ungrateful we are to call ourselves poor, when
there is so much that no poverty can take away!
Clusters of silver rays from every star in these heavens
are
mine
. Every breeze that breaks on my forehead
was sent for
my
refreshment. Every tinkle and ray
from those stirring and glistening icicles, and the
invigorating
freshness of this unseasonable and delicious
wind, and moonlight, and sunshine, and the glory of
the planets, are all gifts that poverty could not take
away! It is not often that I forget these treasures; for
I have loved nature, and the skies of night and day, in
all their changes, from my childhood, and they have
been unspeakably dear to me; for in them I see the
evidence of an Almighty Maker, and in the excessive
beauty of the stars and the unfading and equal
splendour
of their steadfast fires, I see glimpses of an
immortal
life, and find an answer to the eternal
questioning
within me!
Three! The village clock reaches us to-night.
Nay, the wind cannot harm me now. Turn me more
to the window, for I would look nearer upon the stars:
it is the last timeI am sure of itthe very last! Yet
to-morrow night those stars will all be there,not one
missing from the sky, nor shining one ray the less
because
I am dead! It is strange that this thought
should be so bitter,strange that the companionship
should be so close between our earthly affections and
those spiritual worlds,and stranger yet, that,
satisfied
as we must be that we shall know them nearer
and better when released from our flesh, we still cling
so fondly to our earthly and imperfect vision. I feel,
Philip, that I shall traverse hereafter every star in those
bright heavens. If the course of that career of
knowledge
,
which I believe in my soul it will be the reward
of the blessed to run, be determined in any degree by
the strong desires that yearn so sickeningly within us,
I see the thousand gates of my future heaven shining
at this instant above me. There they are!the
clustering
Pleiades, with `their sweet influences;' and
the morning star, melting into the east with its
transcendent
lambency and whiteness; and the broad
galaxy
,
with its myriads of bright spheres, dissolving into
each other's light, and belting the heavens like a
girdle
.
I shall see them all! I shall know them and
their inhabitants as the angels of God know them;
the mystery of their order, and the secret of their
wonderful harmony, and the duration of their
appointed
courses,all will be made clear!
I have trespassed again, most indulgent reader, on
the limits of these Procrustean papers. I must defer
the change that came o'er the spirit of my dream
till another mood and time. Meanwhile, you may
consider Edith, if you like, the true heart she thought
herself (and I thought her) during her nine deaths in
the library; and you will have leisure to imagine the
three years over which we shall skip with this
finale
,
during which I made a journey to the North, and danced
out a winter in your own territories at Quebeca
circumstance
I allude to, no less to record the
hospitalities
of the garrison of that time (this was in 27were
you there?) than to pluck forth from Time's
hindermost
wallet a modest copy of verses I addressed thence
to Edith. She sent them back to me considerably
mended; but I give you the original draught,
scorning
her finger in my poesies.
TO EDITH, FROM THE NORTH.
As, gazing on the Pleiades,
We count each fair and starry one,
Yet wander from the light of these
To muse upon the `Pleiad gone;'
As, bending o'er fresh gather'd flowers,
The rose's most enchanting hue
Reminds us but of other hours,
Whose roses were all lovely, too;
So, dearest, when I rove among
The bright ones of this northern sky,
And mark the smile, and list the song,
And watch the dancers gliding by,
The fairer still they seem to be,
The more it stirs a thought of thee.
The sad, sweet bells of twilight chime,
Of many hearts may touch but one,
And so this seeming careless rhyme
Will whisper to thy heart alone.
I give it to the winds. The bird,
Let loose, to his far nest will flee:
And love, though breathed but on a word,
Will find thee, over land and sea.
Though clouds across the sky have driven,
We trust the star at last will shine;
And, like the very light of heaven,
I trust thy lovetrust thou in mine!
PART III.
A DIGRESSION.
Boy
.
Will you not sleep, Sir?
Knight
,
Fling the window up!
I'll look upon the stars. Where twinkle now
The Pleiades?
Boy
.
Here, Master!
Knight
.
Throw me now
My cloak upon my shoulders, and good night!
I have no mind to sleep! * * *
* * * * She bade me look
Upon his band of stars when other eyes
Beamed on me brightly, and remember her
By the Lost Pleiad.
Boy
.
Are you well, Sir?
Knight
.
Boy!
Love you the stars?
Boy
.
When they first spring at eve
Better than near to morning.
Knight
.
Fickle child!
Are they more fair in twilight?
Boy
.
Master, no!
Brighter as night wears on,
but I forget
Their beauty, looking on them long!
Sir Fabian
,
an unpublished Poem
.
It
was a September night at the University. On
the morrow I was to appear upon the stage as the
winner of the first honours of my year. I was the
envythe admirationin some degree the wonder,
VOL. I. 15
of the collegiate town in which the University stands
for I had commenced my career as the idlest and
most riotous of freshmen. What it was that had
suddenly
made me enamoured of my chambers and my
booksthat had saddened my manners and softened
my voicethat had given me a disgust to champagne
and my old allies, in favour of cold water and the
Platoniststhat, in short, had metamorphosed, as
Bob Wilding would have said, a gentleman-like rake
and
vau-rien
into so dull a thing as an exemplary
academicianwas past the divining of most of my
acquaintances. Oh, once-loved Edith! hast thou
any inkling in thy downward metempsychosis of the
philosophy of this marvel?
If you were to set a poet to make a town, with
carte
blanche
as to trees, gardens, and green blinds, he
would probably turn out very much such a place as
New-Haven. (Supposing your education in
geography
to have been neglected, dear reader, this is
the second capital of Connecticut, a half-rural,
half-metropolitan
town, lying between a precipice that
makes the fag-end of the Green Mountains and a
handsome bay in Long-Island Sound.) The first
thought of the inventor of New-Haven was to lay out
the streets in parallelograms, and the second was to
plant them from suburb to water-side with the
magnificent
elms of the country. The result is, that at the
end of fifty years, the town is buried in leaves. If it
were not for the spires of the churches, a bird flying
over on his autumn voyage to the Floridas would
never mention having seen it in his travels. It is a
glorious tree, the elmand those of the place I speak
of are famous, even in our land of trees, for their
surprising size and beauty. With the curve of their
stems in the sky, the long weepers of their outer and
lower branches drop into the street, fanning your
face as you pass under with their geranium-like leaves;
and close overhead, interwoven like the trellice of a
vine, they break up the light of the sky into golden
flecks, and make you, of the common highway, a
bower of the most approved secludedness and beauty.
The houses are something between an Italian palace
and an English cottagebuilt of wood, but, in the
dim light of those overshadowing trees, as fair to the
eye as marble with their triennial coats of paint; and
each stands in the midst of its own encircling
grass-plot
,
half buried in vines and flowers, and facing
outward from a cluster of gardens divided by slender
palings, and filling up with fruit-trees and
summerhouses
the square on whose limit it stands. Then,
like the vari-coloured parallelograms upon a
chessboard
,
green openings are left throughout the town,
fringed with triple and interweaving elm-rows, the
long and weeping branches sweeping downward to
the grass, and with their enclosing shadows keeping
moist and cool the road they overhang; and fair
forms (it is the garden of American beauty
New-Haven
)
flit about in the green light in primitive
security
and freedom, and you would think the place, if
you alit upon it in a summer's eveningwhat it seems
to me now in memory, and what I have made it in
this Rosa-Matilda descriptiona scene from
Boccaccio
,
or a vision from long-lost Arcady.
New-Haven may have eight thousand inhabitants.
Its steamers run to New-York in six hours (or did in
my timeI have ceased to be astonished on
that
subject
,
and should not wonder if they did it now in
one
a trifle of seventy miles up the Sound,) and the
ladies go up in the morning for a yard of bobbin and
return at night, and the gentlemen the same for a
stroll in Broadway; and it is to this circumstance
that, while it preserves its rural exterior, it is a very
metropolitan place in the character of its society.
The Amaryllis of the petty cottage you admire wears
the fashion twenty days from Paris, and her shepherd
has a coat from Nugee, the divine peculiarity of
which is not yet suspected east of Bond-street; and, in
the newspaper hanging half out of the window, there
is news, red-hot with the velocity of its arrival, from
Russia and the Rocky Mountains, from the sources of
the Mississippi and the brain of Monsieur Herbault.
Distance is an imaginary quantity, and Time, that
used to give every thing the go-by, has come to a
stand-still in his astonishment. There will be a
proposition
in Congress ere long to do without him
altogether
every
new thing saves time so
marvellously
.
Bright as seems to me this seat of my Alma Mater,
however, and gaily as I describe it, it is to me, if I may
so express it, a picture of memory glazed and put
away; if I see it ever again, it will be but to walk
through its embowered streets by a midnight moon.
It is vain and heart-breaking to go back, after absence,
to any spot of earth of which the interest was the
human
love whose home and cradle it had been. But
there is a period in our lives when the heart fuses and
compounds with the things about it, and the close
enamel with which it overruns and binds in the
affections
,
and which hardens in the lapse of years till the
immortal germ within is not more durable and
unwasting
,
warms never again, nor softens; and there
is nothing on earth so mournful and unavailing as to
return to the scenes which are unchanged, and look
to return to ourselves and others as we were when we
thus knew them.
Yet we think (I judge you by my own soul, gentle
reader,) that it is othersnot wewho are changed!
We meet the friend that we loved in our youth, and
it is ever
he
who is cold and altered! We take the
hand that we bent over with our passionate kisses in
boyhood, and our raining tears when we last parted,
and it is ever hers that returns not the pressure and
her
eyes, and not oursoh,
not ours!
that look back
the moistened and once familiar regard with a dry lid
and a gaze of stone! Oh God! it is ever
he
,the
friend you have worshipped,for whom you would
have died,who gives you the tips of his fingers, and
greets you with a phrase of fashion, when you would
rush into his bosom and break your heart with
weeping
out the imprisoned tenderness of years! I could
carve out the heart from my bosom, and fling it with
a malison into the sea, when I think how utterly and
worse than useless it is in this world of mocking
names! Yet love and friendship are words that
read well. You could scarce spare them in poetry.
II.
It was, as I have said, a moonlight night of
unparalleled
splendor. The morrow was the college
anniversary
the
day of the departure of the senior class,
and the town, which is, as it were, a part of the
University
,
was in the usual tumult of the gayest and
saddest evening of the year. The night was warm,
and the houses, of which the drawing-rooms are all
on a level with the gardens in the rear, and through
which a long hall stretches like a ball room, were
thrown open, doors and windows, and the thousand
students of the University, and the crowds of their
friends, and the hosts of strangers drawn to the place
at this season by the annual festivities, and the
families
,
every one with a troop of daughters (as the leaves
on our trees, compared with those of old countries
three to one,so are our sons and daughters,) were all
sitting without lamps in the moon-lit rooms, or
strolling
15*
together, lovers and friends, in the fragrant
gardens
,
or looking out upon the street, returning the
greetings of the passers-by, or, with heads uncovered,
pacing backward and forward beneath the elms before
the door,the whole scene one that the angels in
heaven
might make a holiday to see.
There were a hundred of my fellow-seniorsyoung
men of from eighteen to twenty-four,every one of
whom was passing the last evening of the four most
impressible and attaching years of his life, with the
family in which he had been most intimate, in a town
where refinement and education had done their utmost
upon the society, and which was renowned
throughout
America for the extraordinary beauty of its women.
They had come from every state in the Union, and
the Georgian and the Vermontese, the Kentuckian and
the Virginian, were to start alike on the morrow-night
with a lengthening chain for home, each bearing away
the hearts he had attached to him, (one or more!) and
leaving his own, till, like the megnetized needle, it
should drop away with the weakened attraction; and
there was probably but
one
that night in the
departing
troop who was not whispering in some throbbing
ear the passionate but vain and mocking avowal of
fidelity in love! And yet I had had
my
attachments
too;and there was scarce a house in that leafy and
murmuring paradise of friendship and trees, that would
not have hailed me with acclamation had I entered
the door; and I make this record of kindness and
hospitality
,
(unforgotten after long years of vicissitude
and travel,) with the hope that there may yet live some
memory as constant as mine, and that some eye will
read it with a warmth in its lid, and some lipsome
one
at leastmurmur,
I
remember him! There
are trees in that town whose drooping leaves I could
press to my lips with an affection as passionate as if
they were human, though the lips and voices that have
endeared them to me are as changed as the foliage
upon the branch, and would recognise my love as
coldly.
There was one, I say, who walked the thronged
pavement alone that night, or but with such company
as Uhland's;
[3]
[3]
Almost the sweetest thing I remember is the German poet's thought
when crossing the ferry to his wife and child.
Take, O boatman! thrice thy fee,
Take, I give it willingly:
For,
invisibly to thee
,
Spirits twain have cross'd with me
.
yet the heart of that solitary senior was
far from lonely. The palm of years of ambition was
in his grasp,the reward of daily self-denial and
midnight
watching,the prize of a straining mind and a
yearning desire;and there was not one of the many
who spoke of him that night in those crowded rooms,
either to rejoice in his success or to wonder at its
attainment, who had the shadow of an idea what
spirit sat uppermost in his bosom. Oh! how common
is this ignorance of human motives! How distant,
and slight, and unsuspected are the springs often of
the most desperate achievement! How little the world
knows for what the poet writes, the scholar toils, the
politician sells his soul, and the soldier perils his life!
And how insignificant and unequal to the result would
seem these invisible wires, could they be traced back
from the hearts whose innermost resource and faculty
they have waked and exhausted! It is a startling
thing to question even your own soul for its motive.
Ay, even in trifles. Ten to one you are surprised at
the answer. I have asked myself, while writing this
sentence, whose eye it is most meant to please; and,
as I live, the face that is conjured at my bidding is of
one of whom I have not had a definite thought for
years. I would lay my life she thinks at this instant
I have forgotten her very name. Yet I know she
will read this page with an interest no other could
awaken, striving to trace in it the changes that have
come over me since we parted. I know, (and I knew
then
, though we never exchanged a word save in
friendship,) that she devoted her innermost soul when
we strayed together by that wild river in the West,
(dost thou remember it, dear friend? for now I speak
to thee!) to the study of a mind and character of which
she thought better than the world or their possessor;
and I knowoh, how
well
I know!that with
husband
and children around her, whom she loves and
to whom she is devoted, the memory of me is laid
away in her heart like a fond but incomplete dream of
what once seemed possible,the feeling with which
the mother looks on her witless boy and loves him
more for what he
might
have been, than his brothers
for what they
are!
I scarce know what thread I dropped to take up this
improvista
digression, (for, like Opportunity and the
Hours, I never look back;
[4]
[4]
Walter Savage Landor.
)but let us return to
the shadow of the thousand elms of New-Haven.
The Gascon thought his own thunder and
lightning
superior to that of other countries, but I must run
the hazard of your incredulity as well, in preferring
an American moon. In Greece and Asia Minor,
perhaps
,
(
ragione
she was first worshipped there)
Cytheris
shines as brightly; but the Ephesian of
Connecticut
sees the flaws upon the pearly buckler of the
goddess
,
as does the habitant of no other clime. His eye
lies close to the moon. There is no film, and no
visible
beam in the clarified atmosphere. Her light is
less an emanation than a presencethe difference
between
the water in a thunder shower and the depths
of the sea. The moon struggles to you in England
she is all about you, like an element of the air, in
America.
The night was breathless, and the fragmented light
lay on the pavement in motionless stars, as clear and
definite in their edges as if the patines of bright gold
had dropped through the trees, and lay glittering
beneath
my feet. There was a kind of darkness visible
in the streets, overshadowed as they were by the massy
and leaf-burthened elms, and as I looked through the
houses, standing in obscurity myself, the gardens
seemed
full of day-lightthe unobstructed moon poured
with such a flood of radiance on the flowery alleys
within, and their gay troops of promenaders. And as
I distinguished one and another familiar friend, with
a form as familiar clinging to his side, and, with
drooping
head and faltering step, listening or replying, (I
well knew,) to the avowals of love and truth, I
murmured
in thought to my own far away, but
never-forgotten
Edith, a vow as deepay, deeper than theirs,
as my spirit and hers had been sounded by the
profounder
plummet of sorrow and separation. How the
very moonlighthow the stars of heavenhow the
balm in the air, and the languor of summer night in
my indolent frame, seemed, in those hours of
loneliness
,
ministers at the passionate altar-fires of my love!
Forsworn and treacherous Edith! do I live to write
this for thine eye?
I linger upon these trifles of the pastthese hours
for which I would have borrowed wings when they
were hereand, as
then
they seemed but the flowering
promise of happiness, they seem
now
like the fruit,
enjoyed and departed.
Past
and
future
bliss there
would seem to be in the worldknows any one of
such a commodity in the
present?
I have not seen
it in my travels.
III.
I was strolling on through one of the most
fashionable
and romantic streets (when did these two words
ever before find themselves in a sentence together?)
when a drawing-room with which I was very familiar,
lit, unlike most others on that bright night, by a
suspended
lamp, and crowded with company, attracted
my attention for a moment. Between the house and
the street there was a slight shrubbery shut in by a
white paling, just sufficient to give an air of seclusion
to the low windows without concealing them from the
passer-by, and, with the freedom of an old visiter, I
unconsciously stopped, and looked unobserved into
the rooms. It was the residence of a magnificent
girl, who was generally known as the Connecticut
beautya singular instance in America of what is
called in England a
fine
woman. (With us that word
applies wholly to moral qualities.) She was as large
as Juno, and a great deal handsomer, if the painters
have done that much-snubbed goddess justice. She
was a book of beauty printed with virgin type;
and that, by the way, suggests to me what I have all
my life been trying to expressthat some women
seem wrought of
new
material altogether, apropos to
others who seem mortal
rchauffes
as if every limb
and feature had been used, and got out of shape in
some other person's service. The lady I speak of
looked
new
and her name was Isidora.
She was standing just under the lamp, with a
single
rose in her hair, listening to a handsome
coxcomb
of a classmate of mine with evident pleasure.
She was a great fool, (did I mention that before?)
but weak, and vacant, and innocent of an idea as she
was, Faustina was not more naturally majestic, nor
Psyche (
soit elle en grande
) more divinely and
meaningly
graceful. Loveliness and fascination came to
her as dew and sunshine to the flowers, and she
obeyed her instinct, as they theirs, and was helplessly,
and without design, the loveliest thing in nature. I
do not see, for my part, why all women should not
be so. They are as useful as flowers; they perpetuate
our species.
I was looking at her with irresistible admiration,
when a figure stepped out from the shadow of a tree,
and my chum, monster, and ally, Job Smith, (of
whom I have before spoken in these historical papers,)
laid his hand on my shoulder.
Do you know, my dear Job, I said, in a solemn
tone of admonition, that blind John was imprisoned
for looking into people's windows?
But Job was not in the vein for pleasantry. The
light fell on his face as I spoke to him, and a more
haggard, almost blasted expression of countenance, I
never saw even in a madhouse. I well knew he had
loved the splendid girl that stood unconsciously in our
sight, since his first year in college; but that it would
ever so master him, or that he could link his
monstrous
deformity, even in thought, with that radiant
vision of beauty, was a thing that I thought as
probable
as that hirsute Pan would tempt from her sphere
the moon that kissed Endymion.
I have been standing here looking at Isidora, ever
since you left me, said he. (We had parted three
hours before, at twilight.)
And why not go in, in the name of common
sense?
Oh! God, Phil!with this demon in my heart?
Can you see my face in this light?
It was too true! he would have frightened the
household gods from their pedestals.
But what would you do, my dear Job? Why
come here to madden yourself with a sight you must
have known you would see?
Phil?
What, my dear boy?
Will you do me a kindness?
Certainly.
Isidora would do any thing you wished her to do.
Um! with a reservation, my dear chum!
But she would give you the rose that is in her
hair.
Without a doubt.
And for meif you told her it was for me.
Would she not?
Perhaps. But will that content you?
It will soften my despair. I will never look on
her face more; but I should like my last sight of her
to be associated with kindness?
Poor Job! how true it is that affection is a fire
which kindleth as well in the bramble as in the oak,
and catcheth hold where it first lighteth, not where it
may best burn. I do believe in my heart that the soul
in thee was designed for a presentable bodythy
instincts
were so invariably mistaken. When didst
thou ever think a thought, or stir hand or foot, that it
did not seem prompted, monster though thou wert, by
conscious good-looking-ness! What a lying
similitude
it was that was written on every blank page in
thy Lexicon: Larks that mount in the air, build
their nests below in the earth; and women that cast
their eyes upon kings, may place their hearts upon
vassals. Appelles must have been better looking
than Alexander, when Campaspe said that!
As a general thing you may ask a friend freely to
break any three of the commandments in your service,
but you should hesitate to require of friendship a
violation
of etiquette. I was in a round jacket and boots, and
it was a dress evening throughout New-Haven. I
looked at my dust-covered feet, when Job asked me to
enter a soire upon his errand, and passed my thumb
and finger around the edge of my white jacket; but I
loved Job as the Arabian loves his camel, and for the
same reason, with a differencethe imperishable
wellspring
he carried in his heart through the desert of the
world, and which I well knew he would give up his
life to offer at need, as patiently as the animal whose
construction (inner and outer) he so remarkably
resembled
.
When I hesitated, and looked down at my
boots, therefore, it was less to seek for an excuse to
evade the sacrificing office required of me, than to
beat about in my unprepared mind for a preface to my
request. If she had been a woman of sense, I should
have had no difficulty; but it requires caution and
skill to go out of the beaten track with a fool.
Would not the rose do as well, said I, in desperate
embarrassment, if she does not know that it is for
you, my dear Job? It would have been very easy to
have asked for it for myself.
Job laid his hand upon his side, as if I could not
comprehend the pang my proposition gave him.
Away prop, and down, scaffold, thought I, as I
gave my jacket a hitch, and entered the door.
Mr. Slingsby, announced the servant.
Mr. Slingsby? inquired the mistress of the house,
seeing only a white jacket in the
clair obscur
of the
hall.
Mr. Slingsby!!! cried out twenty voices in
amazement, as I stepped over the threshhold into the
light.
It has happened since the days of Thebet Ben
Khorat
,
that scholars have gone mad, and my sanity was
evidently the uppermost concern in the minds of all
present. (I should observe, that in those days, I
VOL. I. 16
relished rather of dandyism.) As I read the suspicion
in their minds, however, a thought struck me. I went
straight up to Miss Higgins, and,
sotto voce
, asked her
to take a turn with me in the garden.
Isidora, I said, I have long known your
superiority
of mind, (when you want any thing of a
woman
,
praise her for that in which she is most deficient,
says La Bruyre,) and I have great occasion to rely
on it in the request I am about to make of you.
She opened her eyes, and sailed along the
gravel-walk
with heightened majesty. I had not had
occasion
to pay her a compliment before since my
freshman
year.
What is it, Mr. Slingsby?
You know Smithmy chum.
Certainly.
I have just come from him.
Well!
He is gone mad!
Mad! Mr. Slingsby?
Stark and furious!
Gracious goodness!
And all for you!
For me!!
For you! I thought her great blue eyes would
have become what they call in America sot, at this
astounding communication.
Now, Miss Higgins, I continued, pray listen;
my poor friend has such extraordinary muscular
strength, that seven men cannot hold him.
Gracious!
And he has broken away, and is here at your door.
Good gracious!
Don't be afraid! He is as gentle as a kitten when
I am present. And now hear my request.He leaves
town to-morrow, as you well know, not to return. I
shall take him home to Vermont with keepers. He is
bent upon one thing, and in that you must humour
him.
Miss Higgins began to be alarmed.
He has looked through the window and seen you
with a rose in your hair, and, despairing even in his
madness, of your love, he says, that if you would give
him that rose with a kind word, and a farewell, he
should be happy. You will do it, will you not?
Dear me! I should be
so
afraid to speak to him!
But will you? and I'll tell you what to say.
Miss Higgins gave a reluctant consent, and I passed
ten minutes in drilling her upon two sentences, which,
with her fine manner and sweet voice, really sounded
like the most interesting thing in the world. I left her
in the summer-house at the end of the garden, and
returned
to Job.
You have come without it! said the despairing
lover, falling back against the tree.
Miss Higgins's compliments, and begs you will go
round by the gate, and meet her in the summer-house.
She prefers to manage her own affairs.
Good God! are you mocking me?
I will accompany you, my dear boy.
There was a mixture of pathos and ludicrousness
in that scene which starts a tear and a laugh together,
whenever I recall it to my mind. The finest heart in
the world, the most generous, the most diffident of
itself
,
yet the most self-sacrificing and delicate, was at
the altar of its devotion, offering its all in passionate
abandonment for a flower and a kind word; and she,
a goose in the guise of an angel, repeated a phrase of
kindness of which she could not comprehend the
meaning
or the worth, but which was to be garnered up by
that half-broken heart, as a treasure that repaid him
for years of unrequited affection! She recited it really
very well. I stood at the latticed door, and interrupted
them the instant there was a pause in the dialogue;
and getting Job away as fast as possible, I left Miss
Higgins with a promise of secrecy, and resumed my
midnight stroll.
Aproposamong Job's letters is a copy of verses
which, spite of some little inconsistencies, I think
were written on this very occasion.
I.
Naysmile not on meI have borne
Indifference and repulse from thee;
With my heart sickening I have worn
A brow, as thine own cold one, free;
My lip has been as gay as thine,
Ever thine own light mirth repeating,
Though, in this burning brain of mine,
A throb the while, like death, was beating;
My spirit did not shrink or swerve
Thy lookI thank thee!froze the nerve!
II.
But now again, as when I met
And loved thee in my happier days,
A smile upon thy bright lip plays,
And kindness in thine eye is set
And this I cannot bear!
It melts the manhood from my pride,
It brings me closer to thy side
Bewilderschains me there
Therewhere my dearest hope was crush'd and died!
III.
Oh, if thou could'st but know the deep
Of love that hope has nursed for years,
How in the heart's still chambers sleep
Its hoarded thoughts, its trembling fears
Treasure that love has brooded o'er
Till life, than this, has nothing more
And could'st thoubut 'tis vain!
I will not, cannot tell thee, how
That hoard consumes its coffer now
I may not write of pain
That sickens in the heart, and maddens in the brain!
IV.
Then smile not on me! pass me by
Coldly, and with a careless mien
'Twill pierce my heart, and fill mine eye,
But I shall be as I have been
Quiet in my despair!
'Tis better than the throbbing fever,
That else were in my brain for ever,
And easier to bear!
I'll not upbraid the coldest look
The bitterest word thou hast, in my sad pride I'll brook!
If Job had rejoiced in a more euphonous name, I
should have bought a criticism in some review, and
started him fairly as a poet. But Job Smith!
Poems by Job Smith!It would never do! If he
wrote like a seraph, and printed the book at his own
expense, illustrated and illuminated, and half-a-crown
to each person that would take one away, the critics
would damn him all the same! Really one's father
and mother have a great deal to answer for!
But Job is a poet who should have lived in the
middle ages, no less for the convenience of the
nom
ne guerre
, fashionable in those days, than because
his poetry, being chiefly the mixed product of feeling
and courtesy, is particularly susceptible to ridicule.
The philosophical and iron-wire poetry of our day
stands an attack like a fortification, and comes down
upon the besieger with reason and logic as good as his
own. But the more delicate offspring of tenderness
and chivalry, intending no violence, and venturing
out to sea upon a rose-leaf, is destroyed and sunk
beyond
diving-bells by half a breath of scorn. I would
subscribe liberally myself to a private press and a
court of honour in poetrycritics, if admitted, to be
dumb upon a penalty. Will no Howard or
Wilberforce
act upon this hint? Poets now-a-days are more
slaves and felons than your African, or your culprit
at the old Bailey!
16*
I would go a great way, privately, to find a genuine
spark of chivalry, and Job lit his every-day lamp with
it. See what a redolence of old time there is in these
verses, which I copied long ago from a lady's album.
Yet, you may ridicule them if you like!
There is a story I have met,
Of a high angel, pure and true,
With eyes that tears had never wet,
And lips that pity never knew;
But ever on his throne he sate,
With his white pinions proudly furl'd,
And, looking from his high estate,
Beheld the errors of a world;
Yet, never, as they rose to heaven,
Plead even for one to be forgiven.
God look'd at last upon his pride,
And bade him fold his shining wing,
And o'er a land where tempters bide,
He made the heartless angel king.
'Tis lovely reading in the tale,
The glorious spells they tried on him,
Ere grew his heavenly birth-star pale,
Ere grew his frontlet jewel dim
Cups of such rare and ravishing wines
As even a god might drink and bless,
Gems from unsearch'd and central mines,
Whose light than heaven's was scarcely less
Gold of a sheen like crystal spars,
And silver whiter than the moon's,
And music like the songs of stars,
And perfume like a thousand Junes,
And breezes, soft as heaven's own air,
Like fingers playing in his hair!
He shut his eyeshe closed his ears
He bade them in God's name, begone!
And, through the yet eternal years,
Had stood, the tried and sinless one;
But there was yet one untried spell,
A woman temptedand he fell!
And Iif semblance I may find
Between such glorious sphere and mine
Am not to the high honour blind,
Of filling this fair page of thine
Writing my unheard name among
Sages and sires and men of song;
But honour, though the best e'er given,
And glory, though it were a king's,
And power, though loving it like heaven,
Were, to my seeming, lesser things,
And less temptation, far, to me,
Than half a hope of serving thee!
I am mounted upon my hobby now, dear reader;
for Job Smith, though as hideous an idol as ever was
worshipped on the Indus, was still my idol. Here is
a little touch of his quality:
I look upon the fading flowers
Thou gav'st me, lady, in thy mirth,
And mourn, that, with the perishing hours
Such fair things perish from the earth
For thus, I know, the moment's feeling
Its own light web of life unweaves,
The deepest trace from memory stealing,
Like perfume from these dying leaves,
The thought that gave it, and the flower,
Alike the creatures of an hour.
And thus it better were, perhaps,
For feeling is the nurse of pain,
And joys that linger in their lapse,
Must die at last, and so are vain!
Could I revive these faded flowers,
Could I call back departed bliss,
I would not, though this world of ours
Were ten times brighter than it is!
They mustand let thempass away!
We
are forgotteneven as they!
I think I must give Edith another reprieve. I
have no idea why I have digressed this time from the
story which (you may see by the motto at the
beginning
of the paper) I have not yet told. I can
conceive
easily how people, who have nothing to do,
betake
themselves to autobiographyit is so pleasant
rambling about over the past and regathering only
the flowers. Why should pain and mortification be
unsepultured? The world is no wiser for these
written
experiences. The best book, said Southey,
does but little good to the world, and much harm to
the author. I shall deliberate whether to enlighten
the world as to Edith's metempsychosis, or no.
PART IV.
SCENERY AND A SCENE.
Truth is no Doctoresse; she takes no degrees at Paris or Oxford,
amongst great clerks, disputants, subtle Aristotles, men
nodosi ingenii
, able to take Lully by the chin; but oftentimes, to such an one as
myself
,
an
Idiota
or common person, no great things, melancholizing in
woods where waters are, quiet places by rivers, fountains; whereas
the silly man, expecting no such matter, thinketh only how best to
delectate and refresh his mynde continually with nature, her pleasaunt
scenes, woods, waterfalls; on a sudden the goddess herself, Truth,
has appeared with a shining light and a sparkling countenance, so as ye
may not be able lightly to resist her.
Burton
.
Ever thus
Drop from us treasures one by one;
They who have been from youth with us,
Whose every look, whose every tone,
Is linked to us like leaves to flowers
They who have shared our pleasant hours
Whose voices, so familiar grown,
They almost seem to us our own
The echoes of each breath of ours
They who have ever been our pride,
Yet in their hours of triumph dearest
They whom we must have known and tried,
And loved the most when tried the nearest
They pass from us, like stars that wane,
The brightest still before,
Or gold links broken from a chain
That can be join'd no more.
Job Smith
and myself were on the return from
Niagara
.
It was in the slumberous and leafy midst of
June. Lake Erie had lain with a silver glaze upon
its bosom for days;the ragged trees upon its green
shore dropping their branches into the stirless water,
as if it were some rigid imitationthe lake glass, and
the leaves emerald;the sky was of an April blue,
as if a night-rain had washed out its milkiness, till you
could see through its clarified depths to the gates of
heaven; and yet breathless and sunny as was the
face of the earth, there was a nerve and a vitality in
the air that exacted of every pulse its full compass,
searched every pore for its capacity of the joy of
existence
.
No one can conceive who has not had his imagination
stretched at the foot of Niagara, or in the Titanic
solitudes
of the west, the vastness of the unbroken phases
of nature;where every tree looks a king, and every
flower a marvel of glorious form and colourwhere
the rocks are rent every one as by the tenth
thunderbolt
and
lake, mountain or river, ravine or
waterfall
,
cave or eagle's nest, whatever it may be that feeds
the eye or the fancy, is as the elements have shaped
and left itwhere the sculpture, and the painting, and
the poetry, and the wonderful alchymy of Nature, go
on under the naked eye of the Almighty, and by His
own visible and uninterrupted hand, and where the
music of nature, from the anthem of the torrent and
storm, broken only by the scream of the vulture, to the
trill of the rivulet with its accompaniment of singing
birds and winds, is for ever ringing its changes, as if
for the stars to hearin such scenes, I say, and in such
scenes only, is the imagination overtasked or stretched
to the capacity of a seraph's; and while common minds
sink beneath them to the mere inanition of their animal
senses, the loftier spirit takes their colour and stature,
and outgrows the common and pitiful standards of the
world. Cooper and Leatherstocking thus became what
they arethe one a high priest of imagination and
poetry
,
and the other a simple-hearted but mere creature
of instinct; and Cooper is no more a living man,
liable
to the common laws of human nature, than
Leatherstocking
a true and life-like transcript of the more
common effects of those overpowering solitudes on the
character.
We got on board the canal-boat at noon, and Job
and myself, seated on the well-cushioned seats, with
the blinds half-turned to give us the prospect and
exclude
the sun, sat disputing in our usual amicable way.
He was the only man I ever knew with whom I could
argue without losing my temper; and the reason was,
that I always had the last word, and thought myself
victorious.
We are about to return into the bosom of society,
my dear Job, said I, looking, with unctuous good
nature
on the well-shaped boot I had put on for the first
time in a month that morning. (It is an
unsentimental
fact that hob-nailed shoes are indispensable on the
most poetical spots of earth.)
Yes, said Job; but how superior is the society
we leave behind! Niagara and Erie! What in your
crowded city is comparable to these?
Nothing, for size!but for societyyou will think
me a Pagan, dear chum,but, on my honor, straight
from Niagara as I come, I feel a most dissatisfied
yearning
for the society of Miss Popkins!
Oh, Phil!
On my honour!
You, who were in such raptures at the Falls!
And real onesbut I wanted a woman at my elbow
to listen to them. Do you know, Job, I have made up
my mind on a great principle since we have been on our
travels. Have you observed that I was pensive?
Not particularlybut what is your principle?
That a man is a much more interesting object
than a mountain.
A man! did you say?
Yesbut I meant a woman!
I don't think so.
I do!and I judge by myself. When did I ever
see wonder of naturetree, sunset, waterfall, rapid,
lake, or river,that I would not rather have been
talking to a woman the while? Do you remember
the three days we were tramping through the forest
without seeing the sun, as if we had been in the
endless
aisle of a cathedral? Do you remember the long
morning when we lay on the moss at the foot of
Niagara
,
and it was a divine luxury only to breathe?
Do you remember the lunar rainbows at midnight on
Goat Island? Do you remember the ten thousand
glorious moments we have enjoyed between weather
and scenery since the bursting of these summer leaves?
Do you?
Certainly, my dear boy!
Well, then, much as I love nature and you, there
has not been an hour since we packed our knapsacks,
that, if I could have distilled a charming girl out of a
mixture of you and any mountain, river or rock that
I have seen, I would not have flung you, without
remorse
,
into any witch's cauldron that was large enough,
and would boil at my bidding.
Monster!
And I believe I should have the same feelings in
Italy or Greece, or wherever people go into raptures
with things you can neither eat nor make love to.
Would not even the Venus fill your fancy for a
day?
An hour, perhaps, it might; for I should be
studying
,
in its cold Parian proportions, the warm structure
of some living Musidorabut I should soon tire of it,
and long for my lunch or my love; and I give you
my honor I would not lose the three meals of a single
day to see Santa Croce and St. Peter's.
Both?
Both.
Job disdained to argue against such a want of
sentimental
principle, and pulling up the blind, he fixed
his eyes on the slowly gliding panorama of rock and
forest, and I mounted for a promenade upon the deck.
Mephistopheles could hardly have found a more
striking amusement for Faust than the passage of three
hundred miles in the canal from lake Erie to the
Hudson
.
As I walked up and down the deck of the
packet-boat
,
I thought to myself, that if it were not for
thoughts of things that come more home to one's
business and bosom, (particularly bosom,) I could
be content to retake my berth at Schenectady, and
return
to Buffalo for amusement. The Erie canal-boat
is a long and very pretty drawing room afloat. It has
a library, sofas, a tolerable cook, curtains or Venetian
blinds, a civil captain, and no smell of steam or
perceptible
motion. It is drawn generally by three horses
at a fair trot, and gets you through about a hundred
miles a day, as softly as if you were witch'd over the
ground by Puck and Mustard-seed. The company
(say fifty people) is such as pleases heaven; though I
must say (with my eye all along the shore, collecting
the various dear friends I have made and left on that
VOL. I. 17
long canal) there are few highways on which you will
meet so many lovely and loving fellow-passengers.
On this occasion my star was bankruptJob Smith
being my only civilized companion, and I was left to
the unsatisfactory society of my own thoughts and the
scenery.
Discontented as I may seem to have been, I
remember
,
through eight or ten years of stirring and
thickly-sown
manhood, every moment of that lonely evening.
I remember the progression of the sunset, from the
lengthening shadows and the first gold upon the clouds,
to the deepening twilight and the new-sprung star hung
over the wilderness. And I remember what I am
going to describea twilight anthem in the forest
as you remember an air of Rossini's, or a transition in
the half-fiendish, half-heavenly creations of Meyerbeer.
I thought time dragged heavily then, but I wish I had
as light a heart and could feel as vividly now!
The Erie canal is cut a hundred or two miles through
the heart of the primeval wilderness of America, and
the boat was gliding on silently and swiftly, and never
sailed a lost cloud through the abysses of space on a
course more apparently new and untrodden. The
luxuriant soil had sent up a rank grass that covered
the horse-path like velvet; the Erie water was clear
as a brook in the winding canal; the old shafts of the
gigantic forest spurred into the sky by thousands, and
the yet unseared eagle swung off from the dead branch
of the pine, and skimmed the tree-tops for another
perch, as if he had grown to believe that gliding spectre
a harmless phenomenon of nature. The horses drew
steadily and unheard at the end of the long line; the
steersman stood motionless at the tiller, and I lay on
a heap of baggage in the prow, attentive to the
slightest
breathing of nature, but thinking, with an ache at
my heart, of Edith Linsey, to whose feet (did I
mention
it?) I was hastening with a lover's proper
impatience
.
I might as well have taken another turn in
my fool's paradise.
The gold of the sunset had glided up the dark pine
tops and disappeared, like a ring taken slowly from
an Ethiop's finger; the whip-poor-will had chanted
the first stave of his lament; the bat was abroad, and
the screech-owl, like all bad singers, commenced
without waiting to be importuned, though we were
listening for the nightingale. The air, as I said
before
,
had been all day breathless; but as the first
chill of evening displaced the warm atmosphere of
the departed sun, a slight breeze crisped the mirrored
bosom of the canal, and then commenced the night
anthem of the forest, audible, I would fain believe,
in its soothing changes, by the dead tribes whose
bones whiten amid the perishing leaves. First,
whisperingly
yet articulately, the suspended and wavering
foliage of the birch was touched by the many-fingered
wind, and, like a faint prelude, the silver-lined leaves
rustled in the low branches; and, with a moment's
pause, when you could hear the moving of the
vulture's
claws upon the bark, as he turned to get his
breast to the wind, the increasing breeze swept into
the pine-tops, and drew forth from their fringe-like
and myriad tassels a low monotone like the refrain of
a far-off dirge; and still as it murmured, (seeming to
you sometimes like the confused and heart-broken
responses of the penitents on a cathedral floor,) the
blast strengthened and filled, and the rigid leaves of
the oak, and the swaying fans and chalices of the
magnolia
,
and the rich cups of the tulip-trees, stirred and
answered with their different voices like many-toned
harps; and when the wind was fully abroad, and
every moving thing on the breast of the earth was
roused from its daylight repose, the irregular and
capricious blast, like a player on an organ of a
thousand
stops, lulled and strengthened by turns, and
from the hiss in the rank grass, low as the whisper
of fairies, to the thunder of the impinging and
groaning
branches of the larch and the fir, the anthem
went ceaselessly through its changes, and the
harmony
,
(though the owl broke in with his scream, and
though the over-blown monarch of the wood came
crashing to the earth,) was still perfect and without
a jar. It is strange that there is no sound of nature
out of tune. The roar of the waterfall comes into
this anthem of the forest like an accompaniment of
bassoons, and the occasional bark of the wolf, or the
scream of a night-bird, or even the deep-throated
croak of the frog, is no more discordant than the
outburst
of an octave flute above the even melody of an
orchestra; and it is surprising how the large
raindrops
,
pattering on the leaves, and the small voice of
the nightingale (singing, like nothing but himself,
sweetest in the darkness) seems an intensitive and a
low burthen to the general anthem of the earthas
it were, a single voice among instruments.
I had what Wordsworth calls a couchant ear in
my youth, and my story will wait, dear reader, while
I tell you of another harmony that I learned to love
in the wilderness.
There will come sometimes in the springsay in
May, or whenever the snow-drops and sulphur
butterflies
are tempted out by the first timorous sunshine
there will come, I say, in that yearning and
youth-renewing
season, a warm shower at noon. Our tent
shall be pitched on the skirts of a forest of young
pines, and the evergreen foliage, if foliage it may be
called, shall be a daily refreshment to our eye while
watching, with the west wind upon our cheeks, the
unclothed branches of the elm. The rain descends
softly and warm; but with the sunset the clouds break
away, and it grows suddenly cold enough to freeze.
The next morning you shall come out with me to a
hill-side looking upon the south, and lie down with
your ear to the earth. The pine tassels hold in every
four of their fine fingers a drop of rain frozen like a
pearl in a long ear-ring, sustained in their loose grasp
by the rigidity of the cold. The sun grows warm at
ten, and the slight green fingers begin to relax and
yield, and by eleven they are all drooping their icy
pearls upon the dead leaves with a murmur through
the forest like the swarming of the bees of Hybla.
There is not much variety in its music, but it is a
pleasant montone for thought, and if you have a
restless fever in your bosom (as I had, when I learned
to love it, for the travel which has corrupted the heart
and the ear that it soothed and satisfied then) you may
lie down with a crooked root under your head in the
skirts of the forest, and thank Heaven for an anodyne
to care. And it is better than the voice of your friend,
or the song of your lady-love, for it exacts no
gratitude
,
and will not desert you ere the echo dies upon
the wind.
Oh, how many of these harmonies there are!how
many that we hear, and how many that are too
constant to be heard! I could go back to my youth,
now, with this thread of recollection, and
unsepulture
a hoard of simple and long-buried joys that
would bring the blush upon my cheek to think how
my senses are dulled since such things could give me
pleasure! Is there no well of Kanathos for
renewing
the youth of the soul?no St. Hilary's cradle?
no elixir to cast the slough of heart-sickening and
heart-tarnishing custom? Find me an alchymy for
that
, with your alembic and crucible, and you may
resolve to dross again your philosopher's stone!
17*
II.
Every body who makes the passage of the Erie
canal, stops at the half-way town of Utica, to visit a
wonder of nature fourteen miles to the west of it, called
Trenton Falls. It would be becoming in me, before
mentioning the Falls, however, to sing the praises of
Utica and its twenty thousand inhabitantshaving
received much hospitality from the worthy burghers,
and philandered up and down their well-flagged
trottoir
very much to my private satisfaction. I should
scorn any man's judgment who should attempt to
convince
me that the Erie water, which comes down the
canal a hundred and fifty miles, and passes through
the market-place of that pleasant town, has not
communicated
to the hearts of its citizens the expansion
and depth of the parent lake from which it is drawn.
I have a theory on that subject with which I intend
to surprise the world whenever politics and Mr. Bulwer
draw less engrossingly on its attention. Will any one
tell me that the dark eyes I knew there, and whose
like for softness and meaning I have inquired for in
vain through Italy, and the voice that accompanied
their gaze(that Pasta, in her divinest out-gush of
melody and soul, alone recalls to me)that these, and
the noble heart, and high mind, and even the genius, that
were other gifts of the same marvel among women
that these were born of common parentage, and nursed
by the air of a demi-metropolis? We were but the
kindest of friends, that bright creature and myself, and
I may say, without charging myself with the blindness
of love, that I believe in my heart she was the
foster-child
of the water-spirits on whose wandering
streamlet
she livedthat the thousand odors that swept down
from the wilderness upon Lake Erie, and the unseen
but wild and innumerable influences of nature, or
whatever you call that which makes the Indian a
believer
in the Great Spiritthat these came down with
those clear waters, ministering to the mind and
watching
over the budding beauty of this noble and most
high-hearted woman! If you do not believe it, I should
like you to tell me how else such a creature was
raised, as they phrase it in Virginia. I shall hold
to my theory till you furnish me with a more
reasonable
.
We heard at the hotel that there were several large
parties at Trenton Falls, and with an abridgment of
our toilets in our pockets, Job and I galloped out of
Utica about four o'clock of as bright a summer's
afternoon
as was ever promised in the Almanac. We drew
rein a mile or two out of town, and dawdled along the
wild road more leisurely, Job's Green Mountain
proportions
fitting to the saddle something in the manner
and relative fitness of a skeleton on a poodle. By the
same token he rode safely, the looseness of his bones
accommodating itself with singular facility to the
irregularities in the pace of the surprised animal
beneath
him.
I dislike to pass over the minutest detail of a period
of my life that will be rather interesting in my
biography
,
(it is my intention to be famous enough to merit
that distinction, and I would recommend to my friends
to be noting my little peculiarities,) and with this
posthumous benevolence in my heart, I simply record,
that our conversation on the road turned upon Edith
Linseyat this time the lady of my constant lovefor
whose sake and at whose bidding I was just
concluding
(with success I presumed) a probation of three
years of absence, silence, hard study, and rigid morals,
and upon whose parting promise (God forgive her!) I
had built my uttermost gleaning and sand of earthly
hope and desire. I tell you in the tail of this
mocking
paragraph, dear reader, that the bend of the
rainbow
spans not the earth more perfectly than did the
love of that woman my hopes of future bliss; and that
ephemeral arc does not sooner melt into the clouds
but I am anticipating my story.
Job's extraordinary appearance, as he extricated
himself from his horse, usually attracted the entire
attention
of the by-standers at a strange inn, and under
cover of this, I usually contrived to get into the house
and commit him by ordering the dinner as soon as it
could be got ready. Else, if it was in the
neighbourhood
of scenery, he was off till heaven knew when,
and as I had that delicacy for his feelings never to
dine without him, you can imagine the necessity of
my hungry manuvre.
We dined upon the trout of the glorious stream we
had come to see; and as our host's eldest daughter
waited upon us, (recorded in Job's journal, in my
possession
at this moment, as the most comely and
gracious
virgin he had seen in his travels,) we felt
bound to adapt our conversation to the purity of her
mind, and discussed only the philosophical point,
whether the beauty of the stream could be tasted in
the flavour of the fishJob for it, I against it. The
argument was only interrupted by the entrance of an
apple pudding, so hot that our tongues were fully
occupied
in removing it from place to place as the mouth
felt its heat inconvenient, and then, being in a country
of liberty and equality, and the damsel in waiting, as
Job smilingly remarked, as much a lady as the
President's
wife, he requested permission to propose her
health in a cool tumbler of cider, and we adjourned to
the moonlight.
III.
Ten or fifteen years ago, the existence of Trenton
Falls was not known. It was discovered, like P
stum
,
by a wandering artist, when there was a town of
ten thousand inhabitants, a canal, a theatre, a
liberty-pole
,
and forty churches within fourteen miles of it.
It may be mentioned to the credit of the Americans,
that in the hardness of character of which
travellers
complain, there is the soft trait of a passion for
scenery; and before the fact of its discovery had got
well into the Cahawba Democrat and
Go-the-whole-hog-Courier
,
there was a splendid wooden
hotel on the edge of the precipice, with a French
cook, soda-water and olives, and a law was passed by
the Kentucky Travellers' Club, requiring a
hanging-bird's
nest from the trees frowning down the awful
abysm, (so expressed in the regulation,) as a
qualification
for membership. Thenceforward to the
present
time it has been a place of fashionable resort
during
the summer solstice, and the pine woods, in
which the hotel stands, being impervious to the sun,
it is prescribed by oculists for gentlemen and ladies
with weak eyes. If the luxury of corn-cutters had
penetrated to the United States, it might be prescribed
for tender feet as wellthe soft floor of pine-tassels
spread under the grassless woods, being considered an
improvement upon Turkey carpets and green-sward.
Trenton Falls is rather a misnomer. I scarcely
know what you would call it, but the wonder of
nature
which bears the name is a tremendous torrent,
whose bed, for several miles, is sunk fathoms deep
into
the eartha roaring and dashing stream, so far
below
the surface of the forest in which it is lost, that
you would think, as you come suddenly upon the
edge of its long precipice, that it was a river in some
inner world, (coiled within ours, as we in the outer
circle of the firmament,) and laid open by some
Titanic throe that had cracked clear asunder the crust
of this shallow earth. The idea is rather assisted if
you happen to see below you, on its abysmal shore, a
party of adventurous travellers; for, at that vast depth,
and in contrast with the gigantic trees and rocks, the
same number of well-shaped pismires, dressed in the
last fashions, and philandering upon your parlour
floor, would be about of their apparent size and
distinctness
.
They showed me at Eleusis the well by which
Proserpine ascends to the regions of day on her
annual
visit to the plains of Thessalybut with the
genius loci
at my elbow in the shape of a Greek girl
as lovely as Phryn, my memory reverted to the bared
axle of the earth in the bed of this American river,
and I was persuaded (looking the while at the
feroni
re
of gold sequins on the Phidian forehead of my
Katinka) that supposing Hades in the centre of the
earth, you are nearer to it by some fathoms at
Trenton
.
I confess I have had, since my first descent into
those depths, an uncomfortable doubt of the solidity
of the globehow the deuse it can hold together with
such a crack in its bottom!
It was a night to play Endymion, or do any
Tomfoolery
that could be laid to the charge of the moon,
for a more omnipresent and radiant atmosphere of
moonlight never sprinkled the wilderness with silver.
It was a night in which to wish it might never be
day again,a night to be enamoured of the stars, and
bid God bless them like human creatures on their
bright journey,a night to love in, to dissolve in,to
do every thing but what night is made for,sleep!
Oh Heaven! when I think how precious is life in such
moments; how the aroma,the celestial bloom and
flower of the soul,the yearning and fast-perishing
enthusiasm of youth waste themselves in the solitude
of such nights on the senseless and unanswering air;
when I wander alone, unloving and unloved, beneath
influences that could inspire me with the elevation of
a seraph, were I at the ear of a human creature that
could summon forth and measure my limitless
capacity
of devotion,when I think this, and feel this, and
so waste my existence in vain yearningsI could
extingush
the divine spark within me like a lamp on an
unvisited shrine, and thank Heaven for an
assimilation
to the animals I walk among! And that is the
substance of a speech I made to Job as a sequitur of a
well-meant remark of his own, that it was a pity
Edith Linsey was not there. He took the clause
about the animals to himself, and I made an apology
for the same a year after. We sometimes give our
friends, quite innocently, such terrible knocks in our
rhapsodies!
Most people talk of the
sublimity
of Trenton, but I
have haunted it by the week together for its mere
loveliness. The river, in the heart of that fearful
chasm, is the most varied and beautiful assemblage of
the thousand forms and shapes of running water that
I know in the world. The soil and the deep-striking
roots of the forest terminate far above you, looking like
a black rim on the enclosing precipices; the bed of
the river and its sky-sustaining walls are of solid rock,
and, with the tremendous descent of the stream,
forming for miles one continuous succession of falls
and rapids,the channel is worn into curves and
cavities
which throw the clear waters into forms of
inconceivable
brilliancy and variety. It is a sort of
half twilight below, with here and there a long beam
of sunshine reaching down to kiss the lip of an eddy
or form a rainbow over a fall, and the reverberating
and changing echoes,
Like a ring of bells whose sound the wind still alters,
maintain a constant and most soothing music, varying
at every step with the varying phase of the current.
Cascades of from twenty to thirty feet, over which
the river flies with a single and hurrying leap, (not a
drop missing from the glassy and bending sheet,)
occur
frequently as you ascend; and it is from these
that the place takes its name. But the Falls, though
beautiful, are only peculiar from the dazzling and
unequalled
rapidity with which the waters come to the
leap. If it were not for the leaf which drops
wavering
down into the abysm from trees apparently painted
on the sky, and which is caught away by the flashing
current as if the lightning had suddenly crossed it,
you would think the vault of the stedfast heavens a
flying element as soon. The spot in that long gulf of
beauty that I best remember is a smooth descent of some
hundred yards, where the river in full and undivided
volume skims over a plane as polished as a table of
scagliola, looking, in its invisible speed, like one
mirror
of gleaming but motionless crystal. Just above,
there is a sudden turn in the glen which sends the
water like a catapult against the opposite angle of the
rock, and, in the action of years, it has worn out a
cavern of unknown depth, into which the whole
mass of the river plunges with the abandonment of a
flying fiend into hell, and, re-appearing like the angel
that has pursued him, glides swiftly but with divine
serenity on its way. (I am indebted for that last
figure to Job, who travelled with a Milton in his
pocket, and had a natural redolence of Paradise
Lost in his conversation.)
Much as I detest water in small quantities (to drink,)
I have a hydromania in the way of lakes, rivers, and
waterfalls. It is, by much, the
belle
in the family of
the Elements.
Earth
is never tolerable unless
disguised
in green.
Air
is so thin as only to be visible
when she borrows drapery of Water; and
Fire
is so
staringly bright as to be unpleasant to the eyesight;
but
Water
! soft, pure, graceful Water! there is no
shape into which you can throw her that she does not
seem lovelier than before. She can borrow nothing
of her sisters. Earth has no jewels in her lap so
brilliant
as her own spray-pearls and emeralds;Fire has
no rubies like what she steals from the sunset;Air
has no robes like the grace of her fine-woven and
ever-changing
drapery of silver. A health (in wine!) to
Water
!
Who is there that did not love some stream in his
youth? Who is there in whose vision of the past
there does not sparkle up, from every picture of
childhood
,
a spring or a rivulet woven through the
darkened
and torn woof of first affections like a thread of
unchanged silver? How do you interpret the
instinctive
yearning with which you search for the
river-side or the fountain in every scene of nature,
the clinging unaware to the river's course when a
truant in the fields in June,the dull void you find in
every landscape of which it is not the ornament and
the centre? For myself, I hold with the Greek:
Water is the first principle of all things: we were
made from it and we shall be resolved into it.
[5]
[5]
The Ionic philosophy, supported by
Thales.
IV.
The awkward thing in all story-telling is transition.
Invention you do not need if you have experience;
for fact is stranger than fiction. A beginning in these
days of startling abruptness is as simple as open your
mouth; and when you have once begun you can end
whenever you like, and leave the sequel to the reader's
imagination: but the hinges of a story,the turning
gracefully
back
from a digression, (it is easy to turn
VOL. I. 18
into
one,)is the
pas qui cote
. My education on
that point was neglected.
It was, as I said before, a moonlight night, and
Job and myself having, like Sir Fabian, no mind
to sleep, followed the fashion and the rest of the
company
at the inn, and strolled down to see the Falls by
moonlight. I had been there before, and I took Job
straight to the spot in the bed of the river which I
have described above as my favourite, and, after
watching it for a few minutes, we turned back to a
dark cleft in the rock which afforded a rude seat, and
sat musing in silence.
Several parties had strolled past without seeing us
in our recess, when two female figures, with their
arms around each other's waists, sauntered slowly
around the jutting rock below, and approached us,
eagerly engaged in conversation. They came on to
the very edge of the shadow which enveloped us,
and turned to look back at the scene. As the head
nearest me was raised to the light, I started half to
my feet: it was Edith! In the same instant her
voice of music broke on my ear, and an irresistible
impulse to listen unobserved drew me down again
upon my seat, and Job, with a similar instinct, laid
his hand on my arm.
It was his favourite spot! said Edith. (We had
been at Trenton together years before.) I stood here
with him, and I wish he stood here now, that I might
tell him what my hand hesitates to write.
Poor Philip! said her companion, whom by the
voice I recognised as the youngest of the Flemings,
I cannot conceive how you can resolve so coldly to
break his heart.
I felt a dagger entering my bosom, but still I
listened
.
Edith went on.
Why, I will tell you, my dear little innocent. I
loved Philip Slingsby when I thought I was going to
die. It was then a fitting attachment, for I never
thought to need, of the goods of this world, more
than a sick chamber and a nurse; and Phil. was
kind-hearted
and devoted to me, and I lived at home.
But, with returned health, a thousand ambitious
desires
have sprung up in my heart, and I find myself
admired by whom I will, and every day growing
more selfish and less poetical. Philip is poor, and
love in a cottage, though very well for you if you
like it, would never do for me. I should like him
very well for a friend, for he is gentlemanlike and
devoted, but, with my ideas, I should only make him
miserable, and soI think I had better put him out
of misery at oncedon't you think?
A half-smothered groan of anguish escaped my lips;
but it was lost in the roar of the waters, and Edith's
voice, as she walked on, lessened and became
inaudible
to my ear. As her figure was lost in the shadow
of the rocks beyond, I threw myself on the bosom of
my friend, and wept in the unutterable agony of a
crushed heart. I know not how that night was spent,
but I awoke at noon of the next day, in my bed, with
Job's hand clasped tenderly in my own.
V.
I kept my tryst. I was to meet Edith Linsey at
Saratoga in July,the last month of the probation by
which I had won a right to her love. I had not
spoken
to her, or written, or seen her, (save, unknown to
her, in the moment I have described,) in the three
long years to which my constancy was devoted. I
had gained the usual meed of industry in my
profession
,
and was admitted to its practice. I was on the
threshhold of manhood; and she had promised, before
Heaven, here to give me heart and hand.
I had parted from her at twelve on that night three
years, and, as the clock struck, I stood again by her
side in the crowded ball-room of Saratoga.
Good God! Mr. Slingsby! she exclaimed as I
put out my hand.
Am I so changed that you do not know me, Miss
Linsey? I asked, as she still looked with a
wondering
gaze into my face, pressing my hand, however,
with real warmth, and evidently under the control,
for the moment, of the feelings with which we had
parted.
Changed, indeed! Why, you have studied
yourself
to a skeleton! My dear Philip, you are ill!
I was,but it was only for a moment. I asked her
hand for a waltz, and never before or since came wit
and laughter so freely to my lip. I was collected, but,
at the same time, I was the gayest of the gay; and
when every body had congratulated me, in her
hearing
,
on the school to which I had put my wits in my
long apprenticeship to the law, I retired to the gallery
looking down upon the garden, and cooled my brow
and rallied my sinking heart.
The candles were burning low, and the ball was
nearly over, when I entered the room again, and
requested
Edith to take a turn with me on the
colonnade
.
She at once assented, and I could feel by her
arm in mine, and see by the fixed expression on her
lip, that she did so with the intention of revealing to
me what she little thought I could so well anticipate.
My probation is over, I said, breaking the silence
which she seemed willing to prolong, and which had
lasted till we had twice measured the long colonnade.
It was three years ago to-night, I think, since we
parted. She spoke in an absent and careless tone, as
if trying to work out another more prominent thought
in her mind.
Do you find me changed? I asked.
Yesoh, yes! very!
But I am more changed than I seem, dear Edith!
She turned to me as if to ask me to explain myself.
Will you listen to me while I tell you how?
What can you mean? Certainly.
Then listen, for I fear I can scarce bring myself
to repeat what I am going to say. When I first
learned
to love you, and when I promised to love you for
life, you were thought to be dying, and I was a boy.
I did not count on the future, for I despaired of your
living to share it with me, and, if I had done so, I was
still a child and knew nothing of the world. I have
since grown more ambitious, and, I may as well say
at once, more selfish and less poetical. You will easily
divine my drift. You are poor, and I find myself, as
you have seen to-night, in a position which will enable
me to marry more to my advantage; and, with these
views, I am sure I should only make you miserable by
fulfilling my contract with you, and you will agree
with me that I consult our mutual happiness by this
coursedon't you think?
At this instant I gave a signal to Job, who
approached
and made some sensible remarks about the weather;
and, after another turn or two, I released Miss Linsey's
arm, and cautioning her against the night air, left her
to finish her promenade and swallow her own
projected
speech and mine, and went to bed.
And so ended my first love!
18*
SCENES OF FEAR.
No. I.
THE DISTURBED VIGIL.
Antonio
.
Get me a conjurer, I say! Inquire me out a man that
lets out devils!
Old Play
.
Such
a night! It was like a festival of Dian. A
burst of a summer shower at sunset, with a clap or
two of thunder, had purified the air to an intoxicating
rareness, and the free breathing of the flowers, and
the delicious perfume from the earth and grass, and
the fresh foliage of the new spring, showed the
delight
and sympathy of inanimate Nature in the night's
beauty. There was no atmospherenothing
between
the eye and the pearly moon,and she rode
through the heavens without a veil, like a queen as
she is, giving a glimpse of her nearer beauty for a
festal favour to the worshipping stars.
I was a student at the famed university of
Connecticut
,
and the bewilderments of philosophy and
poetry were strong upon me, in a place where
exquisite
natural beauty, and the absence of all other
temptation, secure to the classic neophite an almost
supernatural wakefulness of fancy. I contracted a
taste for the horrible in those days, which still clings
to me. I have travelled the world over, with no
object
but general observation, and have dawdled my
hour at courts and operas with little interest, while the
sacking and drowning of a woman in the Bosphorus,
the impalement of a robber on the Nile, and the insane
hospitals from Liverpool to Cathay, are described in
my capricious journal with the vividness of the most
stirring adventure.
There is a kind of
crystallization
in the
circumstances
of one's life. A peculiar turn of mind draws
to itself events fitted to its particular nucleus, and it is
frequently a subject of wonder why one man meets
with more remarkable things than another, when it is
owing merely to a difference of natural character.
It was, as I was saying, a night of wonderful beauty.
I was watching a corpse. In that part of the United
States the dead are never left alone till the earth is
thrown upon them, and, as a friend of the family, I
had been called upon for this melancholy service on
the night preceding the interment. It was a death
which had left a family of broken hearts; for, beneath
the sheet which sank so appallingly to the outline of
a human form, lay a wreck of beauty and sweetness
whose loss seemed to the survivors to have darkened
the face of the earth. The ethereal and touching
loveliness of that dying girl, whom I had known only
a hopeless victim of consumption, springs up in my
memory even yet, and mingles with every conception
of female beauty.
Two ladies, friends of the deceased, were to share
my vigils. I knew them but slightly, and, having
read them to sleep an hour after midnight, I performed
my half-hourly duty of entering the room where the
corpse lay, to look after the lights, and then strolled
into the garden to enjoy the quiet of the summer
night. The flowers were glittering in their
pearl-drops
,
and the air was breathless.
The sight of the long, sheeted corpse, the sudden
flare of lights as the long snuffs were removed from
the candles, the stillness of the close-shuttered room,
and my own predisposition to invest death with a
supernatural
interest, had raised my heart to my throat.
I walked backwards and forwards in the garden-path;
and the black shadows beneath the lilacs, and even
the glittering of the glow-worms within them, seemed
weird and fearful.
The clock struck, and I re-entered. My companions
still slept, and I passed on to the inner chamber. I
trimmed the lights, and stood and looked at the white
heap lying so fearfully still within the shadow of the
curtains; and my blood seemed to freeze. At the
moment
when I was turning away with a strong effort at
a more composed feeling, a noise like a flutter of wings,
followed by a rush and a sudden silence, struck on my
startled ear. The street was as quiet as death, and the
noise, which was far too audible to be a deception of
the fancy, had come from the side toward an
uninhabited
wing of the house. My heart stood still.
Another
instant, and the fire-screen was dashed down, and
a
white cat
rushed past me, and with the speed of light
sprang like a hyena upon the corpse. The flight of a
vampyre into the chamber would not have more
curdled my veins. A convulsive shudder ran cold
over me, but recovering my self-command, I rushed
to the animal, (of whose horrible appetite for the flesh
of the dead I had read incredulously,) and attempted
to tear her from the body. With her claws fixed in the
breast, and a
yowl
like the wail of an infernal spirit,
she crouched fearlessly upon it, and the stains already
upon the sheet convinced me that it would be
impossible
to remove her without shockingly disfiguring the
corpse. I seized her by the throat, in the hope of
choking her, but with the first pressure of my fingers,
she flew into my face, and the infuriated animal seemed
persuaded that it was a contest for life. Half-blinded
by the fury of her attack, I loosed her for a moment,
and she immediately leaped again upon the corpse,
and had covered her feet and face with blood before I
could recover my hold upon her. The body was no
longer in a situation to be spared, and I seized her with
a desperate grasp to draw her off; but to my horror,
the half-covered and bloody corpse rose upright in her
fangs, and, while I paused in fear, sat with drooping
arms, and head fallen with ghastly helplessness over
the shoulder. Years have not removed that fearful
spectacle from my eyes.
The corpse sank back, and I succeded in throttling
the monster, and threw her at last lifeless from the
window. I then composed the disturbed limbs, laid
the hair away once more smoothly on the forehead,
and, crossing the hands over the bosom, covered the
violated remains, and left them again to their repose.
My companions, strangely enough, slept on, and I
paced the garden-walk alone, till the day, to my
inexpressible
relief, dawned over the mountains.
No. II.
THE MAD SENIOR.
I was
called upon in my senior year to watch with
an insane student. He was a man who had attracted
a great deal of attention in college. He appeared in
an extraordinary costume at the beginning of our
Freshman Term, and wrote himself down as
Washington
Greyling, of , an unheard-of settlement
somewhere beyond the Mississippi. His coat and
other gear might have been the work of a Chickasaw
tailor, aided by the superintending taste of some white
huntsman, who remembered faintly the outline of
habiliments
he had not seen for half a century; it was
a body of green cloth, eked out with wampum and
otter-skin, and would have been ridiculous if it had
not encased one of the finest models of a manly frame
that ever trod the earth. With close-curling black
hair, a fine weather-browned complexion, Spanish
features
,
(from his mothera frequent physiognomy in the
countries bordering on Spanish America,) and the port
and lithe motion of a lion, he was a figure to look upon
in any disguise with warm admiration. He was soon
put into the hands of a tailor-proper, and, with the
facility which belongs to his countrymen, became in a
month the best-dressed man in college. His manners
were of a gentleman-like mildness, energetic, but
courteous
and chivalresque, and, unlike most savages and
all coins, he polished without losing his mark. At
the end of his first term, he would have been called a
high-bred gentleman at any court in Europe.
The opening of his mind was almost as rapid and
extraordinary. He seized every thing with an ardor
and freshness that habit and difficulty never
deadened
.
He was like a man who had tumbled into a new
star, and was collecting knowledge for a world to
which he was to return. The first in all games, the
wildest in all adventure, the most distinguished even
in the elegant society for which the town is
remarkable
,
and unfailingly brilliant in his recitations and
college
performances, he was looked upon as a sort of
admirable phenomenon, and neither envied nor
opposed
in any thing. I have often thought, in looking on
him, that his sensations at coming fresh from a wild
western prairie, and, at the first measure of his
capacities
with men of better advantages, finding himself
so uniformly superior, must have been stirringly
delightful
.
It is a wonder he never became arrogant;
but it was the last foible of which he could have been
accused.
We were reading hard for the honors in the senior
year, when Greyling suddenly lost his reason. He
had not been otherwise ill, and had, apparently in the
midst of high health, gone mad at a moment's
warning
.
The physicians scarce knew how to treat him.
The confinement to which he was at first subjected,
however, was thought inexpedient, and he seemed to
justify their lenity by the gentlest behavior when at
liberty. He seemed oppressed by a heart-breaking
melancholy. We took our turns in guarding and
watching with him, and it was upon my first night
of duty that the incident happened which I have thus
endeavored to introduce.
It was scarce like a vigil with a sick man, for our
patient went regularly to bed, and usually slept well.
I took my Lucretius and the Book of the Martyrs,
which was just then my favorite reading, and with hot
punch, a cold chicken, books and a fire, I looked
forward
to it as merely a studious night; and, as the
wintry wind of January rattled in at the old college
VOL. I. 19
windows, I thrust my feet into slippers, drew my
dress-ing-gown
about me, and congratulated myself on the
excessive comfortableness of my position. The
Sybarite's
bed of roses would have been no temptation.
It had snowed all day, but the sun had set with a
red rift in the clouds, and the face of the sky was
swept in an hour to the clearness ofI want a
comparison
your
own blue eye, dear Mary! The
all-glorious
arch of heaven was a mass of sparkling stars.
Greyling slept, and I, wearied of the cold
philosophy
of the Latin poet, took to my Book of Martyrs.
I read on, and read on. The college clock struck, it
seemed to me, the quarters rather than the hours.
Time flew: it was three.
Horrible! most horrible! I started from my chair
with the exclamation, and felt as if my scalp were
self-lifted
from my head. It was a description in the
harrowing
faithfulness of the language of olden time,
painting almost the articulate groans of an impaled
Christian. I clasped the old iron bound book, and
rushed to the window as if my heart was stifling for
fresh air.
Again at the fire. The large walnut faggots had
burnt to a bed of bright coals, and I sat gazing into
it, totally unable to shake off the fearful incubus from
my breast. The martyr was there,on the very hearth,
with the stakes scornfully crossed in his body; and
as the large coals cracked asunder and revealed the
brightness within, I seemed to follow the nerve
rending
instrument from hip to shoulder, and suffer with
him pang for pang, as if the burning redness were the
pools of his fevered blood.
Aha!
It struck on my ear like the cry of an exulting fiend.
Aha!
I shrunk into the chair as the awful cry was
repeated
,
and looked slowly and with difficult courage over
my shoulder. A single fierce eye was fixed upon me
from the mass of bed-clothes, and, for a moment, the
relief from the fear of some supernatural presence was
like water to a parched tongue. I sank back relieved
into the chair.
There was a rustling immediately in the bed, and,
starting again, I found the wild eyes of my patient
fixed still steadfastly upon me. He was creeping
stealthily out of bed. His bare foot touched the floor,
and his toes worked upon it as if he was feeling its
strength, and in a moment he stood upright on his
feet, and, with his head forward and his pale face livid
with rage, stepped towards me. I looked to the door.
He observed the glance, and in the next instant he
sprang clear over the bed, turned the key, and dashed
it furiously through the window.
Now! said he.
Greyling! I said. I had heard that a calm and
fixed gaze would control a madman, and with the
most difficult exertion of nerve, I met his lowering
eye, and we stood looking at each other for a full
minute
,
like men of marble.
Why have you left your bed? I mildly asked.
To kill you! was the appalling answer; and in
another moment the light-stand was swept from
between
us, and he struck me down with a blow that
would have felled a giant. Naked as he was, I had
no hold upon him, even if in muscular strength I had
been his match; and with a minute's struggle I yielded,
for resistance was vain. His knee was now upon my
breast and his left hand in my hair, and he seemed
by the tremulousness of his clutch to be hesitating
whether he should dash my brains out on the hearth.
I could scarce breathe with his weight upon my chest,
but I tried, with the broken words I could command,
to move his pity. He laughed, as only maniacs can,
and placed his hand on my throat. Oh God! shall I
ever forget the fiendish deliberation with which he
closed those feverish fingers?
Greyling! for God's sake! Greyling!
Die! curse you!
In the agonies of suffocation I struck out my arm,
and almost buried it in the fire upon the hearth.
With an expiring thought, I grasped a handful of the
red-hot coals, and had just strength sufficient to press
them hard against his side.
Thank God! I exclaimed with my first breath,
as my eyes recovered from their sickness, and I
looked
upon the familiar objects of my chamber once more.
The madman sat crouched like a whipped dog in
the farthest corner of the room, gibbering and
moaning
,
with his hands upon his burnt side. I felt that I
had escaped death by a miracle.
The door was locked, and, in dread of another
attack
,
I threw up the broken window, and to my
unutterable joy the figure of a man was visible upon
the snow near the out-buildings of the college. It
was a charity-student, risen before day to labour in
the wood-yard. I shouted to him, and Greyling leapt
to his feet.
There is time yet! said the madman; but as he
came towards me again, with the same panther-like
caution as before, I seized a heavy stone pitcher
standing in the window-seat, and hurling it at him
with a fortunate force and aim, he fell stunned and
bleeding on the floor. The door was burst open at
the next moment, and, calling for assistance, we tied
the wild Missourian into his bed, bound up his head
and side, and committed him to fresh watchers....
We have killed bears together at a Missouri Salt
Lick since then; but I never see Wash. Greyling
with the smile off his face, without a disposition to
look around for the door.
No. III.
THE LUNATIC'S SKATE.
I have
only, in my life, known one
lunatic
properly
so called. In the days when I carried a satchel
on the banks of the Shawsheen, (a river whose
half-lovely
,
half-wild scenery is tied like a silver thread
about my heart,) Larry Wynn and myself were the
farthest boarders from school, in a solitary farm-house
on the edge of a lake of some miles square, called by
the undignified title of Pomp's Pond. An old negro,
who was believed by the boys to have come over with
Christopher Columbus, was the only other human
being within any thing like a neighbourhood of the
lake, (it took its name from him,) and the only
approaches
to its waters, girded in as it was by an
almost impenetrable forest, were the path through old
Pomp's clearing, and that by our own door. Out of
school, Larry and I were inseparable. He was a pale,
sad-faced boy, and, in the first days of our intimacy,
he had confided a secret to me which, from its
uncommon
nature, and the excessive caution with
which he kept it from every one else, bound me to
him with more than the common ties of schoolfellow
attachment. We built wigwams together in the
woods, had our tomahawks made of the same fashion,
united our property in fox-traps, and played Indians
with perfect contentment in each other's approbation.
I had found out, soon after my arrival at school,
that Larry never slept on a moonlight night. With
the first slender horn that dropped its silver and
graceful
shape behind the hills, his uneasiness commenced,
and by the time its full and perfect orb poured a flood
of radiance over vale and mountain, he was like one
19*
haunted by a pursuing demon. At early twilight he
closed the shutters, stuffing every crevice that could
admit a ray; and then, lighting as many candles as
he could beg or steal from our thrifty landlord, he sat
down with his book, in moody silence, or paced the
room with an uneven step, and a solemn melancholy
in his fine countenance, of which, with all my
familiarity
with him, I was almost afraid. Violent
exercise
seemed the only relief, and when the candles
burnt low after midnight, and the stillness around the
lone farm-house became too absolute to endure, he
would throw up the window, and, leaping desperately
out into the moonlight, rush up the hill into the depths
of the wild forest, and walk on with supernatural
excitement
till the day dawned. Faint and pale he
would then creep into his bed, and, begging me to
make his very common and always credited excuse of
illness, sleep soundly till I returned from school. I
soon became used to his way, ceased to follow him,
as I had once or twice endeavoured to do, into the
forest, and never attempted to break in on the fixed
and rapt silence which seemed to transform his lips
to marble. And for all this Larry loved me.
Our preparatory studies were completed, and, to
our mutual despair, we were destined to different
universities. Larry's father was a disciple of the great
Channing, and mine a Trinitarian of uncommon
zeal; and the two institutions of Yale and Harvard
were in the hands of most eminent men of either
persuasion, and few are the minds that could resist a
four years' ordeal in either. A student was as
certain
to come forth a Unitarian from one as a Calvinist
from the other; and in the New-England States these
two sects are bitterly hostile. So, to the glittering
atmosphere of Channing and Everett went poor Larry,
lonely and dispirited; and I was committed to the
sincere zealots of Connecticut, some two hundred
miles off, to learn Latin and Greek, if it pleased
Heaven, but the mysteries of election and free grace,
whether or no.
Time crept, ambled, and galloped by turns, as we
were
in
love or
out
, moping in term-time, or revelling
in vacation, and gradually, I know not why, our
correspondence
had dropped, and the four years had
come to their successive deaths, and we had never
met. I grieved over it; for in those days I believed
with a school-boy's fatuity,
That two, or one, are almost what they seem;
and I loved Larry Wynn, as I hope I may never love
man or woman againwith a pain at my heart. I
wrote one or two reproachful letters in my senior
years, but his answers were overstrained, and too full
of protestations by half; and seeing that absence had
done its usual work on him, I gave it up, and wrote
an epitaph on a departed friendship. I do not know,
by the way, why I am detaining you with all this, for
it has nothing to do with my story; but let it pass as
an evidence that it is a true one. The climax of
things in real life has not the regular procession of
incidents in a tragedy.
Some two or three years after we had taken the
irrevocable yoke of life upon us, (not matrimony,
but money-making,) a winter occurred of
uncommonly
fine sleighing
sledging
, you call it in
England
.
At such times the American world is all
abroad, either for business or pleasure. The roads
are passable at any rate of velocity of which a horse
is capable; smooth as
montagnes Russes
, and hard
as is good for hoofs; and a hundred miles is
diminished
to ten in facility of locomotion. The hunter
brings down his venison to the cities, the western
trader takes his family a hundred leagues to buy
calicoes
and tracts, and parties of all kinds scour the
country, drinking mulled wine and flip, and shaking
the very nests out of the fir-trees with the ringing of
their horses' bells. You would think death and
sorrow
were buried in the snow with the leaves of the
last autumn.
I do not know why I undertook, at this time, a
journey to the west; certainly not for scenery, for it
was a world of waste, desolate, and dazzling
whiteness
,
for a thousand unbroken miles. The trees were
weighed down with snow, and the houses were
thatched and half-buried in it, and the mountains and
valleys were like the vast waves of an illimitable sea,
congealed with its yesty foam in the wildest hour of a
tempest. The eye lost its powers in gazing on it.
The spirit-bird that spread his refreshing green
wings before the pained eyes of Thalaba would have
been an inestimable fellow-traveller. The worth of
the eyesight lay in the purchase of a pair of green
goggles.
In the course of a week or two, after skimming over
the buried scenery of half a dozen states, each as
large as Great Britain, (more or less,) I found myself
in a small town on the border of one of our western
lakes. It was some twenty years since the bears had
found it thinly settled enough for their purposes, and
now it contained perhaps twenty thousand souls.
The oldest inhabitant, born in the town, was a youth
in his minority. With the usual precocity of new
settlements, it had already most of the peculiarities of
an old metropolis. The burnt stumps still stood about
among the houses, but there was a fashionable circle,
at the head of which were the lawyer's wife and the
member of Congress's daughter; and people ate their
peas with silver forks, and drank their tea with
scandal
,
and forgave men's
many
sins and refused to
forgive
woman's
one
, very much as in towns whose
history
is written in black letter. I dare say there were
not more than one or two offences against the moral
and Levitical law, fashionable on this side the water,
which had not been committed, with the authentic
aggravations, in the town of ; I would mention
the name if this were not a true story.
Larry Wynn (now Lawrence Wynn, Esq.) lived
here. He had, as they say in the United States, hung
out a shingle (
Londonic
, put up a sign) as attorney
at law, and to all the twenty thousand innocent
inhabitants
of the place, he was the oracle and the squire.
He was besides colonel of militia, churchwarden, and
canal commissioner; appointments which speak
volumes
for the prospects of rising young men in our
flourishing republic.
Larry was glad to see mevery. I was more glad
to see
him
. I have a soft heart, and forgive a wrong
generally, if it touches neither my vanity nor my
purse. I forgot his neglect, and called him Larry.
By the same token he did
not
call me Phil. (There
are very few that love me, patient reader; but those
who do, thus abbreviate my pleasant name of Philip.
I was called after the Indian Sachem of that name,
whose blood runs in this tawny hand.) Larry looked
upon me as a
man
. I looked on him, with all his
dignities and changes, through the sweet vista of
memoryas a
boy
. His mouth had acquired the
pinched corners of caution and mistrust common to
those who know their fellow men; but I never saw it
unless when speculating as I am now. He was to me
the pale-faced and melancholy friend of my boyhood;
and I could have slept, as I used to do, with my arm
around his neck, and feared to stir lest I should wake
him. Had my last earthly hope lain in the palm of
my hand, I could have given it to him, had he needed
it, but to make him sleep; and yet he thought of me
but as a stranger under his roof, and added, in his
warmest moments, a Mr. to my name! There is
but one circumstance in my life that has wounded
me more. Memory, avaunt!
Why should there be no unchangeableness in the
world? why no friendship? or why am I, and you,
gentle reader, (for by your continuing to pore over
these idle musings, you have a heart too,) gifted with
this useless and restless organ beating in our bosoms,
if its thirst for love is never to be slaked, and its
aching
self-fulness never to find flow or utterance? I
would positively sell my whole stock of affections for
three farthings. Will you say
two?
You are come in good time, said Larry one
morning
,
with a half-smile, and shall be groomsman to
me. I am going to be married.
Married?
Married.
I repeated the word after him, for I was surprised.
He had never opened his lips about his unhappy
lunacy
since my arrival, and I had felt hurt at this
apparent
unwillingness to renew our ancient confidence,
but had felt a repugnance to any forcing of the topic
upon him, and could only hope that he had outgrown
or overcome it. I argued, immediately on this
information
of his intended marriage, that it must be so.
No man in his senses, I thought, would link an
impending
madness to the fate of a confiding and lovely
woman.
He took me into his sleigh, and we drove to her
father's house. She was a flower in the wilderness.
Of a delicate form, as all my countrywomen are, and
lovely, as
quite
all certainly are not, large-eyed, soft
in her manners, and yet less timid than confiding and
sister-like, with a shade of melancholy in her smile,
caught, perhaps, with the trick of sadness from
himself
,
and a patrician slightness of reserve, or pride,
which Nature sometimes, in very mockery of high
birth, teaches her most secluded child,the bride elect
was, as I said before, a flower in the wilderness. She
was one of those women we sigh to look upon as they
pass by, as if there went a fragment of the wreck of
some blessed dream.
The day arrived for the wedding, and the
sleigh-bells
jingled merrily into the village. The morning
was as soft and genial as June, and the light snow on
the surface of the lake melted, and lay on the breast
of the solid ice beneath, giving it the effect of one white
silver mirror, stretching to the edge of the horizon.
It was exquisitely beautiful, and I was standing at the
window in the afternoon, looking off upon the shining
expanse, when Larry approached, and laid his hand
familiarly on my shoulder.
What glorious skating we shall have, said I, if
this smooth water freezes to-night!
I turned the next moment to look at him; for we
had not skated together since I went out, at his earnest
entreaty, at midnight, to skim the little lake where we
had passed our boyhood, and drive away the fever
from his brain, under the light of a full moon.
He remembered it, and so did I; and I put my arm
behind him, for the colour fled from his face, and I
thought he would have sunk to the floor.
The moon is full to-night, said he, recovering
instantly
to a cold self-possession.
I took hold of his hand firmly, and, in as kind a
tone as I could summon, spoke of our early
friendship
,
and apologizing thus for the freedom, asked if he
had quite overcome his melancholy disease. His face
worked with emotion, and he tried to withdraw his
hand from my clasp, and evidently wished to avoid
an answer.
Tell me, dear Larry, said I.
Oh God!
No!
said he, breaking violently from
me, and throwing himself with his face downwards
upon the sofa. The tears streamed through his fingers
upon the silken cushion.
Not cured? And does
she
know it?
No! no! thank God! not yet!
I remained silent a few minutes, listening to his
suppressed moans, (for he seemed heart-broken with
the confession,) and pitying while I inwardly
condemned
him. And then the picture of that lovely and
fond woman rose up before me, and the impossibility
of concealing his fearful malady from his wife, and
the fixed insanity in which it must end, and the whole
wreck of her hopes and his own prospects and
happiness
,and
my heart grew sick.
I sat down by him, and, as it was too late to
remonstrate
on the injustice he was committing toward her,
I asked how he came to appoint the night of a full
moon for his wedding. He gave up his reserve,
calmed
himself, and talked of it at last as if he were
relieved
by the communication. Never shall I forget the
doomed pallor, the straining eye, and feverish hand
of my poor friend during that half hour.
Since he had left college he had striven with the
whole energy of his soul against it. He had plunged
into business,he had kept his bed resolutely night
after night, till his brain seemed on the verge of frenzy
with the effort,he had taken opium to secure to
himself
an artificial sleep;but he had never dared to
confide
it to any one, and he had no friend to sustain him
in his fearful and lonely hours; and it grew upon him
rather than diminished. He described to me with the
most touching pathos how he had concealed it for
years,how he had stolen out like a thief to give vent
to his insane restlessness in the silent streets of the city
at midnight, and in the more silent solitudes of the
forest,how he had prayed, and wrestled, and wept
over it,and finally, how he had come to believe that
there was no hope for him except in the assistance and
constant presence of some one who would devote life
to him in love and pity. Poor Larry! I put up a silent
prayer in my heart that the desperate experiment might
not end in agony and death.
The sun set, and, according to my prediction, the
wind changed suddenly to the north, and the whole
surface of the lake in a couple of hours became of the
lustre of polished steel. It was intensely cold.
The fires blazed in every room of the bride's
paternal
mansion, and I was there early to fulfil my office
of master of ceremonies at the bridal. My heart was
weighed down with a sad boding, but I shook off at
least the appearance of it, and superintended the
concoction
of a huge bowl of punch with a merriment
which communicated itself in the shape of most joyous
hilarity to a troop of juvenile relations. The house
resounded with their shouts of laughter.
In the midst of our noise in the small inner room
entered Larry. I started back, for he looked more like
a demon possessed than a Christian man. He had
walked
to the house alone in the moonlight, not daring to trust
himself in company. I turned out the turbulent troop
about me, and tried to dispel his gloom, for a face like
his at that moment would have put to flight the rudest
bridal party ever assembled on holy ground. He
seized on the bowl of strong spirits which I had mixed
for a set of hardy farmers, and before I could tear it
from his lips had drunk a quantity which, in an
ordinary
mood, would have intoxicated him helplessly in
an hour. He then sat down with his face buried in
his hands, and in a few minutes rose, his eyes
sparkling
VOL. I. 20
with excitement, and the whole character of his
face utterly changed. I thought he had gone wild.
Now, Phil, said he; now for my bride! And
with an unbecoming levity he threw open the door,
and went half dancing into the room where the friends
were already assembled to witness the ceremony.
I followed with fear and anxiety. He took his place
by the side of the fair creature on whom he had placed
his hopes of life, and, though sobered somewhat by
the impressiveness of the scene, the wild sparkle still
danced in his eyes, and I could see that every nerve
in his frame was excited to the last pitch of tension.
If he had fallen a gibbering maniac on the floor, I
should not have been astonished.
The ceremony proceeded, and the first tone of his
voice in the response startled even the bride. If it
had rung from the depths of a cavern, it could not have
been more sepulchral. I looked at him with a
shudder
.
His lips were curled with an exulting
expression
,
mixed with an indefinable fear; and all the blood
in his face seemed settled about his eyes, which were
so bloodshot and fiery, that I have ever since
wondered
he was not, at the first glance, suspected of
insanity
.
But oh! the heavenly sweetness with which
that loveliest of creatures promised to love and cherish
him, in sickness and in health! I never go to a
bridal
but it half breaks my heart; and as the soft voice
of that beautiful girl fell with its eloquent meaning on
my ear, and I looked at her, with lips calm and eyes
moistened, vowing a love which I knew to be stronger
than death, to one who, I feared, was to bring only
pain and sorrow into her bosom, my eyes warmed
with irrepressible tears, and I wept.
The stir in the room as the clergyman closed his
prayer seemed to awake him from a trance. He
looked
around with a troubled face for a moment; and
then, fixing his eyes on his bride, he suddenly
clasped
his arms about her, and straining her violently to
his bosom, broke into an hysterical passion of tears
and laughter. Then suddenly resuming his
self-command
,
he apologized for the over-excitement of his
feelings, and behaved with forced and gentle propriety
till the guests departed.
There was an apprehensive gloom over the spirits
of the small bridal party left in the lighted rooms;
and, as they gathered round the fire, I approached,
and endeavoured to take a gay farewell. Larry was
sitting with his arm about his wife, and he wrung
my hand in silence as I said, Good night, and
dropped his head upon her shoulder. I made some
futile attempt to rally him, but it jarred on the
general
feeling, and I left the house.
It was a glorious night. The clear piercing air had
a vitreous brilliancy, which I have never seen in any
other climate, the rays of the moonlight almost
visibly
splintering with the keenness of the frost. The
moon herself was in the zenith, and there seemed
nothing between her and the earth but palpable and
glittering cold.
I hurried home: it was but eleven o'clock; and,
heaping up the wood in the large fire-place, I took a
volume of Ivanhoe, which had just then appeared,
and endeavoured to rid myself of my unpleasant
thoughts. I read on till midnight; and then, in a
pause of the story, I rose to look out upon the night,
hoping, for poor Larry's sake, that the moon was
buried in clouds. The house was near the edge of
the lake: and as I looked down upon the glassy waste,
spreading away from the land, I saw the dark figure
of a man kneeling directly in the path of the moon's
rays. In another moment he rose to his feet, and
the tall, slight form of my poor friend was distinctly
visible, as, with long and powerful strokes, he sped
away upon his skates along the shore.
To take my own Hollanders, put a collar of fur
around my mouth, and hurry after him, was the
work of but a minute. My straps were soon fastened;
and, following in the marks of the sharp irons at the
top of my speed, I gained sight of him in about half
an hour, and with great effort neared him sufficiently
to shout his name with a hope of being heard.
Larry! Larry!
The lofty mountain-shore gave back the cry in
repeated
echoes; but he redoubled his strokes, and
sped on faster than before. At my utmost speed I
followed
on; and when, at last, I could almost lay my
hand on his shoulder, I summoned my strength to
my breathless lungs, and shouted againLarry!
Larry!
He half looked back, and the full moon at that
instant
streamed full into his eyes. I have thought
since that he could not have seen me for its dazzling
brightness; but I saw every line of
his
features with
the distinctness of daylight, and I shall never forget
them. A line of white foam ran through his
half-parted
lips; his hair streamed wildly over his forehead,
on which the perspiration glittered in large drops;
and every lineament of his expressive face was
stamped
with unutterable and awful horror. He looked
back no more; but, increasing his speed with an
energy of which I did not think his slender frame
capable
,
he began gradually to outstrip me. Trees,
rocks, and hills fled back like magic. My limbs began
to grow numb; my fingers had lost all feeling, but a
strong north-east wind was behind us, and the ice
smoother than a mirror; and I struck out my feet
mechanically, and still sped on.
For two hours we had kept along the shore. The
branches of the trees were reflected in the polished
ice, and the hills seemed hanging in the air, and
floating
past us with the velocity of storm-clouds. Far
down the lake, however, there glimmered the just
visible light of a fire, and I was thanking God that we
were probably approaching some human succour,
when, to my horror, the retreating figure before me
suddenly darted off to the left, and made swifter than
before toward the centre of the icy waste. Oh, God!
what feelings were mine at that moment. Follow him
far I dared not; for, the sight of land once lost, as it
would be almost instantly with our tremendous speed,
we perished, without a possibility of relief.
He was far beyond my voice, and to overtake him
was the only hope. I summoned my last nerve for
the effort, and, keeping him in my eye, struck across
at a sharper angle, with the advantage of the wind
full in my back. I had taken note of the mountains,
and knew that we were already forty miles from
home, a distance it would be impossible to retrace
against the wind; and the thought of freezing to
death, even if I could overtake him, forced itself
appallingly
upon me.
Away I flew, despair giving new force to my limbs,
and soon gained on the poor lunatic, whose efforts
seemed flagging and faint. I neared him. Another
struggle! I could have dropped down where I was,
and slept, if there were death in the first minute, so
stiff and drowsy was every muscle in my frame.
Larry! I shouted. Larry!
He started at the sound, and I could hear a
smothered
and breathless shriek, as, with supernatural
strength, he straightened up his bending figure, and,
leaning forward again, sped away from me like a
phantom on the blast.
I could follow no longer. I stood stiff on my skates,
20*
still going on rapidly before the wind, and tried to
look after him, but the frost had stiffened my eyes,
and there was a mist before them, and they felt like
glass. Nothing was visible around me but moonlight
and ice, and dimly and slowly I began to retrace the
slight path of semicircles toward the shore. It was
painful work. The wind seemed to divide the very
fibres of the skin upon my face. Violent exercise no
longer warmed my body, and I felt the cold shoot
sharply into my loins, and bind across my breast like
a chain of ice; and, with the utmost strength of
mind at my command, I could just resist the terrible
inclination to lie down and sleep. I forgot poor
Larry. Lifedear life!was now my only thought!
So selfish are we in our extremity!
With difficulty I at last reached the shore, and then,
unbuttoning my coat, and spreading it wide for a sail,
I set my feet together, and went slowly down before
the wind, till the fire which I had before noticed
began
to blaze cheerily in the distance. It seemed an
eternity in my slow progress. Tree after tree threw
the shadow of its naked branches across the way; hill
after hill glided slowly backward; but my knees
seemed frozen together, and my joints fixed in ice;
and if my life had depended on striking out my feet,
I should have died powerless. My jaws were locked,
my shoulders drawn half down to my knees, and in a
few minutes more, I am well convinced, the blood
would have thickened in my veins, and stood still, for
ever.
I could see the tongues of the flamesI counted
the burning faggotsa form passed between me and
the fireI struck, and fell prostrate on the snow; and
I remember no more.
The sun was darting a slant beam through the trees
when I awoke. The genial warmth of a large bed of
embers played on my cheek, a thick blanket enveloped
me, and beneath my head was a soft cushion of
withered
leaves. On the opposite side of the fire lay four
Indians
wrapped in their blankets, and, with her head on
her knees, and her hands clasped over her ankles, sat an
Indian woman, who had apparently fallen asleep upon
her watch. The stir I made aroused her, and, as she
piled on fresh faggots, and kindled them to a bright
blaze with a handful of leaves, drowsiness came over
me again, and I wrapped the blanket about me more
closely, and shut my eyes to sleep.
I awoke refreshed. It must have been ten o'clock
by the sun. The Indians were about, occupied in
vavarious
avocations, and the woman was broiling a slice
of deer's flesh on the coals. She offered it to me as I
rose; and having eaten part of it with a piece of a
cake made of meal, I requested her to call in the men,
and with offers of reward, easily induced them to go
with me in search of my lost friend.
We found him, as I had anticipated, frozen to death,
far out on the lake. The Indians tracked him by the
marks of his skate-irons, and from their appearance he
had sunk quietly down, probably drowsy and
exhausted
,
and had died of course without pain. His
last act seemed to have been under the influence of
his strange madness, for he lay on his face, turned
from the quarter of the setting moon.
We carried him home to his bride. Even the
Indians
were affected by her uncontrollable agony. I
cannot describe that scene, familiar as I am with
pictures
of horror.
I made inquiries with respect to the position of his
bridal chamber. There were no shutters, and the
moon streamed broadly into it, and after kissing his
shrinking bride with the violence of a madman, he
sprang out of the room with a terrific scream, and she
saw him no more till he lay dead on his bridal bed.
INCIDENTS ON THE HUDSON.
M. Chabert
, the fire-eater, would have found
New-York
uncomfortable. I would mention the height of
the thermometer but for an aversion I have to figures.
Broadway, at noon, had been known to
fry soles
.
I had fixed upon the first of August for my annual
trip to Saratoga, and with a straw hat, a portmanteau,
and a black boy, was huddled into the
rather-faster-than-lightning
steamer, North America, with about
seven hundred other people, like myself, just in time.
Some hundred and fifty gentlemen and ladies, thirty
seconds too late, stood larding the pine chips upon
the pier, gazing after the vanishing boat through
showers
of perspiration. Away we streaked at the rate
of twelve miles in the hour against the current, and
by the time I had penetrated to the baggage closet,
and seated William Wilberforce upon my portmanteau,
with orders not to stir for eleven hours and seven
minutes
,
we were far up the Hudson, opening into its
hills and rocks, like a witches' party steaming through
the Hartz in a cauldron.
A North River steam-boat, as a Vermont boy would
phrase it, is
another guess sort o' thing from a
Britisher
.
A coal-barge and an eight-oars on the Thames
are scarce more dissimilar. Built for smooth water
only, our river boats are long, shallow and graceful,
of the exquisite proportions of a pleasure yacht, and
painted as brilliantly and fantastically as an Indian
shell. With her bow just leaning up from the surface
of the stream, her cut-water throwing off a curved and
transparent sheet from either side, her white awnings,
her magical speed, and the gay spectacle of a thousand
well-dressed people on her open decks, I know
nothing
prettier than the vision that shoots by your door
as you sit smoking in your leaf-darkened portico on
the bold shore of the Hudson.
The American edition of Mrs. Trollope (several
copies of which are to be found in every boat,
serving
the same purpose to the feelings of the passengers
as the escape-valve to the engine) lay on a sofa beside
me, and taking it up, as to say, I will be let alone,
I commenced dividing my attention in my usual quiet
way between the varied panorama of rock and valley
flying backwards in our progress, and the as varied
multitude about me.
For the mass of the women, as far as satin slippers,
hats, dresses, and gloves could go, a Frenchman
might have fancied himself in the midst of a
transplantation
from the Boulevards. In London, French
fashions are in a manner Anglified: but an American
woman looks on the productions of Herbault, Boivin,
and Maneuri, as a translator of the Talmud on the
inspired text. The slight figure and small feet of the
race rather favour the resemblance, and a French
milliner, who would probably come to America
expecting
to see bears and buffaloes prowling about the
landing-place, would rub her eyes in New-York, and
imagine she was still in France, and had crossed
perhaps
only the broad part of the Seine.
The men were a more original study. Near me sat
a Kentuckian on three chairs. He had been to the
metropolis, evidently for the first time, and had
looked round sharp. In a fist of no very delicate
proportions, was crushed a pair of French kid gloves,
which, if they fulfilled to him a glove's destiny, would
flatter the rich man that the camel might yet
give him the required precedent. His hair had still
the traces of having been astonished with curling
tongs, and across his Atlantean breast was looped, in
a complicated zig-gag, a chain that must have cost
him a wilderness of raccoon-skins. His coat was
evidently the production of a Mississippi tailor, though
of the finest English material; his shirt-bosom was
ruffled like a swan with her feathers full spread, and
a black silk cravat, tied in a kind of a
curse-me-if-I-care-sort-of-a-knot
,
flung out its ends like the arms of
an Italian
improvisatore
. With all this he was a man
to look upon with respect. His under jaw was set up
to its fellow with an habitual determination that
would throw a hickory-tree into a shiver, but frank
good-nature, and the most absolute freedom from
suspicion
,
lay at large on his Ajacean features, mixed
with an earnestness that commended itself at once to
your liking.
In a retired corner, near the wheel, stood a group
of Indians, as motionless by the hour together as
figures carved in
rosso antico
. They had been on
their melancholy annual visit to the now-cultivated
shores of Connecticut, the burial-place, but
unforgotten
and once wild home of their fathers. With the
money given them by the romantic persons whose
sympathies are yearly moved by these stern and
poetical
pilgrims, they had taken a passage in the
fire-canoe
,
which would set them two hundred miles on
their weary journey back to the prairies. Their
Apollo-like forms loosely dressed in blankets, their
gaudy wampum-belts and feathers, the muscular arm
and close clutch upon the rifle, the total absence of
surprise at the unaccustomed wonders about them,
and the lowering and settled scorn and dislike
expressed
in their copper faces, would have powerfully
impressed a European. The only person on whom
they deigned to cast a glance was the Kentuckian,
and at him they occasionally stole a look, as if, through
all his metropolitan finery, they recognised metal
with whose ring they were familiar.
There were three foreigners on board, two of them
companions, and one apparently alone. With their
coats too small for them, their thick soled boots and
sturdy figures, collarless cravats, and assumed
unconsciousness
of the presence of another living soul, they
were recognisable at once as Englishmen. To most
of the people on board they probably appeared equally
well-dressed, and of equal pretensions to the character
of gentlemen; but any one who had made observations
between Temple Bar and the steps of Crockford's,
would easily resolve them into two Birmingham
bagmen
sinking the shop, and a quiet gentleman on a
tour of information.
The only other persons I particularly noted were a
Southerner, probably the son of a planter from
Alabama
,
and a beautiful girl, dressed in singularly bad
taste, who seemed his sister. I knew the specimen
well. The indolent attitude, the thin but
powerfully-jointed
frame, the prompt politeness, the air of
superiority
acquired from constant command over slaves, the
mouth habitually flexible and looking eloquent even
in silence, and the eye in which slept a volcano of
violent
passions, were the marks that showed him of a race
that I had studied much, and preferred to all the many
and distinct classes of my countrymen. His sister was
of the slightest and most fragile figure, graceful as a
VOL. I. 21
fawn, but with no trace of the dancing master's
precepts
in her motions, vivid in her attention to
everything
about her, and amused with all she saw; a copy
of Lalla Rookh sticking from the pocket of her French
apron, a number of gold chains hung outside her
travelling
habit, and looped to her belt, and a glorious
profusion of dark curls broken loose from her combs
and floating unheeded over her shoulders.
Toward noon we rounded West Point, and shot
suddenly into the overshadowed gorge of the
mountains
,
as if we were dashing into the vein of a silver
mine, laid open and molten into a flowing river by a
flash of lightning. (The figure should be
Montgomery's
;
but I can in no other way give an idea of the
sudden darkening of the Hudson, and the under-ground
effect of the sharp over-hanging mountains as you
sweep first into the Highlands.)
The solitary Englishman, who had been watching
the southern beauty with the greatest apparent
interest
,
had lounged over to her side of the boat, and, with
the instinctive knowledge that women have of
character
,
she had shrunk from the more obtrusive attempts
of the Brummagems to engage her in conversation,
and had addressed some remark to him, which seemed
to have advanced them at once to acquaintances of a
year. They were admiring the stupendous scenery
together a moment before the boat stopped for a
passenger
,
off a small town above the point. As the
wheels were checked, there was a sudden splash in the
water, and a cry of A lady overboard! I looked
for the fair creature who had been standing before me,
and she was gone. The boat was sweeping on, and
as I darted to the railing I saw the gurgling eddy
where something had just gone down; and in the
next minute the Kentuckian and the youngest of the
Indians rushed together to the stern, and clearing the
taffrail with tremendous leaps, dived side by side into
the very centre of the foaming circle. The
Englishman
had coolly seized a rope, and, by the time they
re-appeared, stood on the railing with a coil in his hand,
and flung it with accurate calculation directly over
them. With immovably grave faces, and eyes blinded
with water, the two divers rose, holding high between
thema large pine faggot! Shouts of laughter pealed
from the boat, and the Kentuckian, discovering his
error, gave the log an indignant fling behind, and,
taking
hold of the rope, lay quietly to be drawn in; while
the Indian, disdaining assistance, darted through the
wake of the boat with arrowy swiftness, and sprang
up the side with the agility of a tiger-cat. The lady
re-appeared from the cabin as they jumped dripping
upon the deck; the Kentuckian shook himself, and
sat down in the sun to dry; and the graceful and
stern Indian, too proud even to put the wet hair away
from his forehead, resumed his place and folded his
arms, as indifferent and calm, save the suppressed
heaving of his chest, as if he had never stirred from
his stone-like posture.
An hour or two more brought us to the foot of the
Catskills, and here the boat lay alongside the pier to
discharge those of her passengers who were bound to
the house on the mountain. A hundred or more
moved to the gangway at the summons to get ready,
and among them the Southerners and the Kentuckian.
I had begun to feel an interest in our fair
fellow-passenger
,
and I suddenly determined to join their party
a resolution which the Englishman seemed to come
to at the same moment, and probably for the same
reason.
We slept at the pretty village on the bank of the
river, and the next day made the twelve hours' ascent
through glen and forest, our way skirted with the
most gorgeous and odorent flowers, and turned aside
and towered over by trees whose hoary and
moss-covered
trunks would have stretched the conceptions
of the Savage Rosa. Every thing that was not
lovely was gigantesque and awful. The rocks were
split with a visible impress of the Almighty power
that had torn them apart, and the daring and dizzy
crags spurred into the sky as if the arms of a buried
and frenzied Titan were thrusting them from the
mountain's bosom. It gave one a kind of maddening
desire to shout and leapthe energy with which it
filled the mind so out-measured the power of the
frame.
Near the end of our journey, we stopped together
on a jutting rock, to look back on the obstacles we had
overcome. The view extended over forty or fifty
miles of vale and mountain, and, with a half-shut eye,
it looked, in its green and lavish foliage, like a near
and unequal bed of verdure, while the distant Hudson
crept through it like a half-hid satin riband, lost as if
in clumps of moss among the broken banks of the
Highlands. I was trying to fix the eye of my
companion
upon West Point, when a steamer, with its
black funnel and retreating line of smoke, issued as if
from the bosom of the hills into an open break of the
river. It was as small apparently as the white hand
that pointed to it so rapturously.
Oh! said the half-breathless girl, is it not like
some fairy bark on an Eastern stream, with a spice
lamp alight in its prow?
More like an old shoe afloat, with a cigar stuck in
it, interrupted Kentucky.
As the sun began to kindle into a blaze of fire, the
tumultuous masses, so peculiar to an American sky,
turning every tree and rock to a lambent and rosy
gold, we stood on the broad platform on which the
house is built, braced even beyond weariness by the
invigorating and rarified air of the mountain. A hot
supper and an early pillow, with the feather beds and
blankets of winter, were unromantic circumstances,
but I am not aware that any one of the party made
any audible objection to them; I sat next the
Kentuckian
at table, and can answer for two.
A mile or two back from the mountain-house, on
nearly the same level, the gigantic forest suddenly
sinks two or three hundred feet into the earth, forming
a tremendous chasm, over which a bold stag might
almost leap, and above which the rocks hang on either
side with the most threatening and frowning grandeur.
A mountain-stream creeps through the forest to the
precipice, and leaps as suddenly over, as if,
Arethusalike
,
it fled into the earth from the pursuing steps of a
Satyr. Thirty paces from its brink, you would never
suspect, but for the hollow reverberation of the
plunging
stream, that any thing but a dim and mazy wood
was within a day's journey. It is visited as a great
curiosity
in scenery, under the name of Cauterskill Falls.
We were all on the spot by ten the next morning,
after a fatiguing tramp through the forest; for the
Kentuckian
had rejected the offer of a guide, undertaking
to bring us to it in a straight line by only the signs of
the water-course. The caprices of the little stream
had misled him, however, and we arrived half-dead
with the fatigue of our cross-marches.
I sat down on the bald edge of the precipice, and
suffered my more impatient companions to attempt the
difficult and dizzy descent before me. The
Kentuckian
leapt from rock to rock, followed daringly by the
Southerner; and the Englishman, thoroughly
enamoured
of the exquisite child of nature, who knew no
reserve beyond her maidenly modesty, devoted himself
to her assistance, and compelled her with anxious
entreaties
to descend more cautiously. I lay at my length
as they proceeded, and with my head over the
projecting
edge of the most prominent crag, watched them in
a giddy dream, half-stupified by the grandeur of the
scene, half-interested in their motions.
They reached the bottom of the glen at last, and
shouted to the two who had gone before, but they had
followed the dark passage of the stream to find its
vent, and were beyond sight or hearing.
After sitting a minute or two, the restless but
overfatigued
girl rose to go nearer the fall, and I was
remarking
to myself the sudden heaviness of her steps, when she staggered, and turning towards her
companion
,
fell senseless into his arms. The closeness of the
air below, combined with over-exertion, had been too
much for her.
The small hut of an old man who served as a guide
stood a little back from the glen, and I had rushed
into it, and was on the first step of the descent with a
flask of spirits, when a cry from the opposite crag, in
the husky and choking scream of infuriated passion,
suddenly arrested me. On the edge of the yawning
chasm, gazing down into it with a livid and death-like
paleness, stood the Southerner. I mechanically
followed
his eye. His sister lay on her back upon a flat rock
immediately below him, and over her knelt the
Englishman
,
loosening the dress that pressed close upon
her throat, and with his face so near to her's as to
conceal it entirely from the view. I felt the brother's
misapprehension at a glance, but my tongue clung to
the roof of my mouth; for in the madness of his fury
he stood stretching clear over the brink, and every
instant I looked to see him plunge headlong.
Before
I could recover my breath, he started back, gazed
wildly round, and seizing upon a huge fragment of
rock, heaved it up with supernatural strength, and
hurled it into the abyss. Giddy and sick with horror,
I turned away and covered up my eyes. I felt
assured
he had dashed them to atoms.
The lion roar of the Kentuckian was the first sound
that followed the thundering crash of the fragments.
Hallo, youngster! What in tarnation are you
arter? You've killed the gal, by gosh!
The next moment I heard the loosened stones as he
went plunging down into the glen, and hurrying after
him with my restorative, I found the poor
Englishman
lying senseless on the rocks, and the fainting
girl, escaped miraculously from harm, struggling
slowly to her senses.
On examination, the new sufferer appeared only
stunned by a small fragment which had struck him
on the temple, and the Kentuckian, taking him up in
his arms like a child, strode through the spray of the
fall, and held his head under the descending torrent
till he kicked lustily for his freedom. With a draught
from the flask, the pale Alabamian was soon perfectly
restored, and we stood on the rock together looking at
each other like people who have survived an
earth-quake
.
We climbed the ascent and found the brother lying
with his face to the earth, beside himself with his
conflicting
feelings. The rough tongue of the
Kentuckian
,
to whom I had explained the apparent cause of
the rash act, soon cleared up the tempest, and he
joined us presently, and walked back by his sister's
side in silence.
We made ourselves into a party to pass the remainder
of the summer on the lakes, unwillingly letting off the
Kentuckian, who was in a hurry to get back to
propose
himself for the Legislature.
Three or four years have elapsed, and I find myself
a traveller in England. Thickly sown as are the
wonders and pleasures of London, an occasional
dinner
with a lovely countrywoman in  Square, and
a gossip with her husband over a glass of wine, in
which Cauterskill Falls are not forgotten, are
memorandums
in my diary never written but in red
letters.
END OF VOLUME I.